MONALDI.
CHAPTER I.
Among
the students of a seminary at Bologna
were two friends, more remarkable for their
attachment
to each other, than for any resemblance
in their minds or dispositions. Indeed there was
so little else in common between them, that hardly
two boys could be found more unlike. The
character
of Maldura, the eldest, was bold, grasping,
and ostentatious; while that of Monaldi, timid
and gentle, seemed to shrink from observation.
The one, proud and impatient, was ever laboring
for distinction; the world, palpable, visible, audible,
was his idol; he lived only in externals, and could
neither act nor feel but for effect; even his secret
reveries having an outward direction, as if he
could not think without a view to praise, and
anxiously referring to the opinion of others; in
short, his nightly and his daily dreams had but one
subject  the talk and the eye of the crowd. The
other, silent and meditative, seldom looked out of
himself either for applause or enjoyment; if he
ever did so, it was only that he might add to, or
sympathize in the triumph of another; this done,
he retired again, as it were to a world of his own,
where thoughts and feelings, filling the place of
men and things, could always supply him with
occupation and amusement.
Had the ambition of Maldura been less, or his
self-knowledge greater, he might have been a
benefactor to the world. His talents were of a
high order. Perhaps few have ever surpassed him
in the power of acquiring; to this he united
perseverance
;
and all that was known, however
various
and opposite, he could master at will. But
here his power stopped; beyond the regions of
discovered knowledge he could not see, and dared
not walk, for to him all beyond was outer
darkness
;
in a word, with all his gifts he wanted that
something, whatever it might be, which gives the
living principle to thought. But this sole
deficiency
was the last of which he suspected himself.
With that self-delusion so common to young men
of mistaking the praise of what is promising for
that of the thing promised, he too rashly
confounded
the ease with which he carried all the
prizes of his school with the rare power of
commanding
at pleasure the higher honors of the
world.
But the honors of a school are for things and
purposes far different from those demanded and
looked for by the world. Maldura unfortunately
did not make the distinction. His various
knowledge
,
though ingeniously brought together, and
skilfully set anew, was still the knowledge of
other men; it did not come forth as in new birth,
from the modifying influence of his own nature.
His mind was hence like a thing of many parts,
yet wanting a whole  that
realizing
quality which
the world must feel before it will reverence. In
proportion to its stores such a mind will be valued,
and even admired; but it cannot command that
inward voice  the only true voice of fame, which
speaks not, be it in friend or enemy, till awakened
by the presence of a master spirit.
Such were the mind and disposition of Maldura;
and from their unfortunate union sprang all the
after evils in his character. As yet, however, he
was known to himself and others only as a
remarkable
boy. His extraordinary attainments
placing him above competition, he supposed
himself
incapable of so mean a passion as envy;
indeed the high station from which he could look
down on his associates gave a complacency to his
mind not unfavorable to the gentler virtues; he
was, therefore, often kind, and even generous
without an effort. Besides, though he disdained
to affect humility, he did not want discretion, and
that taught him to bear his honors without
arrogance
.
His claims were consequently admitted
by his schoolfellows without a murmur. But there
was one amongst them whose praises were marked
by such warmth and enthusiasm as no heart not
morally insensible could long withstand; this youth
was Monaldi. Maldura naturally had strong
feelings
,
and so long as he continued prosperous and
happy, their course was honorable. He requited
the praises of his companion with his esteem and
gratitude, which soon ripened into a friendship so
sincere that he believed he could even lay down
his life for him.
It was in this way that two natures so opposite
became mutually attracted. But the warmth and
magnanimity of Monaldi were all that was yet
known to the other; for, though not wanting in
academic learning, he was by no means
distinguished
;
indeed, so little, that Maldura could not
but feel and lament it.
The powers of Monaldi, however, were yet to
be called forth. And it was not surprising that to
his youthful companions he should have then
appeared
inefficient, there being a singular kind of
passiveness about him easily mistaken for vacancy.
But his was like the passiveness of some
uncultured
spot, lying unnoticed within its nook of rocks,
and silently drinking in the light, and the heat,
and the showers of heaven, that nourish the seeds
of a thousand nameless flowers, destined one day
to bloom and to mingle their fragrance with the
breath of nature. Yet to common observers the
external world seemed to lie only
Like a load upon his weary eye;
but to them it appeared so because he delighted
to shut it out, and to combine and give another
life to the images it had left in his memory; as if
he would sleep to the real and be awake only to a
world of shadows. But, though his emotions
seldom
betrayed themselves by any outward signs,
there was nothing sluggish in the soul of Monaldi;
it was rather their depth and strength that
prevented
their passage through the feeble medium of
words. He regarded nothing in the moral or
physical
world as tiresome or insignificant; every
object
had a charm, and its harmony and beauty, its
expression and character, all passed into his soul
in all their varieties, while his quickening spirit
brooded over them as over the elementary forms of
a creation of his own. Thus living in the life he
gave, his existence was too intense and extended
to be conceived by the common mind: hence the
neglect and obscurity in which he passed his youth.
But the term of pupilage soon came to an end,
and the friends parted  each, as he could, to
make his way in the world.
The profession which Monaldi had chosen for
the future occupation of his life was that of a
painter; to which, however, he could not be said
to have come wholly unprepared. The slight
sketch just given of him will show that the most
important part, the mind of a painter, he already
possessed; the nature of his amusements (in which,
some one has well observed, men are generally
most in earnest,) having unconsciously disciplined
his mind for this pursuit. He had looked at
Nature
with the eye of a lover; none of her minutest
beauties had escaped him, and all that were
stirring
to a sensitive heart and a romantic
imagination
were treasured up in his memory, as themes
of delightful musing in her absence: and they
3
came to him in those moments with that
never-failing
freshness and life which love can best give
to the absent. But the skill and the hand of an
artist were still to be acquired.
But perseverance, if not a mark of genius, is at
least one of its practical adjuncts; and Monaldi
possessed it. Indeed there is but one mode of
making endurable the perpetual craving of any
master-passion  the continually laboring to satisfy
it. And, so it be innocent, how sweet the reward!
giving health to the mind without the sense of
toil. This Monaldi enjoyed; for he never felt
that he had been toiling, even when the dawn, as
it often happened, broke in upon his labors.
Without going more into detail, in a very few
years Monaldi was universally acknowledged to be
the first painter in Italy. His merit, however, was
not merely comparative. He differed from his
contemporaries no less in kind than in degree. If
he held anything in common with others, it was
with those of ages past  with the mighty dead of
the fifteenth century; from them he had learned
the language of his art, but his thoughts, and their
turn of expression were his own. His originality,
therefore was felt by all; and his country hailed
him as one coming, in the spirit of Raffaelle, to
revive by his genius her ancient glory.
It is not, however, to be supposed, that the
claims of the new style were allowed at once,
since it required not only the acquisition of a new
taste, but the abandoning an old one. In what is
called a critical age, which is generally that which
follows the age of production, it is rarely that an
original author is well received at once. There
are two classes of opponents, which he is almost
sure to encounter: the one consists of those who,
without feeling or imagination, are yet ambitious of
the reputation of critics; who set out with some
theory, either ready made to their hands and purely
traditional, or else
reasoned out
by themselves from
some plausible dogma, which they dignify with
the name of philosophy. As these criticise for
distinction
,
every work of art becomes to them, of
course, a personal affair, which they accordingly
approach either as patrons or enemies; and woe
to the poor artist who shall have had the hardihood
to think for himself. In the other class is
comprised
the well-meaning multitude, who, having no
pretensions of their own, are easily awed by
authority
;
and, afraid to give way to their natural
feeling, receive without distrust the more confident
dicta of these self-created arbiters. Perhaps at no
time was the effect of this peculiar usurpation
more sadly illustrated than in the prescriptive
commonplace which distinguished the period of
which we speak. The first appearance of
Monaldi
was consequently met by an opposition
proportioned
to the degree of his departure from the
current opinions. But as his good sense had
restrained
him from venturing before the public until
by long and patient study he had felt himself
entitled
to take the rank of a master, he bore the
attacks of his assailants with the equanimity of one
who well knew that the ground he stood upon was
not the quicksand of self-love. Besides, he had
no vanity to be wounded, and the folly of their
criticisms he disdained to notice, leaving it to time
to establish his claims. Nor was this wise
forbearance
long unrewarded, for it is the nature of
truth, sooner or later, to command recognition;
some kindred mind will at last respond to it; and
there is no true response that is not given in love;
hence the lover-like enthusiasm with which it is
hailed, and dwelt upon, until the echo of like
minds spreads it abroad, to be finally received by
the many as a matter of faith. It was so with
Monaldi.
As our business, however, is rather with the
man than the painter, we shall only stop to notice
one of his works; and that less as being the cause
of his final triumph, than as illustrating the
peculiar
character of his mind. The subject of the
picture was the first sacrifice of Noah after the
subsiding of the waters; a subject of little promise
from an ordinary hand, but of all others, perhaps,
the best suited to exhibit that rare union of intense
feeling and lofty imagination which characterized
Monaldi. The composition consisted of the
patriarch
and his family, at the altar, which occupied
the foreground; a distant view of mount Ararat,
with the ark resting on its peak; and the
intermediate
vale. These were scanty materials for a
picture; but the fulness with which they seemed
to distend the spectator's mind left no room for
this thought. There was no dramatic variety in
the kneeling father and his kneeling children; they
expressed but one sentiment  adoration; and it
seemed to go up as with a single voice. This
gave the soul which the spectator felt; but it was
one that could not have gone forth under common
day light, nor ever have pervaded with such
emphatic
life other than the shadowy valley, the
misty mountain, the mysterious ark, again floating
as it were on a sea of clouds, and the lurid,
deeptoned
sky, dark yet bright, which spoke to the
imagination of a lost and recovered world  once
dead, now alive, and pouring out her first song of
praise even from under the pall of death.
3*
Monaldi was fortunate on the first exhibition of
this picture to have for his leading critic the
cavalier
S  , a philosopher and a poet, though he
had never written a line as either.
I want no surer evidence of genius than this,
said he, addressing Monaldi; you are master of
the chiaro' scuro and color, two of the most
powerful
instruments, I will not say of Art, but of
Nature
,
for they were her's from her birth, though
few of our painters since the time of the Caracci
appear to have known it. If I do not place your
form and expression first, 't is not that I
undervalue
them; they are both true and elevated; yet,
with all their grandeur and power, I should still
hold you wanting in one essential, had you not
thus infused the human emotion into the
surrounding
elements. This is the poetry of the art;
the highest nature. There are hours when Nature
may be said to hold intercourse with man,
modifying
his thoughts and feelings; when man reacts,
and in his turn bends her to his will, whether by
words or colors, he becomes a poet. A vulgar
painter may perhaps think your work unnatural;
and it must be so to him who
sees only with his
eyes
. But another kind of critic is required to
understand our rapt Correggio, or even  in spite
of his abortive forms  the Dutch Rembrant.
These are men, whose hearts and imaginations
seem to have been so dependent on each other,
that I could easily conceive excess of misery might
have driven them to madness.
But the cavalier S  was not content with
admiring only, he added the picture to his
collection
;
nor did he stop there, for he was one who
could not look at a work of genius without a
feeling
of kindness for its author; and Monaldi was
soon enabled, through his friendship and
munificence
,
to follow his own inclinations and give free
scope to his powers.
By the aid of this generous friend, added to his
own persevering industry, Monaldi's works, and
consequently his fame, were soon spread
throughout
Italy; wealth and distinction followed of
course; and, to complete his triumph, he was
finally honored with a special commission from the
pope himself. In short, no artist since the time
of Raffaelle ever drew after him such a train of
admirers. But with all this incense the head and
heart of Monaldi remained the same; it could not
soil the pure simplicity of his character; he was
still the same gentle, unassuming being.
CHAPTER II.
When
the friends parted, Maldura, whose course
in life had long been predetermined, set out for
Tuscany. His patrimony having placed him above
the necessity of laboring for his subsistence, he
had chosen the profession of letters: and he now
selected Florence as the place most eligible for the
display of his powers, and where, if not the most
easy, it would at least be the most honorable to
realize the future object of his ambition  the fame
of a Poet. But, unlike his friend, Maldura could
not find his chief reward in the pleasure of his
pursuit; he did not love his art for its own sake, as
the spontaneous growth of his proper nature, but
rather for its contingent fruit in the applause of
others.
That his reputation finally fell so far short of the
measure of his ambition, could not be imputed to
the want of early encouragement, much less to any
deficiency in himself of industry or confidence.
He had scarcely reached his twenty-third year,
when he was elected a member of the Della
Crusca
Academy. This premature honor seemed an
earnest of the speedy fulfilling of his hopes; and it
gave a lightness to his heart that persuaded him it
was overflowing with benevolence. It is difficult
for any man to believe this without, in some
degree
,
acting up to his faith, and the partial
testimony
of his actions producing the same conviction
in others. Maldura seldom received a compliment
on his talents without an accompanying tribute to
his virtues. But his reputation was still private;
for his conversation and friendly acts were
necessarily
confined to his personal acquaintance. He
had not as yet become the talk of the public; had
heard no eager whispering as he walked the streets;
marked no pointing finger as he entered the
theatre
;
and at no conversazione, had the tingling
monosyllables, that's he, ever once met his ear.
But he consoled himself for this by anticipating
the
sensation
which his first work would not fail to
produce: this was a long and elaborate poem, in
which, it appeared to him, every established rule
that could apply to his subject had been strictly
observed
.
The poem was at length published. Alas, who
that knows the heart of an author  of an aspiring
one  will need be told what were the feelings of
Maldura, when day after day, week after week
passed on, and still no tidings of his book. To
think it had failed was wormwood to his soul.
No, that was impossible. Still the suspense,
the uncertainty of its fate were insupportable. At
last, to relieve his distress, he fastened the blame
on his unfortunate publisher; though how he was
in fault he knew not. Full of this thought, he
was just sallying forth to vent his spleen on him,
when his servant announced the count Piccini.
Now, thought Maldura, I shall hear my
fate; and he was not mistaken; for the Count
was a kind of talking gazette. The poem was
soon introduced, and Piccini rattled on with all he
had heard of it: he had lately been piqued by
Maldura
,
and cared not to spare him.
After a few hollow professions of regard, and a
careless remark about the pain it gave him to
repeat
unpleasant things, Piccini proceeded to pour
them out one upon another with ruthless volubility.
Then, stopping as if to take breath, he continued,
I see you are surprised at all this; but indeed, my
friend, I cannot help thinking it principally owing
to your not having suppressed your name; for
your high reputation, it seems, had raised such
extravagant expectations as none but a first rate
genius could satisfy.
By which, observed Maldura, I am to
conclude
that my work has failed?
Why, no  ot exactly that; it has only not
been praised  that is, I mean in the way you
might have wished. But do not be depressed;
there's no knowing but the tide may yet turn in
your favor.
Then I suppose the book is hardly as yet
known?
I beg your pardon  quite the contrary.
When your friend the Marquis introduced it at his
last conversazione, every one present seemed quite
au fait
on it, at least, they all talked as if they had
read it.
Maldura bit his lips. Pray who were the
company
?
Oh, all your friends, I assure you:
Guattani, Martello, Pessuti, the mathematician,
Alfieri
,
Benuci, the Venetian Castelli, and the old
Ferrarese Carnesecchi: these were the principal,
but there were twenty others who had each
something
to say.
Maldura could not but perceive the malice of
this enumeration; but he checked his rising choler.
Well, said he, if I understand you, there was
but one opinion respecting my poem with all this
company?
Oh, by no means. Their opinions were as
various as their characters.
Well, Pessuti  what said he?
Why you know he's a mathematician, and
should not regard him. But yet, to do him
justice
,
he is a very nice critic, and not unskilled in
poetry.
Go on, sir, I can bear it.
Why then, it was Pessuti's opinion that the
poem had more learning than genius.
Proceed, sir.
Martello denied it both; but he, you know, is
a disappointed author. Guattani differed but little
from Pessuti as to its learning, but contended, that
you certainly showed great invention in your fable
which was like nothing that ever did, or could
happen. But I fear I annoy you.
Go on, I beg, sir.
The next who spoke was old Carnesecchi, who
confessed that he had no doubt he should have
been delighted with the poem, could he have taken
hold of it; but it was so
en regle,
and like a
hundred
others, that it put him in mind of what is
called a polished gentleman, who talks and bows,
and slips through a great crowd without leaving
any impression. Another person, whose name I
have forgotten, praised the versification, but
objected
to the thoughts.
Because they were absurd?
Oh, no, for the opposite reason  because
they had all been long ago known to be good.
Castelli thought that a bad reason; for his part,
he said, he liked them all the better for that  it
was like shaking hands with an old acquaintance
in every line. Another observed, that at least no
critical court could lawfully condemn them, as
they could each plead an
alibi
. Not an
alibi,
said
a third  but a
double;
so they should be burnt
for sorcery. With all my heart, said a fourth
but not the poor author, for he has certainly
satisfied
us that he is no conjurer.
Then Castelli  but, 'faith, I don't know how
to proceed.
You are over delicate, sir. Speak out, I pray
you.
Well, Benuci finished by the most extravagant
eulogy I ever heard.
Maldura took breath.
For he compared your hero to the Apollo
Belvedere
,
your heroine to the Venus de Medicis, and
your subordinate characters to the Diana, the
Hercules
,
the Antinuous, and twenty other celebrated
antiques; declared them all equally well wrought,
and beautiful  and like them too, equally cold,
hard, and motionless. In short, he maintained
that you were the boldest and most original poet
4
he had ever known; for none but a hardy genius,
who consulted nobody's taste but his own, would
have dared like you, to draw his animal life from
a statue-gallery, and his vegetable from a hortus
siccus.
Maldura's heart stiffened within him, but his
pride controlled him, and he masked his thoughts
with something like composure. Yet he dared
not trust himself to speak, but stood looking at
Piccini, as if waiting for him to go on. I believe
that's all, said the count, carelessly twirling his
hat, and rising to take leave.
Maldura roused himself, and, making an effort,
said, No, sir, there is one person whom you have
only named  Alfieri; what did he say?
Nothing! Piccini pronounced this word
with a graver tone than usual; it was his fiercest
bolt, and he knew that a show of feeling would
send it home. Then, after pausing a moment, he
hurried out of the room.
Maldura sunk back in his chair, and groaned in
the bitterness of his spirit. As for the wretches
who make a trade of sarcasm, and whose petty
self-interest would fatten on the misfortunes of a
rival, I can despise them; but Alfieri  the manly,
just Alfieri  to see me thus mangled, torn
piecemeal
before his eyes, and say
nothing!
Am I then
beneath his praise? Could he not find one little
spark of genius in me to kindle up his own, and
consume my base assassins? No  he saw them
pounce upon, and embowel me, and yet said
nothing.
Maldura closed his eyes to shut out the light of
day; but neither their lids, nor the darkness of
night could shut out from his mind the hateful
forms of his revilers. He saw them in their
assemblies
,
on the Corso, in the coffee-houses,
knotted
together like fiends, and making infernal mirth
with the shreds and scraps of his verses, while the
vulgar rabble, quitting their games of domino, and
grinning around, showed themselves but too happy
to have chanced there at the sport. In fine, there
are no visions of mortified ambition which did not
rise up before him. But they did not subdue his
pride. Yet it was near a week before he could
collect sufficient courage to stir abroad; nor did
he then venture till he had well settled the course
he meant to pursue, namely, to treat all his
acquaintance
still with civility; to appear as little
concerned about his failure as possible, well
knowing
that in proportion to his dejection would be the
triumph of his enemies; but to accept no favor,
and especially to have no
friend;
a resolution
which showed the true character of the man, who
could not endure even kindness, unless offered as
incense to his pride.
This artificial carriage had the desired effect.
It silenced the flippant, and almost disarmed the
malignant; while those of kinder natures saw in it
only additional motives for respect; indeed there
were some even generous enough to think better
of his genius for the good temper with which he
seemed to bear his disappointment. In short, so
quietly did he pass it off, that after a few months
no one thought, or appeared to think, of Maldura
as an unsuccessful author.
But it was scored in his heart, never to be
forgotten
,
and he longed for vengeance. To effect
this, however, he must first possess literary power;
and that he knew could be gained only by success
in writing.
But was he in a fit temper for poetry? There
are some minds to which such a blow would have
been death. Not such was Maldura's. He had
not lost his self-confidence; and was willing to
ascribe his failure to anything but his own
deficiency
;
to the jealousy of his rivals, to their
influence
over the many; to the general apathy to his
particular subject; nay, even to his originality, and
to the common fear of praising what is new: so
that instead of weakening, it tended rather to
strengthen his powers. He had two works on
hand, a satiric poem, and a tragedy; with the first
he could now go on con amore, having no lack of
wit, and being now surcharged with gall; and that
no one might suspect him as the author, he
determined
to go to Rome, and send it thence, under a
feigned name, to Florence.
The poem was soon finished, and sent from
Rome accordingly. About a month after, he
received
two letters, one bearing his assumed name
and the other his real one. He tore them open as
a hawk would a sparrow. Glancing at the
signature
of that in his own name, he read Piccini.
He was about to dash it to the ground when his
eye caught the following words: The whole
town rings with the praises of this unknown poet.
Every body talks of, and admires him; even
Benuci
commends, without a dash of irony.
Maldura
grinned with triumph. Wretch! said he,
crushing the letter, you know not that the man
whom you would wound with the praise of another
is himself that other. But the count Piccini shall
one day know the satirist better. The other
letter
was from his bookseller, informing him of the
rapid sale and complete success of his work, and
enclosing a complimentary sonnet from Castelli.
Though Maldura had fixed his eye upon a far
4*
higher mark then the reputation of a mere satirist,
which he held almost in disdain in comparison
with that to which his genius was entitled, at any
rate as insufficient for his ambition,  he was yet
for the present content to enjoy his triumph, and
it pleased him to regard it as an earnest of the
success of his tragedy.
CHAPTER III.
Maldura
was now comparatively gay of heart,
and mixed again with society. The reputation of
his learning procured him the same attentions in
Rome as in Florence; and as there had been no
outward change in him, he had no difficulty in
making acquaintance.
Among the most cordial of these new friends
was a distinguished advocate, a near relation of the
pope, of the name of Landi. He had taken a
particular
pleasure in Maldura's conversation, and had
often invited him to his house; but Maldura, with
the perverseness which now began to be the rule
of his conduct, had as often declined these
invitations
,
and for the very reason that would have
induced
another to accept them  because they
were really cordial. He was greedy of admirers,
but his growing habit of distrust shrunk from
intimacy
.
In a moment of caprice, however, he at
last went.
The advocate received his guest with great
heartiness, and introduced him to his daughter
with such encomiums as plainly marked him a
favorite.
It was impossible for any one to look upon
Rosalia
Landi with indifference. Her beauty was of
a kind which might be called universal  at least,
in effect, for it was difficult to determine whether
it were more striking or winning; whether it lay
more in the just proportion and harmony of her
features, or in the exquisite and ever-varying
expression
that played over them.
For the first time in his life Maldura's heart was
touched. Hitherto he had regarded woman merely
as belonging to the regular materials of poetry;
had examined and analyzed their charms, only to
class and describe them. Now he neither studied
nor thought of studying; he could only feel that
the object before him was lovely; and he felt too
with surprise that her beauty and mind, as they
each alternately won his admiration, each gave
him pain almost proportioned to his pleasure. For
a short time these contending emotions perplexed
him; but a glance into his heart explained all
she was the first woman with whose fate he had
ever felt a wish to unite his own. From that
moment
Maldura marked her for himself.
Yet, sudden as was his love, it was not wholly
unmixed. Wherever there is a ruling passion the
affections naturally become subordinate, and take
their color from that; they have no singleness of
feeling towards any object, and can have no
sympathy
with any except as it ministers to the
paramount
appetite. It was so with Maldura. The
beauty of Rosalia no sooner touched his heart than
it mounted to his brain. He saw her in fancy
gracing his future triumphs, and himself, through
her, the proud object of envy; then her father's
interest, his high connexions, and their influence,
all passed in array before him, to make straight
and easy the opening road of his ambition.
Every time Maldura repeated his visit the stronger
became these motives, and the more confirmed his
love, till at last, thus mingling with all his hopes of
distinction, the image of Rosalia took such hold on
his heart, that he could never think of the one
without calling up the other.
A few weeks after, Maldura waited on the
advocate
to solicit permission to address his
daughter
.
It was readily granted, and in the most
flattering
manner. Landi added, that he should
have his good word, but for the result he must
refer him to his child.
However sagacious in other things, there is
generally in proud men a remarkable obtuseness
as to matters of the heart which often leads them
astray where they feel most confident; their habit of
looking at every thing through the misty medium
of self-love, prevents their distinguishing those
minute degrees of good will, esteem, respect, and
so on to exclusive preference, with which a
delicate
woman graduates her manner towards those
of the other sex. But that which obscures the
distinctive shades of objects enlarges their outlines;
hence little attentions are easily mistaken for
something
more, and, where often repeated, their bare
accumulation soon grows to what is mistaken for
love. Maldura was troubled with no doubts about
the issue of his suit: how it terminated may be
gathered from a part of a conversation between
Rosalia and her father.
So far, Rosalia, said her father, you have
answered well; you have done Maldura justice.
But why stop with his talents? can you find
nothing
more to commend?
Rosalia still continued silent.
You surely cannot object to his person?
Certainly not; I have rarely seen one so
handsome
.
Perhaps you dislike his manners?
On the contrary, I think them uncommonly
agreeable: his address, too, is even more than
polished, 't is refined; and his powers of
entertaining
I believe are entirely his own.
Very well! Go on, my dear.  Nay, why
again silent? I fear  say  have you heard any
thing against his morals?
Nothing.
Or do you object to his disposition?
I know nothing of his disposition, and cannot
therefore form any opinion of it.
Have a care, Rosalia; there is no species of
detraction more hard and cutting than an icy
negative
.
My dear father, for worlds I would not think
evil  if I could help it.
Then you cannot help thinking ill of his
disposition
?
I did not say so. I am willing to believe it
good till I have proof to the contrary.
As yet?
Not a shadow of one.
Then I am satisfied; for I believe it to be
generous and noble. And I believe, also, that my
child is too just to harbor any degree of dislike
without cause.
Rosalia bowed in assent.
Landi proceeded: Well, then, since you
highly approve of most of his qualities, and object
to none, what prevents my dear daughter  Do
not be alarmed, Rosalia, I am a father, not a
tyrant
.
I am, besides, now an old man, and have
no other hold on the world but in you; and in
guarding you from ill, and leading you to good, I
am only consulting my own happiness.
Dearest father! said Rosalia, I know, I
feel your goodness; you have ever been the best
of parents; and I should think myself unworthy
any blessing could I wilfully cause you a moment's
pain.
I believe it, Rosalia. Neither should I think
better of myself were I disposed to enforce my
own will at the expense of your quiet.  Now that
we understand each other, let me speak plainly.
Signor Maldura has this morning asked permission
to address you. I will not trouble you by
repeating
my opinion of his merits; you already know
it, and know that it could not well be higher.
Need I say after this that it would please me to
call him my son?  that I think him, of all the
men I have known, the
very
man to make my
daughter happy?  Will you not speak, Rosalia?
Oh, father! cried Rosalia, throwing her
arms round his neck.
Be calm, my child. Let us be rational.
Landi led her to a chair, and taking a seat by
her, continued: I know, my dear Rosalia  at
least I think I know, the cause of your reluctance.
You have a tincture of romance in you, which is
natural enough at your age; and you have formed,
I doubt not, certain peculiar notions of love, which
you hope one day to realize. You have now just
glanced into your heart, and have found in it (as
is very probable) nothing like them. I should
have been surprised if you had; for a real lover is
not half so accommodating as one of the brain.
But the shadows of a youthful imagination pass
away with youth. Then comes a sense of the
substantial and real; and with it a wondering that
we could ever have rejected even the humblest
every-day qualities of the heart and understanding
for these brilliant nothings. It may seem hard to
ask you, who are yet young, to choose between
them. But if I ask it, it is not to give up even
your fancies for any commonplace reality. The
qualities of Maldura are as rare as real. And if he
has not yet thrilled you with any of those tender
emotions  those pleasing pains  which your
imagination may have taught you to associate with
love, do not therefore think him the less fitted to
make you happy. Had he even inspired them,
they could not last; a few months, or a few weeks,
would bring them to an end. Not so will it be
5
with the qualities he now offers for your regard;
and not so would you find it, when courted and
honored as the wife of the first genius of the
age.
My dear father, said Rosalia, I would that
I could reason on this subject, but  indeed I
cannot.
Strange! You hint not even an objection, and
yet  Do you think I overrate him?
No; he deserves all you say of him; but yet
You would still reject him?
Rosalia was silent.
If you esteem, you may certainly love; nay,
it will follow of course.
Did you
always
think so, sir?
Perhaps not. When I was young, I was no
doubt fanciful, like others.
And yet you did not marry till past thirty.
Well, child?
My mother died when I was too young to
know her; but I have heard her character so often
from yourself and others, that I have it now as
fresh before me as if she had never been taken
from us. Was she not mild and gentle?
As the dew of heaven.
And her mind?
The seat of every grace and virtue.
And her person too was beautiful?
Except yourself, I have never seen a creature
so lovely.
And did she make you a
good
wife?
Landi turned pale. Rosalia  my child
why remind me, by these cruel questions, of a loss
which the whole world cannot repair?
She was then all you wished; and yet I have
heard that yours was a
love-match
.
No more, cried Landi, averting his face.
You have conquered.
Rosalia pressed his hand to her lips.
No, my child, said her father, after a few
minutes, though my head is old, I find that my
heart is still young as ever. I will not tempt you
to a lukewarm vow: you are a living counterpart
of her who would have rejected a monarch for
your father  like her, too, you shall choose
according
to the impulse of your own pure heart.
Landi, wishing to save his friend pain, lost no
time in communicating the result of this
conference
.
When Maldura heard it he stood for a
moment like one suddenly waked from sleep,
doubting if the words, which still echoed in his
ears, were really those of another person, or the
mere coinage of his brain. But it was only for a
moment; the compassionate tone of Landi, his
look of sympathy, and the tremulous pressure of
his hand, soon convinced him of their reality. Yet
even then he doubted; not that he had heard
them, but of their truth; he doubted Landi's
sincerity
,
and thought it a contrivance to rid himself
decently of the connexion. This suspicion brought
the whole man into his face; but he constrained
himself to be civil, whilst he persisted in refusing
to take any denial but from the lady herself.
Landi, finding it in vain to remonstrate, at last
consented that Maldura should wait on Rosalia the
next morning.  The interview was short and
decisive
.
But never was refusal uttered with more
gentleness and delicacy. And never did rejected
lover hear his own merits more eloquently set forth
than did Maldura, even when the lips of Rosalia
pronounced his doom. Blame not my will, she
concluded, but  if any thing  my heart, that
knows no control but from its own wayward
fancies.
The character of Rosalia was of that nice
mixture
of softness and firmness which makes the
perfection
of woman. The first she derived from
nature
;
the last was the result of principle; and
while from the one she was open to every
impression
of the affections, the regular watchfulness of
the other effectually guarded her from all that
would not stand its scrutiny. This moral
subordination
,
or rather just balance between sense and
sensibility, not unfrequently subjected her, with
superficial observers, to the imputation of coldness.
But hers was the coldness of her better judgment,
only occasional, and always with a purpose. When
her heart was opened, and with the sanction of her
principles, the whole woman gave way at once.
It was, no doubt, the consciousness of her
disposition
to this prodigal self-abandonment of the
heart that first led her to seek a less fallacious
guide than her own sanguine impulses. Happily
her father's instructions here came to her aid; and
as Landi was a man of sincere piety, it may
readily be inferred that the guide she found in
them was religion. Hence that high standard of
excellence by which she was accustomed to
measure
all that approached her.
5*
CHAPTER IV.
Had
Maldura loved Rosalia Landi for herself, the
manner in which she had rejected him would have
exalted her still more in his estimation. But with
the loss of her person came a blight on his hopes
of distinction. Though he still felt the same
confidence
in his own powers, yet he could not bear
to forego all those advantages which he had so
long counted on from his union with Rosalia; and
he hated her as one who had scattered a glorious
vision of ambition which her sorcery had called
up as if but to mock him. But, whatever his
rage, or hopes of revenge, the fortune of his
tragedy
,
which was now on its way to Florence,
soon drove her from his mind. He had laid out
his whole strength on this performance, sparing
neither time nor labor, and giving to it the highest
finish; so that when he sent it he felt that he had
done his best, and that should it fail it would be
from some fatality which he could not control: it
was his last stake, and he was willing to rest his
all upon it; for the more he considered it, whether
in the whole or in parts, the better he was satisfied
that it could not fail.
The success of his satire immediately procured
the tragedy a good reception at the theatre; it
was already announced for representation, and
Maldura had only to wait for the decision of the
public. He did not wait long; the fate of the
play soon reached him: it had fallen dead on the
boards the first night. So wrote the manager.
This was an unlooked-for blow; and he sat for
near an hour gazing upon the manager's letter, as
if endeavoring to recall, he knew not what; for
its purport was gone ere hardly known. But his
recollection soon returned. Better had it not, than
so to make visible the utter desolation within him
to show him a mind without home or object;
for he could look neither back nor forward. If he
looked to the future, in place of the splendid visions
that once rose like a mirage, he beheld a desert;
if he turned to the past, his laborious realities, once
seeming so gorgeous, now left without purpose,
only cumbered the ground with their heavy ruins.
In this hopeless state, however, there was one
comforter which never deserted him  his
indomitable
pride; it was this sustained him. Had a
shadow of self-distrust but crossed Maldura for a
moment, it might have darkened to insanity; but
no doubts of his genius had ever entered his mind;
he was therefore an ill-used man, and he hated the
world which had thus withheld his just rights.
His only solace now, was in the wretched resource
of the misanthrope, in that childish revenge which,
in the folly of his anger, he imagines himself
taking on the world, by foregoing its kindnesses;
for there is small difference between a thorough
misanthrope and a sullen child; indeed their
illogical
wrath generally takes the same course in
both, namely, to retort an injury by spiting
themselves
.
For the full indulgence of this miserable
temper, he retired to an unfrequented part of the
city, and, rarely venturing out except at night,
it was generally concluded that he had quitted
Rome  where he was soon forgotten.
CHAPTER V.
It
was about two years after the events recorded
in the preceding chapter, that Monaldi arrived in
Rome; where his reception was such as might
have amply satisfied him, had he been far more
ambitious of popular admiration. To say,
however
,
that he was wholly insensible to praise, would
not be true; so far as he believed it an expression
of sympathy, it was justly valued, nay, it was then
most dear to him as one of the graces of our
social
nature; nor did he affect an indifference to
that posthumous sympathy with excellence  that
purest form of fame to which so many noble
minds, under poverty and neglect, have patiently
looked  and looked, alas, for their only reward.
Yet the love of fame was less a passion with
Monaldi
than the result of a sober law of his mind,
which won his obedience, because it carried with
it the assurance of an enduring nature. But he
had no craving for distinction, much less for
notoriety
,
or what is popularly called reputation;
indeed
,
he had passed over the graves of too many
buried reputations not to have learned how their
common tenure, the fashion of one age is valued
by another.
With such an artist it cannot be supposed that
a mere adulator of his name could have found
much favor, nor, when it is added that Monaldi's
was one of those kindly natures to which the duty
of repelling is at all times painful, will it be thought
singular that a person of this description should
have been to him an object of especial annoyance.
It was to escape from one of these unmeaning
flatterers
,
who seldom failed to fasten upon him
whenever
they met, that Monaldi one day turned into a
gateway in an obscure street, where one of his
figure was rarely seen. The passage leading from
it was somewhat dark, and he hoped to conceal
himself there till his persecutor had passed, when
he observed a person from within coming towards
him. The awkwardness of his situation obliged
him either to retreat, or to explain it, and he spoke.
Your pardon, Signor  I pray you excuse this
intrusion. The stranger started. Nay, added
Monaldi, it will be but for a moment. In truth
I am an unlucky artist, who would merely avoid
a troublesome acquaintance.
Begone! said the stranger.
Good heaven! cried Monaldi, sure that
voice  But the stranger had disappeared.
It is  it must be, said he, and without
further
thought he entered the court. They were now
under the open sky. The stranger stopped,
and Monaldi beheld his long lost friend.
Maldura!  was all his full heart could utter.
Maldura spoke not a word; but he suffered his
hand to remain passively within the grasp of his
friend.
I see 't is with you as myself, said Monaldi
at last. But how can words add to the joy of
this meeting?
Words!  True  they are idle. Maldura
was no hypocrite, and his manly spirit revolted at
expressing what he did not feel  and what he
felt his heart was not yet hard enough to utter.
Yet something must be said  and that neither
unkind nor hollow. You look well, Monaldi;
even better than when we parted at Bologna.
That's a long time  very long, said
Monaldi
.
Yet, long as it is, I need hardly tell Maldura
that I could not recall many days when he has
been out of my mind  especially since I lost
trace of you. But where have you been all this
while? you know not how many ill bodings I have
had on account of your strange disappearance
no letters  no clue  sometimes I thought you
might have embarked for Spain  as you once
talked of doing  and been shipwrecked; then in
a more cheerful mood, I would suppose you
voluntarily
banished to some quiet solitude, that you
might give your whole mind to some great work
for I remembered your favorite maxim, that the
sacrifice of a whole life were but a cheap price for
fame; then again my apprehensions would take
the worst conclusion  that you had been robbed
and murdered. Tell me, where have you been?
what have you been doing?
'T is of little consequence, replied Maldura.
The past is past  and the wisdom of Solomon
could not make it better or worse: let it rest
then.
Nay, I would not ask you to recall what might
give you pain, deeply as I am interested.
I did not say it would give me pain  I said
it was useless.
I would know then no more than will give you
pleasure. So we will talk of what remains of the
past. Your active mind cannot have been idle,
and the world expects much of you.
The world! This was touching a galled
spot. Maldura's eyes flashed; but a smile of
fiercer scorn succeeded? We will talk of the
world when it shall have become worth something
better than an idiot's slaver. But for ourselves
we shall be better in the house: 't is not a palace,
as you see  but 't will afford us shelter from the
sun.
You know I am not dainty, answered
Monaldi
.
Or if I were, the place would be the last
thing I should think of at this time.
I was not apologizing for it, said Maldura,
somewhat proudly, the knaves and fools that live
in palaces might reconcile a wise man to one much
worse.
Maldura's mind, said Monaldi  and he said
it in a tone that spoke anything but abatement of
his youthful reverence  such a mind would
dignify
any palace.
Maldura's heart softened in spite of himself.
He hated the world, but not its praise; and he led
the way into the house with less reluctance than
he had expected.
When the friends left school, they had engaged
to write to each other, and their correspondence
had continued with little interruption up to the
time of Maldura's first failure; when, from the
fear of betraying the secret misery occasioned by
that event, he discontinued it. Since then,
Monaldi
had never heard any tidings of his friend,
6
except that he had quitted Florence, but for what
part of the world, he could never learn. Maldura,
however, had long been apprized of all the other's
movements, his success, and fame; but the more
he heard of them, the less did he incline to renew
their intimacy; indeed the contrast which they
formed to his own situation was among the sorest
aggravations of his misery. Had it been a
stranger
any other man  so courted and followed,
he thought he could have borne it; but to find an
object of envy in his humble schoolfellow, on
whom he had once looked down, was a
degradation
which he could not forgive.
With feelings like these, it is not surprising that
Maldura forbore to seek out his friend; nor, when
accident had brought them together, and he
recognised
his voice in the gateway, that he should have
sought to avoid him. But his heart was not yet
entirely hardened, and his late interview with
Monaldi
had touched it. Yet so new seemed to him
the consciousness of any kind feeling, that it was
a considerable time after Monaldi's departure
before
he could realize what had passed; and then
he felt as if something had gone from him which
he hardly knew whether to regret or not. With
one thing, however, he was satisfied  that his
friend had conceived no suspicion of the change
in his heart; for, proud as he was, Maldura had
still a secret coveting of the esteem of others: so
that, upon the whole, he almost doubted if he
were sorry for the meeting. In fact, he was much
better pleased than he was willing to admit: for
however a misanthrope may pride himself on the
sovereignty of his hatred, as long as he continues
in this world, he can never so entirely destroy his
social nature but that some leaven of it will work
within him.
The intercourse thus renewed between the two
friends could not but differ in many respects from
that of their earlier years. Monaldi, however,
hailed it as a promise of many pleasures. His
affectionate disposition had long felt the want of a
friend; but his studious habits, added to his
natural
reserve, had hitherto prevented his forming any
second intimacy; and he now dwelt with delight
on the thought of pouring out his heart into the
bosom of his early friend. But he soon found
that Maldura was not that open, social being he
had once known, that he had become cold, absent
and gloomy: though the change grieved him and
repressed his confidence, it did not lessen his
attachment
;
and, ascribing it to some secret sorrow,
he imagined that his sympathy was more than ever
needed. His efforts, however, were in vain  the
same distant, taciturn demeanor continued to repel
every act of kindness.
It is the natural consequence of a fruitless
endeavor
to alleviate the afflictions of those who are
dear to us to become ourselves partakers of their
sufferings. And if the cause of our pain be not
hateful, we feel, or rather fancy that we shall feel,
relieved, the nearer we are to it. Monaldi's visits
to his friend, however, were seldom followed by
the effect he desired; being for the most part
passed in mutual silence, or in a few common
remarks
on indifferent topics.
It was after a morning of more than usual
depression
and concern on his account, that Monaldi
one day called on his unhappy friend. Maldura's
apathy seemed for the moment overcome; and he
could not help expressing surprise at such an
unwonted
visit; for it was scarcely past mid-day, and
he knew that nothing short of necessity could tempt
the devoted artist to leave his studio at that hour.
Monaldi simply replied, that he had felt indisposed
to work; and he drew a chair to a window. The
apartment being in an upper story, and the house
somewhat elevated, commanded an extensive view
of the southern portion of the city, overlooking the
Campo Vaccino, once the ancient forum, with its
surrounding ruins, and taking in a part of the
Coliseum. The air was hot and close, and there
was a thin yellow haze over the distance like that
which precedes the scirocco, but the nearer objects
were clear and distinct, and so bright that the eye
could hardly rest on them without quivering,
especially
on the modern buildings, with their huge
sweep of whited walls, and their red-tiled roofs,
that lay burning in the sun, while the sharp, black
shadows, which here and there seemed to indent
the dazzling masses, might almost have been
fancied
the cinder-tracks of his fire. The streets of
Rome, at no time very noisy, are for nothing more
remarkable than, during the summer months, for
their noontide stillness, the meridian heat being
frequently so intense as to stop all business,
driving
everything within doors, with the proverbial
exception of dogs and strangers. But even these
might scarcely have withstood the present
scorching
atmosphere. It was now high noon, and the
few straggling vine-dressers that were wont to stir
in this secluded quarter had already been driven
under shelter; not a vestige of life was to be seen,
not a bird on the wing, and so deep was the
stillness
that a solitary foot-fall might have filled the
whole air; neither was this stillness lessened by
the presence of the two friends  for nothing so
deepens silence as man at rest; they had both sat
6*
mutely gazing from the window, and apparently
unconscious of the lapse of time, till the bell of
a neighboring church warned them of it.
Yes, said Monaldi  as if the sound had
suddenly loosed his tongue  there
is
a chain
that runs through all things. How else should the
mind hear the echo of its workings from voiceless
rocks? Mysterious union! that our very lives
should seem but so many reflections from the face
of nature; and all about us but visible types of the
invisible man! Even the works of man, the
passive
combinations of his hand  they too have
found a tongue in the elements, and become
oracular
to his heart  even as that proud pile of
Titus, so dark and desolate within, now speaks
from without, in the gorgeous language of the sun,
to mine. Look, Maldura: here is to me a book
of history and prophecy. You see in that distant
mist the prefigurement of my future; for my
present
state you need but look beneath us  on this
oppressive splendor; but for the past  thank
heaven, that is still mine  the blessed past! how
soothingly it speaks to me in this humble shade!
Maldura's distorted vision saw nothing in this
but a covert sally of pride, and a half suppressed
sneer passed over his features; but his confiding
friend gave it a different name.
You seem incredulous  why should you doubt
that I look on the past with envy?
Some, answered Maldura, might think that
it needed at least faith; especially to believe it of
the favorite of popes and cardinals  for you look
back to obscurity.
But not
you,
Maldura. For you know that
that obscurity was happy  because those I loved
were happy; and because in them I had a true
home for all my wishes; for we build not for
ourselves
alone  at least anything that can satisfy,
or is worthy the heart; and mine was never
subordinate
to the head. Others, who remember
nothing of my youth but its reserve, might perhaps
doubt it; but not you. If I was reserved, you
well know it was neither from coldness or gloom;
but that I was so moulded by early and severe
misfortunes. I was left an orphan ere I hardly
knew the blessing of kindred. This was the first
misfortune. Then followed another. That my
scanty patrimony might be husbanded, I was
doomed to waste the first ten years of my life
amongst illiterate boors  though, to do them
justice, they were honest. And, though
unlettered
then myself, the thousand obscure longings, and
deep and anxious questionings, on what I saw
and felt, which everywhere haunted me, and which
no one could resolve or satisfy, soon discovered to
me that I had but little in common with those
about me; nay, the very expression of my thoughts
was often answered by a laugh, or by the
nicknames
of idiot and dreamer You cannot wonder
then that I shrunk into myself, nor that I at length
became indeed a dreamer; for my whole world
was within me, and would have been so now but
for one being  bless her memory. That being
was my sister.
Monaldi here appeared to be overcome by some
tender recollection; but after a moment's pause
he proceeded, as if in continuation of his thoughts.
No, it would be selfish to wish her back. You
remember her, Maldura?
The question seemed to rouse Maldura from his
abstraction, and he raised his eyes with a vacant
look. But, wishing to avoid an explanation, he
nodded in assent.
It was in my twelfth year that we met for the
first time since my infancy; for you may
remember
that she had been brought up by a distant
relation
at Modena. What a strange faculty is this
memory! I can see her now almost as distinctly
as if she were before me. She was only five years
older than myself, and yet when she kissed me and
looked upon me, it was with such a maternal look
and she inquired about my little concerns in a
tone so solicitous, so tender, that I could never
from that hour either think or speak of her but
with the veneration of a son.  Yes, continued
Monaldi, while the recollection seemed to give a
deeper fervor to his manner, it was she first
taught me that I had a heart  and too large for
self; who made it the companion, nay, controller,
of my intellect, giving it direction and purpose;
and it was her praise that made me long for fame;
for I felt that it would make her happy. But she
was taken from me before the world knew that
such a candidate for its praise was in being, or she
herself had anything to dwell on save the prophetic
visions which her sisterly love had travelled for into
the future. But it is right, all right  she is
happier
where she is. I need not name the other
being who came to supply her loss  nor how
kindly! Even now too I can see the stone seat in
our play-yard, at Bologna  that good seat!
associated
with so many nameless acts of kindness,
which no one can understand but an orphan boy;
and one as sensitive as desolate, and left to the
cold, boisterous gaiety of a public school. Yes,
Maldura, you alone in the wide world seemed to
feel for my loss; and in that you did so you
became
to me more than the world. I exulted in
your talents; I grew proud of the prizes you won;
and I looked to your future fame even with my
poor sister's eyes, when she looked to mine. Why
the last has not been realized I marvel  that such
a mind
Maldura ground his teeth.
Monaldi saw the change in his countenance, and
stopped: then added, If I have touched on what
is displeasing to you, forgive me. And yet it
cannot
be that the expression of a regret so natural
The less that is said of it the better, said
Maldura, with a bitter smile. As for yourself
you
have the world's trumpet. Keep it  I would
none of its blast; 't is made up of the breath of
fools, or it may be knaves. Keep it, then, and be
content. Good or bad, 't is yours, they say; and
will be, even when the grave shall have walled up
your ears.
No, Maldura  you have forgotten, or you
mistake, my heart, if you think that fame alone
can fill it. The very retrospect I have just made
is proof enough. Why else should I dwell on
scenes that are past, and quit the palpable present,
to commune with shadows? But I miscall them;
they are shadows only to my bodily eyes  to my
affections they are substance  in effect the truest,
so long as through the mysterious memory they
can give that thrilling play of life which present
realities deny. No; the solitude of neglect were
better borne than solitary grandeur. We are not
made to enjoy alone  least of all things fame;
't is a fierce splendor, that needs to be conducted
off by others; if it rest with ourselves, it becomes
a fire that, sooner or later, must shrivel up the
heart. Had I parent or kindred  could the grave
give me back such shares of my fame  but I will
not think of it. Or  would you, Maldura
Maldura started from his seat.
Again forgive me, said Monaldi, I ought
not so to obtrude my regrets upon you.
Maldura turned from him as if he would hear
no more; then, stopping awhile, said, You have
had your marvel; so too may I. If you count
fame nothing, why do you toil?
Because I could not be idle and live; and
because I love my art for its own sake. I should
still paint, had I the means, were I thrown on a
desolate island.
Yet you have one thing, which many in the
world would think included all  wealth; though
some indeed have called it trash  at least in
books.
And do
you
think so, Maldura? I know you
do not. Yet   the thought now glanced on
Monaldi that his friend might be suffering from
poverty; his face lighted up, and he grasped
Maldura's
hand.
What is it disturbs you? said Maldura, coldly
withdrawing his hand.
Disturb! oh no! I owe you a thousand thanks
for this discovery. How could I have been so
blind! This obscure retreat, these sorry lodgings,
speak it but too plainly.
Speak what? asked Maldura, in amazement.
Your secret. 'T is now mine.
The blood rushed to Maldura's forehead, and
he felt as if he could have annihilated himself,
Monaldi
,
and all who had ever known him.
And it has made me happy, added Monaldi;
for now I have something to live for.
The conclusion of this sentence relieved
Maldura
from the horror of his suspicion, but it left
him still perplexed for its meaning.
Monaldi continued. But why should I waste
time in useless words. You have unwittingly
betrayed
the cause of your distress, Maldura; and,
pardon me that I rejoice at it. You suffer from
the want of that trash with which fortune has
overwhelmed, nay, oppressed me. Let me then
put it to its right use, to the service of genius and
virtue; and where do these live purer and nobler
than in Maldura? Speak then, and say, that you
will allow me to call the moiety of it yours.
As Maldura listened, his face became of an
ashy paleness, his lips quivered, and his knees
shook. Pshaw! said he; and he instantly
recovered
himself.
Monaldi was about to repeat his offer, when,
suddenly turning upon him, Maldura gave him a
look  such a look  Monaldi felt as if it had
passed through him.
Nay, what's the matter? said Maldura,
while a half compunctious feeling brought the
blood back to his cheek.
Tell me, have I offended you, Maldura?
No. Though I do not jump at your offer,
you must not think it offends me; for, indeed, I
ought to  that is  I
do
thank you. But
Do not say that you decline it.
I must; for I am above want.
In spirit
Ay, and in purse too.
Then I will press you no further, said
Monaldi
.
A silence of several minutes followed.
I fear, said Maldura at last, I fear that I
have not appeared so sensible to your kindness as
I ought to be; but, I am rather unwell to-day
7
indeed hardly myself  you will therefore pardon
it.
Nay, returned Monaldi, if you
did
appear a
little proud of your independence, I ought not to
blame you: though you should not have thought
that your sharing
my
useless pelf would have made
you the less free.
But I
do
thank you. Will you not believe it?
I do, said Monaldi, from the bottom of my
soul.
Maldura grasped his hand, and, pausing a
moment
,
added, in a hollow voice, Monaldi! you
have indeed a noble heart; and you deserve
yes, you deserve  all you possess. He then
turned away and passed into another room.
Alas! thought Monaldi, as he walked
homeward
,
I fear his brain is unsettled. The thought
sunk into his heart, and seemed to fix his friend
there more firmly than ever.
I have
said
it! said Maldura when alone.
Yes, it went from me in spite of  Oh, that I
had bestowed that word, so justly merited, on any
other man. But I have said it; and, true  it
ought to have been said. Then, as if he would
flee from his thoughts, or, rather, return to his
wonted mood by a change of place, he snatched
up his hat, and hurried into the street; he had no
choice whither, but the half-formed wish led him
mechanically to the desolate baths of Caracalla.
These baths had long been his favorite haunt, for
there was something in their ruins he felt akin with
his fortunes, and he would often spend whole days
and nights there, sometimes sitting in their dark
recesses, and given up to misery, and sometimes
wandering to and fro, as if inhaling a kind of
savage
refreshment from walking over the wreck of
prouder piles than his own.
CHAPTER VI.
It
should have been mentioned, in a former part of
this narrative, that among the honors bestowed on
our artist, soon after his arrival in Rome, was the
title of principal painter to the pope; which was
immediately followed by an order for a series of
pictures for the pontifical palace at Monte Cavallo.
These works, which had occupied him for several
years, being now completed, so added to his fame,
that commissions flowed upon him from all
quarters
,
insomuch that he was obliged to decline many
from other distinguished personages both at home
and abroad. But there was one order which he
would have gladly declined for other reasons, yet,
coming from the pontiff, it was a virtual command,
and he was fain to accept it, though with more
reluctance than the world might believe of one so
flattered: this was a
companion
picture to a
Madonna by Raffaelle. His notions were perhaps
peculiar; but we give them here as indicative of
his character.
He accepted the commission, he said, not
with the arrogant hope of producing a rival to the
picture of Raffaelle, but in grateful compliance
with the wishes of his patron. Besides, with a
just reverence for his art, he looked upon all
competition
as unworthy a true artist; nay, he even
doubted whether any one could command the
power of his own genius whilst his mind was under
the influence of so vulgar a motive. For what,
he would say, is that which you call my genius,
but the love and perception of
excellence
the
twin power that incites and directs to successful
production? which can never coexist with the
desire
to diminish, or even to contend with, that in
another. It would be rather self-love, than a true
love of excellence, did I value it less in Raffaelle
than in myself. He might have added another
reason: that competition implying comparison,
and comparison a difference only of
degree,
could
not
really
exist between men of genius; since the
individualizing power by which we recognise
genius
,
or the originating faculty, must necessarily
mark their several productions by a difference in
kind
. But he needed not this deduction of the
understanding; his own lofty impulses placed him
on surer ground.
7*
Having accepted the commission, however, it
was necessary that he should see the picture which
he was expected to equal; he accordingly waited
on the gentleman to whose collection it belonged,
and was shown into his gallery. Though Monaldi
had heard much of this collection, he found that
report had for once fallen far short of the truth;
and the pleasure of such a surprise to him may be
imagined by those who have witnessed the effect
of unexpected excellence on a man of genius.
He had expected to see only a fine Raffaelle;
but he now found himself surrounded by the
master
spirits of Rome and Venice: they seemed to
bewilder him with delight, and he was wandering
from one to another, as if uncertain where to rest,
when, passing a door at the end of the gallery, his
eyes fell on an object to which every other
immediately
gave place. It was the form of a young
female who was leaning, or rather bending, over
the back of a chair, and reading. At first he saw
only its general loveliness, and he gazed on it as
on a more beautiful picture, till a slight movement
suddenly gave it a new character  if was the
quickening grace that gives life to symmetry.
There is a charm in life which no pencil can
reach  it thrilled him. But when he caught a
glimpse of the half-averted face, the pearly
forehead
,
gleaming through clusters of black, glossy
hair  the lustrous, intellectual line beneath, just
seen through the half-closed eyelids  the
tremulously-parted
lips, and the almost visible soul that
seemed to rush from them upon the page before
her  even the wonders of his art appeared like
idle mockeries. The eyes of the reader now turned
upon him. Still he continued to gaze, and to give
way to his new and undefined emotions, till the
thought of his intrusion suddenly crossed him, and
his face crimsoned. How far the embarrassment
may have been shared by Rosalia Landi (for she it
was) was hardly known to herself, as the entrance
of her father immediately restored her to her usual
self-possession.
It gives us no common pleasure, signor
Monaldi
,
said the Advocate, as he presented him to
his daughter, that we have this opportunity to
make some acknowledgment for the many happy
hours we owe to you. I may add, that I use the
epithet in no indefinite sense; for when is the
mind more innocent than while it loses itself in a
pure work of genius?  and mere freedom from
evil should be happiness: but your art effects
more  it unites innocence with pleasure.
We owe signor Monaldi much indeed, said
Rosalia, bowing.
Monaldi had none of that spurious modesty
which affects to shrink from praise when conscious
of deserving it; yet he could make no reply.
Without noticing his silence, Landi observed,
that, perhaps he ought to apologize for the length
of his absence. And yet, he added, turning to
the pictures, I cannot honestly say that I regret
it, since it has left signor Monaldi more at liberty
to form a fair opinion; for I am connoisseur
enough to know that the first impression of a
picture
is seldom aided by words  especially those
of a fond collector. The pictures I doubt not
have fared all the better without me.
They now stood before the Raffaelle, and the
Advocate waited for several minutes for his visiter
to speak; but Monaldi's thoughts had no
connection
with his senses; he saw nothing, though his
eyes were apparently fixed on the picture, but
the beautiful vision that still possessed his
imagination
.
Perhaps report may have overrated it, at
length said Landi, in something like a tone of
disappointment
.
Or probably, added Rosalia, observing the
blankness of his countenance, our favorite
Madonna
may not be one with signor Monaldi.
It is
your
favorite then? said Monaldi, with
a sudden change of expression. He had no time
to think of the abruptness of this question before
Rosalia replied,
And we had hoped too of yours; for it is
natural
to wish our opinions confirmed by those who
have a right to direct them.
Nay, said Monaldi, Raffaelle is one whom
criticism can affect but little either way. He
speaks to the heart, a part of us that never
mistakes
a meaning; and they who have one to
understand
should ask nothing in liking him but the
pleasure of sympathy.
And yet there are many technical beauties,
said the Advocate, which an unpractised eye
needs to have pointed out.
Yes  and faults too, answered Monaldi;
but his execution makes only a small part of
that by which he affects us. But had he even
the color of Titian, or the magic chiaro-scuro of
Correggio, they would scarcely add to that sentient
spirit with which our own communes. I have
certainly seen more beautiful faces; we sometimes
meet them in nature  faces to look at, and with
pleasure  but not to think of like this. Besides,
Raffaelle does more than make us think of him;
he makes us forget his deficiencies  or, rather,
supply them.
I think I understand you  when the heart is
touched, but a hint is enough, said Rosalia.
Ay, said the Advocate, smiling, 't is with
pictures as with life; only bribe that invisible
finisher
and we are sure to reach perfection.
However, since there is no other human way to
perfection of any kind, I do not see that it is
unwise
to allow the illusion  which certainly
elevates
us while it lasts; for we cannot have a sense
of the perfect, though imaginary, while we admit
ignoble thoughts.
This is a great admission for you, sir, said
Rosalia; 't is the best apology for romance I have
heard.
Is it? Well, child, then I have been romantic
myself without knowing it.  But the picture
before
us
I could not forget it if I would, interrupted
Monaldi, with excitement  that single-hearted,
that ineffable look of love! yet so pure and
passionless
so like what we may believe of the love
of angels. It seems as if I had never before
known the power of my art.
As he spoke, his eyes unconsciously wandered
to Rosalia.  The charm was there; and his art
was now as much indebted to the living presence
as a little before it had suffered from it.
If one may judge from his works, said
Rosalia
,
Raffaelle must have been a very amiable
man.
We have no reason to think otherwise,
answered
Monaldi. He at least,
knew how
to be
so: if he was not, his self-reproach must have
been no small punishment, if at all proportioned
to his exquisite perception of moral beauty. But
he was all you believe, according to the testimony
of his contemporaries, by whom he appears to
have been as much beloved as admired.
I could wish, said Rosalia, that tradition
had spared us either more or less of the great
author
of that Prophet;  they had turned to a
cartoon by Michael Angelo. They say he was
morose; and many affect to find in that the
reason
why he does not touch their hearts. Yet, I
know not how it is, whether he stirs the heart or
not, there is
a something
in his works that so
lifts one above our present world, or at least,
which so raises one above all ordinary emotions,
that I never quit the Sistine Chapel without
feeling
it impossible to believe any charge to his
discredit
.
Never believe it! said Monaldi with energy.
He had too great a soul  too rapt for an unkind
feeling. If he did not often sympathize with those
about him, it was because he had but little in
common
with them. Not that he had less of passion,
but more of the intellectual. His heart seems to
have been so sublimated by his imagination that
his too refined affections  I can almost believe
sought a higher sphere  even
that
in which the
forms of his pencil seem to have had their birth;
for they are neither men nor women  at least
like us that walk the earth  but rather of a race
which minds of a high order might call up when
they think of the inhabitants of the planet Saturn.
To some, perhaps, this may be jargon  but not
here
I venture to hope. Rosalia bowed.
Nay, the eloquent confession I have just heard
could not have been made had not the spell of
Michael Angelo been understood as well as felt.
You have assisted me to understand him
better
,
said Rosalia. And, if I do, perhaps I
might say, that he makes me think, instead of
feel. In other words, the effect is not mere
sensation
.
Monaldi answered her only by a look, but one
of such unmingled pleasure, as would have called
up a blush, had not a similar feeling prevented her
observing it. He felt as if he had been listening
to the echoes of his own mind.
Upon my word, Rosalia, said her father, I
did not know you were so much of a connoisseur;
't is quite new to me, I assure you.
Rosalia now blushed, for the compliment made
her sensible of her enthusiasm, which now
surprised
herself: she could not recollect that she had
ever before felt so much excited.
Nay, my dear, I am serious  and I need not
say how pleased. How you have escaped the
cant of the day I can't guess. 'T is now the
fashion to talk of Michael Angelo's extravagance,
of his want of truth, and
what not
as if truth
were only in what we have
seen!
This
matter-of-fact
philosophy has infected the age. Let the
artists look to it! They have already begun to
quarrel with the Apollo  because the skin wants
suppleness! But what is that?  a mere
mechanical
defect. Then they cavil at the form
those exquisite proportions. And where would be
his celestial lightness, his preternatural majesty
without them?  Signor Monaldi will forgive this
strain: perhaps, I should not hold it before an
artist.
I should be very sorry to have it believed,
answered Monaldi, that any artist could be
found  I mean worthy the name  who would
refuse to be instructed because the lesson does not
come from a professor. I, for one, shall always
8
be most happy to become a listener, especially
where, from the pledge given, I shall have so just
a hope of being enlightened. I am not used to
complimenting; and signor Landi will pardon
me if I add, that I respect my art too much to
affect a deference for any criticism  come whence
it may  which I know to be unsound; it is
founded in truth, and the professor degrades it
who palters with its principles.
Perhaps you overrate me, said the Advocate.
But, be that as it may, signor Monaldi cannot
do me a greater favor than in making me a
frequent
listener to himself.
Monaldi then took leave.
So gentle  yet so commanding! said
Landi
,
his eyes still resting on the door through which
his visiter had passed  even lofty  yet so
wholly free of pretence and affectation  not an
atom of either, but perfectly natural, even when
he talked of the people of Saturn. Did you
observe
how his face brightened then, as if he had
been actually familiar with them? I can almost
fancy that we have been talking with Raffaelle.
He has not disappointed you, I am sure.
No, replied Rosalia, on the contrary
She felt provoked with herself that she could say
nothing more.
I do not know, added the Advocate, that I
ever met with a young man who won upon me so
rapidly. But 't is an intellectual creature  rarely
to be met with.
CHAPTER VII.
With
men of very vivid imaginations it would
seem as if the greater charm were rather in the
shadow than the substance. At least, it is true
that they are often so well content with a pleasing
image as long to overlook in its object the
immediate
attraction, whether of mind or heart, which
first gave it interest; nor is it surprising that,
when it is contemplated in the enchanted
atmosphere
of
revery,
it should seem to possess a
satisfying
charm, to the exclusion, for the time, of all
consciousness of any personal relation to the living
original. It was in this peculiar atmosphere that
Monaldi's spirit was now reposing. Though he
could think of nothing with which the image of
Rosalia was not in some way or other blended, and
spent hours together in
re
beholding, and
re
hearing
every particular of their late-interview, yet he
never dreamed of asking wherefore. If he dwelt
on her beauty, her grace, her voice, they were
never referred to any wishes of his own; to
himself
they were as nothing; indeed his power of
reflection seemed for the time suspended; and he
yielded to their influence, feeling only their
presence
,
wrapt as it were, passive and listless, in some
delicious spell.
But this aimless revery had a nearer relation to
himself than he was then aware of; and the most
imaginative dreamer must awake at last. Though
availing himself of Landi's invitation, he had
already
several times met Rosalia, yet seeing her
only in her father's presence, their conversation
had been too general to lead to anything which
might betray to him the state of his heart. But
he was now to see her on a nearer view; being
invited to pass a musical evening at the Advocate's.
On entering the drawing room he found the
daughter
alone. This was so unexpected, that he hardly
knew whether to be pleased or not. Before he
entered the house he would have thought of such
a tete-a-tete with delight; for he had always
conversed
freely with Rosalia, and felt while talking
with her as if the charms of her discourse made
even his own more than usually eloquent, and he
had often wished that the pleasure of listening and
replying to her had been less interrupted by a third
person. But now that he was without such
interruption
,
he suddenly found that he had not a word
8*
at command. He felt as if something had
bewildered
him, but, instead of stopping to inquire
what, he began to make such violent efforts to feel
at ease that the palpitation of his heart became
almost audible, and he was fairly wishing himself
out of the house, when Landi made his
appearance
.
The relief which Monaldi felt at the
father's
entrance might now have explained the
mystery, had not his attention been diverted by
the Advocate's inquiries concerning the progress
of his picture. But he was not doomed to remain
long in ignorance.
Skill in music is so common in Italy that
Rosalia
hardly considered it an object of ambition; she
had studied it merely for her own gratification and
her father's amusement, and her execution, though
good, was far from being what a connoisseur
would call
brilliant;
but she had something
better
an exquisite voice, and the power of
enthralling
even the coldest hearer. Her power
consisted not in the mere expression of concords,
but in that science of the heart which no written
music can supply, in those delicate inflexions which
seem to imbue sound with life, conveying thought
and sentiment; and when to these was added the
accompaniment
of her face  the tremor of her
lips, and the scarcely perceptible elevation and
depression of the lids of her dark, steel-grey eyes,
following the movement through all its subtile
undulations  what unconscious lover could look
and listen,
still
unconscious?
In order that his guest might become acquainted
with her style, her father proposed her playing one
or two pieces alone, and she began with a passage
from Corelli.
Monaldi took his station behind her chair; but
a mirror back of the piano brought them face to
face. This circumstance was too common to
discompose
Rosalia, and she went through the piece
in her usual manner, except that once when she
caught his eye, she had, some how or other, skipped
a few notes.
To Monaldi, however, whose embarrassment had
been increasing with her performance, the
situation
became so uneasy that nothing but the fear of
appearing rude prevented his sitting down. But
when she began to sing that tender air from
Metastasio,
No, non vedrete mai
Cambiar gli affetti mici
and he beheld her devoted look, and heard her
impassioned tones, it seemed as if something
within him spoke  and all he felt, and
what
he
felt, rushed to his brain. I love her! said he
to himself  I love her!
Monaldi had scarcely made this discovery, when
he was called upon for his accompaniment. He
started, and taking up his violin, he began
hurrying
over the strings with such rapidity that Rosalia
was obliged to request a slower movement. Then
he became too slow, drawing out his notes as if
performing a requiem. A little quicker, said
Landi. Monaldi changed his time. It became
worse; neither quick, nor slow, but a mixture of
both, like the long and short gallop of a battle
piece.
Signor Monaldi! cried the Advocate.
Monaldi's
instrument fell from his hand.
The dead silence which followed this unlucky
crash brought Monaldi to himself, and the whole
train of his blunders came at once before him.
He felt his ears burn, and stood dumb with
confusion
.
Landi, seeing his distress, kindly endeavored
to laugh it off: but his efforts were in vain;
Monaldi
could not even make an attempt to rally;
the thought of having appeared ridiculous, and
appeared so before Rosalia had quite overcome
him. He remained for a moment irresolute; then
uttering a kind of half intelligible apology about
sudden indisposition, he made a hurried bow and
withdrew.
So, said Landi, as the door closed upon his
guest, I find we are left to finish the evening
tete-a-tete. Well, 't is no great hardship; 't is
not the first time I shall be indebted to you for
my evening's entertainment. Sit down, my dear,
and play me something from Pergolesi.
Rosalia obeyed.
What is it you are playing?
Your favorite.
Well, go on.
Rosalia continued, but her father listened in
vain; he could catch no sound like Pergolesi's.
He heard her through, however, with kindness
and patience, and then very considerately
recollected
that he had letters to write.
CHAPTER VIII.
There
is a certain region of the heart which may
well be called the sanctuary of every individual;
where even the humble and oppressed may (thank
heaven) claim a sovereignty; it is there too, where
the hopes and fears, and all that give a color to
the outward, may be said to dwell; and, though
in the pressure of crowds, where we can retire
unobserved, and feel ourselves distinct, intangible
alike  if such be our pleasure  both to friend
and foe.
Perhaps there is nothing more sedulously
guarded
than this secret recess in pure woman's heart:
there indeed it
is
a sanctuary  insomuch that, to
keep it inviolate, it would sometimes seem as if she
had closed it to herself. Hence it is that some
women may even love long before they are aware
of it. For in that place of mystery is born, if we
mistake not, a pure woman's love; and hence too
it may be, as if partaking of the nature of its
birth-place, that it is so long shadowy to the every
day eye  even so shadowy, as to be unconsciously
nursed, nay, to grow to maturity, and still continue
a shadow, till some magic accident  a word, a
look, the merest trifle  gives it a name and
substance
.
In some such wise was Monaldi's image allowed
to linger, and linger, in the heart of Rosalia, until,
from an undefined shadow, it gradually took shape,
and was quickened into life. Long before they
met she had seen, and admired his productions;
and when she saw the man, his noble countenance
and unassuming manners more than answered to
what she had imagined him.
Where our expectations have been highly
wrought, it is no small gain if we are not
disappointed
.
It was so in this instance; and Monaldi
had scarcely left her before she found that he had
risen in her opinion even as an artist. As they
became more acquainted she found in his mind
and heart all that she had ever imagined, or asked
for. Yet still she knew not that the image he
had left in her memory was anything to her but
a harmonious picture, which it was natural to
dwell on, and to dwell on with pleasure; not that
a transient feeling would not occasionally whisper
of something
more;
but the hints were vague, and
always sure to be repressed by a constant fear
of  she knew not what: absence indeed might
soon have quickened her apprehension; but she
saw the original almost daily; and there is no
saying
how long her self-ignorance might have
continued
had it not been for a trifling incident.
The more Monaldi dwelt on the mortifying
occurrence
of the unfortunate evening, the stronger
became his conviction that Rosalia could not but
regard him with something like contempt; and so
fully did this thought possess him, that near a
fortnight
elapsed before he had the courage to wish
to see her. But the wish once allowed overcame
his fears, and he hurried away to the Advocate's.
As he approached the scene of his last visit, the
recollection of his folly became too overpowering,
and he was on the point of turning back, when
the sound of Rosalia's voice again changed his
purpose. She was singing the well-remembered
air from Metastasio  and he heard again the
the same thrilling tones which had first revealed to
him the state of his heart  they now drew him
onward like a charmed thing. The touching
simplicity
with which the second stanza begins,
Quel cor, che vi donai,
Pi chieder non potrei
could not be heard with indifference even from a
less gifted voice than Rosalia's; but, given by her,
and with that look of love, which now more than
ever spoke from her eyes  it must have been felt
by the coldest heart. She had just ended the
second
line as Monaldi entered the drawing-room,
and their eyes a second time met in the mirror.
Had an apparition stood before her, the sight had
hardly been more startling. She felt as if her
conscious application of the words had been
actually
detected. Her voice died on her lips, and
her face became colorless as marble.
Good Heaven! Rosalia, you are ill! said
Monaldi, wholly forgetting himself in alarm.
It was the first time he had ever addressed her
so familiarly, and the blood now mounted like a
crimson cloud to her forehead. The quick-sighted
lover no longer thought of illness  but the
thought which followed made him almost doubt if
he were awake.
I will let my father know that you are here,
said Rosalia, rising; but she was unable to move.
But one moment, said Monaldi, taking her
hand, though hardly conscious that he did so.
Rosalia. She gently withdrew her hand. I
beg pardon, Signora I should have said. But why
affect a form, the bare utterance of which seems
to chill me? The time is come when I must use
9
it no more, or with a meaning still dearer. Yes
Rosalia, I will speak with that openness, which
your own ingenuous, your
direct
nature knows not
how to condemn  I love you.
For one minute Rosalia felt as if she would
willingly
have sunk into the earth. Her secret had
been betrayed  this confession assured her of it
and had been betrayed by
herself
.
'Tis all a dream then! said Monaldi, turning
away. But what a dream to awake from! Yet
how I torture her  she cannot say yes, and her
gentle nature shrinks from saying no. Rosalia,
again pardon me. I have but one word more, and
will no longer distress you; think no more of this
rash avowal  there is nothing due to it  't was
involuntary, and one, believe me, which I could
not have made in a moment of reflection  for
without hope  no, I should never then have had
the presumption to hope  forgive it then  and,
if you can, forget that I have dared to make so ill
a return for the notice with which you have but
too much honored me.
Rosalia attempted to speak, but her lips moved
without sound.
I ask no answer, continued Monaldi
mournfully
;
I deserve none  but rather  and let that
be my atonement  that I leave you, and forever.
No, no, said Rosalia in a voice hardly
audible
.
A moment of breathless silence followed,
while she caught at the back of a chair, as if it
could impart the strength which she needed to
proceed
;
but the sound of her own voice restored her
to herself.
Monaldi  your frankness
Can you forgive it?
I will do more, Monaldi, I will return it.
She held out her hand to him; but her strength
failed her, and he caught her on his bosom.
CHAPTER IX.
Within
a short lover's age Monaldi became a
husband; and his happiness would now have been
complete could he have felt assured that peace was
again restored to his friend. But Maldura had
long since disappeared, having left his lodgings
the day after Monaldi's offer; nor could the least
trace of him be discovered. Monaldi felt the
disappointment
the more, as he had now persuaded
himself that no melancholy, however wayward,
could long withstand the sympathy of his wife.
Maldura's absence was occasioned by a letter
from Sienna, announcing the death of a rich
relation
,
and calling him there to take possession of
his inheritance. A few years back this accession
of wealth would have filled him with joy. But
what is wealth to the crumbled hopes of
intellectual
ambition? It cannot rebuild them. Maldura
received the intelligence without the moving a
muscle. Though it gave no pain, it could give no
pleasure; for he was no sensualist; he had never
had but one vice  the lust of praise  which,
seated in his brain, seemed like a voracious reptile,
to swallow up every thought as soon as born, till,
bloated with overgorging, it had left no room for
the growth of another. To a vice like this money
was useless, except with a coxcomb. But Maldura
was no coxcomb; and he disdained to beg or
bribe  even for praise. Yet he notwithstanding
took possession of his fortune; there was no one
on earth whom he loved; and there was some
satisfaction
,
he thought, in possessing that which
many wanted; he was content to be rich because
others were poor.
Having arranged his affairs, he now began to
consider whither to direct his course. He had
quitted Rome, as he believed, forever, and Florence
was associated with too many bitter recollections
to be thought of again; but where to go he knew
not, for having no longer any object, there was
nothing to draw him to one place more than
another
.
In this state of indecision having one
evening strolled into a coffee house, a stranger
near him mentioned the name of Monaldi. He
thought he had schooled himself to hear it with
indifference; yet he leaned over his table towards
the speaker. The stranger was giving an account
to a person next him of Monaldi's marriage.
Maldura
9*
listened with little change of feeling till he
heard the name of Rosalia Landi. He could hear
no more, but starting up, rushed out of the house.
I go to Rome, said Maldura to his servant,
as soon as he reached home. To-night, sir!
exclaimed the man, staring. Yes, to-night
business calls me. Why, 't is almost dark, sir.
I want not your attendance, said Maldura,
impatiently
;
I go alone. Now see to my
portmanteau
,
and order a horse to the door. The
servant obeyed, and Maldura was soon on his
way.
It was enough, he thought, to have been rejected;
but to be rejected for one whom of all others he
most envied, and therefore most hated; to know
that the woman he had once loved, and the man
he had once almost despised, were now as one;
that they were prosperous and happy; that without
title, rank, almost without family, they were yet
objects of the public gaze, of public admiration;
and that go where he would, talk with whom he
would, he must hear forever of the painter
Monaldi
and his beautiful wife; to know all this  whilst
himself was unknown, miserable  drove him to
madness. He uttered no curse; he did not
weaken
by words the deadly purpose which lay at his
heart. What that was, he had not yet defined, in
any of its particulars, even to himself; yet he only
waited to mature it till he should find a proper
instrument to give it action; till then he was
contented
with brooding over its general form, and
steadily looking forward to its birth.
In this mood Maldura pursued his journey. He
had now reached Radicofani, and was slowly
moving
up the mountain, the reins given to his horse,
his eyes closed, and his thoughts busy about the
future, when a voice before him suddenly
commanded
him to stop. He raised his eyes, but, it
being after nightfall, he could only discern the
figure of a horseman standing in his path, and
presenting what he supposed to be a pistol.
Maldura was wholly unprepared for defence, for
he had quitted Sienna in too much haste, and was
too intent on the object of his journey to think of
providing himself with arms; besides, it is
doubtful
whether, in his present state of mind, he would
have taken the precaution, had it even occurred to
him.
Your purse, or your life, cried the stranger.
Take which you will, replied Maldura,
calmly
;
they are both to me worthless.
Your purse, then, said the robber.
Maldura deliberately handed him his purse.
Does that content you?
If it be gold, returned the other, weighing it
in his hand.
'T is all gold, I assure you.
Don't lie, friend, said the robber,  the
weight of your purse has saved you, whatever its
contents.
Maldura never uttered a lie to man breathing!
nor could the fear of such a man as Fialto extort
one from him. The robber started. I know
you, Count, added Maldura; that voice, which
has ruined so many women, was never heard to be
forgotten.
You know me, then? said the Count, after a
slight pause. Well, sir, you shall also know that
the count Fialto never leaves any witnesses against
him above ground.
Put down your weapon, said Maldura, coolly.
My life is nothing to me, as I have told you, nor
would it be were it prolonged to a century; but to
you
it may be worth something. In short, I need
your services, Count; and, more  I have
wherewith
to pay for them.
Is the devil in you, Maldura, in good sooth;
or are you only playing the part of one, like our
worthy friars at an
auto da f?
If you had said a hell, I should answer yes,
but I lack a devil.
And therefore apply to me?
Ay; you are the very one I have been wishing
for.
Thank you!  Well, I must needs be a very
patient devil to bear this.
Your patience has served you, Count, in worse
cases. Have not I seen your presence empty a
coffee house in ten minutes? Yet you avenged it
only by a curl of your lip  and wisely; for none
but a madman would have thought of disputing
tastes with a score of stilettos. No, you are not
the fool, Count, to hazard either life or interest for
a reputation past mending. I address you in your
vocation  and there's surely no wrong done in
adding the title.
You have certainly the prettiest way, answered
Fialto, of persuading a man to sign himself rascal.
But words are words! so it matters little by what
name I live. Now, my good fellow-caitiff, what
is your infernal errand?
In a word then, said Maldura, I have been
injured.
Proceed.
And would be revenged.
Well, what prevents you? Are all the
druggists
dead in Italy?
Pshaw! I want assistance.
Nay, I never stab or poison, except on my own
account.
I would have you do neither.
What then?
'T is a matter that requires considering; and I
would talk it over with you more at leisure, and in
a place less exposed. I do not like this parleying
in the dark; there may be ears about.
True, you talk like an adept; the grave is the
only place free of them. But dare you trust
yourself
with me?
With an hundred such.
'T is more than I would, observed Fialto
dryly. Well then, follow me.
Though the infamy of Fialto's character had
long excluded him from all sober society, his natural
and acquired endowments were yet too dazzling
not to obtain him a ready reception with the gay
and young; and there were some even among the
graver class, more nice perhaps in their taste than
their morals, who, attracted by the brilliancy and
extraordinary variety of his conversation,
scrupled
not to court his acquaintance in private when
their prudence would have made them ashamed to
acknowledge it in public. Among this latter
number
had been Maldura. But the fascination of
Fialto
was not confined to listeners of his own sex;
if his wit and eloquence made them content to be
swindled of their money, the uncommon beauty of
his person, and his insinuating manners gave him
no less advantage over the hearts of the women.
No woman, it was said, could withstand the
witchery
of his eye; and many a husband and father,
have often stolen home from the assembly where
chance threw him in their way, but too happy if
their wives and daughters had escaped it. But
among his many seductions, the most notorious,
and the one for which he was most dreaded, was
that of a Nun. Of this, however, he was only
suspected, for no proof of it appearing, even the
Holy Office was obliged to acquit him.
Maldura had often heard of Fialto's gallantries,
and of this among the number; whether they
were true or not he cared little; it was enough
that they were imputed to him, that he was
considered
a dangerous man; and when he added to
this character the certainty that the Count had
long since run through his fortune, that he had
been a gambler, a swindler, and was now become
a robber, he thought it impossible to find an
accomplice
better suited to his purpose.
Such were his thoughts when, entering a thick
wood, his companion desired him to dismount.
We must leave our horses here, said Fialto;
my habitation is not far off. They then struck
out of the wood, and began to ascend a wild and
barren country.
It was one of those still nights from which a
quiet heart seems to imbibe a peace more profound.
Not a breath of air was stirring, nor a cloud to be
seen; all nature seemed buried in slumber  all
but the wakeful eyes of heaven  while the fitful,
uncertain light they shed upon the grey rocks, that
here and there jutted up from the black hollows of
the mountain, appeared to give them an undulating
motion, as if sleep had softened them into life, and
they were heaving with breath. But the repose of
the scene touched not the turbulent hearts of the
travellers, seeming rather to wall them about, and
shutting them up from the external world, to give
freer play and bolder daring to the evil spirits
within. As Maldura looked out upon the
darkness
he felt as if it had compressed his soul to a
point, as if his whole being, once spread abroad,
modifying, and modified by, the surrounding
elements
,
were now suddenly gathered back, like the
rays of an extinguished lamp, and absorbed in one
black feeling of revenge. His libertine companion,
not less selfish, but more in humor with the world,
availed himself of his abstraction in maturing the
unfinished schemes which he hoped to turn to his
future profit and pleasure. They thus walked on
in silence, till winding up a narrow, broken path,
they stopped at the foot of a steep rock, forming
the base of a cliff.
Our journey is ended, said the Count; this
is my castle when my good friends in the world
become importunate. Then, taking a flageolet
from his pocket, he ran over a few wild notes,
when hearing the tinkling of a sheep-bell,
apparently
from a great distance, he stopped. I am
answered. All is safe. So saying, he led the
way to a cleft, overhung with bushes, about
midway
up the rock, the projections on its surface
serving for steps.
What folly is this? said Maldura.
Part those bushes, replied his companion.
He did so; and a door appearing, they entered
a cavern.
'T is he at last! cried a female voice.
Maldura
leaned forward to look at the speaker, but he
instantly drew back. She stood near the entrance
holding a lamp, and as the light fell upon her large
dark eyes, it gave them a brightness so fearfully
contrasting with her other livid, shrunk features,
that he thought he had never beheld so strange a
mixture of life and death.
Marcellina, said the Count.
10
It is he! she cried, recovering her breath.
Thank God! Then instantly closing her eyes
she added half to herself. But no  to Him
I am nothing to him now; and a visible tremor
ran over her limbs.
Tut! said Fialto. Well, Marcellina, and
how are you?
Alas, 't is a long time, said she
Since I have been here? I know it.
I thought you would never come.
Don't be foolish; I have brought you a visiter.
Have you anything to entertain him with?
Such as I have he is welcome to.
Well, whatever it is, Maldura I dare swear
needs no cardinal compound of pinochii and
truffles
to sauce it down, He's a poet; and those of
his tribe seldom feast, except on posthumous
dinners
with posterity. But I beg his laced cloak's
pardon; I see he has
cut
the chameleons  of
course now an ex-poet, for a fat purse makes but
lean verses.
Had Maldura wavered in his purpose this
accidental
allusion to his blasted hopes would soon
have fixed it. He affected to smile, but his face
darkened with vengeance.
What, ashamed of your trade, man? said
the Count, observing the change in his
countenance
.
Well, 't is the way of the world; we
never quarrel with what we are, but what we
have been;
and I can't say but even I might be
ashamed of dicing, could I once leave it off. As
it is, however, I'm content to think it a very pretty,
gentlemanlike vice. But I see you are impatient
so, we'll e'en to business.
Nay, but you will first tell me   said
Marcellina
,
making a timid attempt to detain her
companion
.
Come, come, said Fialto; we will talk
about our own affairs another time. My friend, I
dare say, is hungry; this keen air of the mountains
whets one's appetite confoundedly.
Marcellina sighed, and silently began to prepare
for supper.
The travellers in the mean time retired to an
inner apartment in order to confer on the subject
of their alliance. Maldura then stated his purpose
and the Count his conditions; at length, after
some discussion, the affair was arranged to their
mutual satisfaction.
Such is my plan, concluded Maldura; but
should you do more, and succeed so far as to
cause their separation, the sum shall be doubled.
Nay, if you wish it, replied Fialto, I will
even take her to myself.
No, said Maldura, force would only defeat
my object.
You mistake me: I mean with her own
consent
.
Impossible!
That's a word I never knew the meaning of.
Give me but a month
Never. Proud as you are, Count, and with
as much reason as you have to be so, there is yet
one woman in the world to whom all your arts,
were they ten times more seductive, would be as
nothing: that woman is Rosalia.
'Faith, you have touched my pride; for, do
you know, I'm a purity-fancier.
Hold!  you must not attempt her; for, as
you would certainly fail, she would as certainly
betray you to her husband. What then becomes
of his jealousy?
So, I am only to sin by implication?
She must not even hear your name, at least
as connected with hers; for she knows you  as
who does not?
Ay, I dare say she has heard that I carry a
rosary of broken hearts, strung like beads, about
my neck; and that I count them every night
before
a taper of brimstone, to keep good angels from
obstructing my hopeful course to  where certainly
I've no great inclination to push my fortune.
You certainly have the credit of a free chart.
The world does me too much honor! No, I
don't more than half deserve it.
Well, the half is enough to prevent any
decent
woman putting herself in your way.
Oh, if the painter's wife is
afraid
of me, she's
mine to a certainty.
I don't question your logic, Count, said
Maldura
,
with a half-suppressed sneer; yet you are
not, perhaps, aware that a virtuous woman might
avoid a libertine from other motives besides fear.
There may be such a thing as
antipathy
.
Umph! answered Fialto, drumming on the
hilt of his dagger. By the way, that's a very
pretty jewel on your finger.
'T is yours, said Maldura, taking off the ring
and presenting it.
By no means, said the Count, though
somewhat
hesitating; we are not on the
road
now.
Besides, you are my guest  I could not in honor
accept it.
Then wear it as a pledge of my good faith.
Well, as a pledge. But what if this Monaldi
should refuse to be jealous? For I have known
10*
husbands who never dream of a gallant till they
stumble over him.
I know him too well to doubt your success.
Wherever he fixes his affections there will be his
whole soul; and though not suspicious, yet will
her constant presence in his mind make him acutely
sensitive to the least breath that touches her.
Say no more; I see he is most happily
disposed
to be miserable.
Well, do we now understand each other?
Yes. But you have given such a description
of this paragon, that I dare not answer if
Fialto, said Maldura sternly, if you keep
not within the charter
What then? retorted the Count, fiercely.
I  hold the purse.
I bow before thee, most mighty wizard! That
little word would bind even Love, though he had
as many wings, and were as strong as a whirlwind.
Only repeat it when I become restiff, and you 'll
find me as docile as the pet-cat of an old maid.
Then we are agreed.
Agreed! Why, man, thou art a licensed
sorcerer
!
There is nothing on earth, bearing about
with it a full wit and an empty stomach, can
withstand
thee. Thou hast the true
charm,
to soften,
or harden hearts at pleasure; and if I obey thee
not, 't will only be because some mightier magician
shall have conjured me out of my appetite.
They now returned to Marcellina, and sat down
to supper.
But how is this, Marcellina? said Fialto;
this is the very flask of Montepulciano that I
brought you a month ago.
I reserved it for you, answered Marcellina.
That was foolish. You'll at least partake of
it now. She shook her head. Will you not
join us?
No, she replied; 't is enough   she would
have added, to see you   when a frown from
Fialto checked her. But he could not check the
language of her eyes. She had taken her seat at
a little distance opposite, and, watching every turn
of his countenance, seemed to hang upon it with a
fondness so intense and devoted  as if in her
whole mind there was but one thought  that of
the object before her. Yet there was a gloom in
her love which occasionally gave her an expression
almost awful.
Maldura had marked these looks, and the story
of the nun crossed his mind. He looked again,
and the more he examined her, the stronger
became
his suspicion that she was the person; for
though her form was wasted, her features shrunk
and wrinkled, and her hair prematurely gray, the
traces of their former beauty were still too visible
to leave a doubt that she had once been lovely.
Had any one but Maldura beheld this piteous
object, and then looked on her betrayer, and
surveyed
his elegant, yet muscular, limbs, his fresh
black hair, his smooth forehead, the cold sparkle of
his eye, the healthful color of his cheeks, the smile
that curled his lips, and the gaiety that danced like
a youthful spirit over the whole; and then thought
of his heart  the black life-spring of all this
seducing
beauty  he would have shrunk from him
with horror, and turned for relief even to his
wretched companion. But Maldura felt not the
contrast, or if he did it was only to confirm him in
the choice of his instrument.
Though Fialto scarcely looked towards
Marcellina
,
he could not help feeling that her gaze was
upon him, and willing to divert his mind from
certain
uneasy thoughts which that awakened, he
suddenly broke the silence into which their meal
had relapsed by inquiring, if Maldura had heard
anything lately of a certain Cagliostro?
Yes, answered Maldura; I am told he is
now figuring away in England.
He is certainly the cleverest scoundrel I ever
met with. But he is one of those unfortunate
geniuses who come into the world at the wrong
time; he should have been born two centuries
sooner, when he might have had half christendom
under his foot.
You knew him then?
I met him once in Madrid. What devil
carried
him there with his tricks I never could guess;
but it must have been Beelzebub himself that
carried
him out of it; for no other could have given
him safe conduct through the Inquisition.
Can nothing but the devil, asked Maldura,
fixing his eye on the Count  can only the devil
extricate a man thence? Fialto affected to
cough.
You
can tell, continued Maldura, for,
now I recollect, there was once a foolish story about
a nun
Marcellina uttered a shriek, and fell senseless.
For a moment Fialto stood like one stunned; then,
smothering a curse, he sprang to her assistance.
Maldura offered his services, but the Count waving
his hand, he prudently drew back.
Am I awake? said Marcellina, at length
recovering
.
I have had a frightful dream. Ah!
never could I live through such another. I thought,
dear Fialto, I thought
You must not speak, Marcellina, said the
Count; you are too weak  it hurts you.
But I must tell you this to relieve my mind.
Nay, you must not.
'T is only a few words  I thought that a
familiar of the Inquisition
Fialto ground his teeth with rage, yet fearing to
trust himself with speech, he made a sign for
Marcellina
to be silent; but she was too intent on
her own thoughts to observe him.
Where was I? she continued; oh, well
and the familiar I thought came into my cell
Peace! cried the Count in a voice of
thunder
.
Marcellina, you
know
me  I will never
forgive you if you refuse to obey me.
Then I should be cursed on earth too  you
are obeyed.
You must go to bed, said Fialto.
She assented by an inclination of her head; and
he was supporting her to her chamber, when she
caught a glimpse of Maldura.
There! there he is again! she screamed.
Fialto hurried her into the chamber, and closed
the door after him.
It is so! said Maldura to himself. He is
now in my power, and
shall
be faithful.
It was near an hour before Fialto returned.
How is she? asked Maldura.
Without answering the question, Fialto
continused
for some time to pace the cavern with his
arms folded; at length stopping and slowly raising
his eyes, Maldura, said he
Proceed, sir, quietly returned Maldura; for
he guessed the subject of Fialto's thoughts, and
was prepared.
What think you  of what has just passed?
Thoughts, Count, you know are free; they
come unbidden, and stay without leave; the mind
therefore  so it use them not  cannot be
answerable
for their birth or nature.
You are metaphysical, sir.
'T is my humor. This being true, he is but a
fool, should their nature be dangerous, who
willingly
betrays them to another.
I understand you, sir. But you should have
added, observed Fialto, half drawing his stiletto,
one trifling qualification  unless he find it his
interest
to betray them.
Your dagger, Count, said Maldura, would
waste its edge on me; for I should not care if you
had seduced a whole convent.
Fool to have brought him here! muttered
Fialto to himself.
Count Fialto, said Maldura, I am now in
your power. If you fear me, this is a most
convenient
place to bury your fears in. Fialto's hand
went to his dagger. If there be no other way to
secure your peace, strike! You will do more
you will rid me of a hateful existence.
Maldura, I will be plain with you, said Fialto.
You say right  you
are
in my power; and I
would bury my secret with your corpse on the spot
where you stand but that I know that men, good
or bad, never act without motive: and you can
have none to betray me  at least for the present.
Should you have hereafter, why, then, I shall need
no prompter; and my hand has never missed whom
my eye has marked. Then, take your life; not as
a gift for which I expect gratitude  I know you
too well to delude myself with any such
improbability
't is not in the heart which I have read
to-night  that frown is idle, sir  but I give it,
because I hold it of no moment to me.
The expression you were pleased to notice,
replied Maldura with the same composure, had a
deeper root than you can yet reach. You are free
to criticise my morals as you like, provided only I
be not bound in return to mend them by those of
my judge. But a truce to this. I will meet you,
Count, on your own ground, and with equal
plainness
.
Your secret with me is as with the dead.
My soul has no purpose save the one you know
no pleasure, no profit in anything which man could
name to me; what then should I gain by your
death? or the death of all the libertines in the
world?  Nothing. I should still be the same
the same human weed, fastened to the same spot,
and still hating its own rankness.
I
do
trust you, said the Count, extending his
hand. So, good night. You will find a pallet
in that recess.
11
CHAPTER X.
Nothing
more occurring, the confederates
proceeded
the next morning on their way to Rome,
taking care, however, always to separate when
they came to a town. According to this plan,
when they reached Viterbo, Maldura entered and
quitted it alone, and had proceeded some miles
before Fialto overtook him.
We are in luck, said the latter, as he rejoined
his companion, I have seen Monaldi; he was
pointed out to me as he was getting into a carriage
just as I entered the inn yard. It seems he is on
his way to Florence, to see to the putting up of
some picture he has painted for a church there.
So said the inn-keeper.
But his wife, interrupted Maldura
There was no lady with him. And he will be
absent a fortnight at least. Rare! eh?
Yes, said Maldura, if she remain at home.
A fortnight, did you say? That's time enough
Ay, for any woman to transfer her affections
at least in the calculation of a jealous husband.
Well sir, let us on.
On their arrival in Rome, Maldura took lodgings
in a part of the city remote from his former abode,
and where from its obscurity he thought he was
least likely to fall in with Monaldi, whom he was
determined to avoid unless some circumstance
should occur to render their meeting necessary.
Fialto established himself nearer the scene of
action
,
and began his operations by making it appear
as if he haunted the painter's dwelling; passing
and repassing it a dozen times a day; sometimes
stopping before it under one pretence or another,
then giving a side glance towards the windows,
and suddenly turning another way if any one
chanced to observe him, and sometimes curveting
to and fro for several minutes on a restiff horse,
and occasionally affecting to take something from
his pocket and throw it into the court. All this
was done to excite the attention of the neighbors;
nor was it long before it succeeded. The first
effect, however, was that of mere surprise to see
him so often in the same street; generally ending
with simple exclamations, as, Oh, here's
the
same gentleman,
or here he comes again!
Then they began to wonder what brought him
there. But when they remembered his frequent
glances at Monaldi's house, the mystery was
explained
;
the transition was but too natural from
the handsome cavalier to the painter's wife.
Such was the state of things when Monaldi
returned
.
His arrival was accordingly noted by his
neighbors with as many shrugs and winks as are
usual in similar cases. But there was one amongst
them to whom it seemed to afford particular
pleasure
;
for now, as he thought, was a fair opportunity
to give play to his resentment in many a good
fling
at the great man. This person, whom
Monaldi had unconsciously offended, was a worker
in mosaic, and kept a shop directly opposite him.
The cause of the offence was the negative one of
sometimes being silent when Romero expected to
be praised; not that Monaldi had ever denied him
praise when he thought it due, for he was too
conscientious
to withhold it even from an enemy, but
only that he had fallen short of the exhorbitant
measure which the other demanded; an injury
often more important than one that is positive, for
while the latter is bounded by its word or deed,
the former is limited only by the vanity of the
injured
.
Good morning, signor Monaldi, said Romero,
so, you have been a long journey. Ay, 't is
well
you are come back.
This speech would hardly have been noticed but
for its peculiar emphasis.
Well, sir? repeated Monaldi, why
well?
Oh, nothing  only  a man, you know, is
always better at home  especially
Sir.
Umph!  Don't it look like rain? Carluccio,
why don't you attend to the shop?
You were observing, said Monaldi.
Oh, nothing of consequence  at least to me,
replied Romero, closing his shop door. Good
day, sir; I must see to my customers.
'T is of a piece, thought Monaldi, with his
usual forwardness; he wants to talk and has
nothing
to say. And the speech and Romero
passed from his mind.
Nothing more occurred for several days, till one
morning, as Monaldi was going out, he saw a man
standing at the entrance of his gateway. As he
approached, the stranger suddenly drew his hat
over his eyes, and precipitately retreated; not
however
,
before the former had distinctly seen his face.
Monaldi quickened his pace in order to overtake
him, but on entering the street, the man was lost
in the crowd; and before he had time to form any
conjecture on the incident, his attention was
diverted
by a message from the pope, requiring his
attendance.
11*
But going the next day to a window which
overlooked
Romero's shop, he observed the same
person
standing at the door, and apparently
conversing
by signs with some one in his own house.
The recognition, even connected with such a
circumstance
,
might have passed off without a thought,
had not the stranger on catching his eye again
drawn his hat over his face and hastily entered the
shop. This last action gave an importance to the
other which he could not overlook. And for the
first time in his life, Monaldi became conscious of
suspicion; but of whom, or of what, he could not
tell. He felt that the stranger was somehow or
other connected with him or his household, and
the sensations excited by the thought became still
more painful from its being undefined.
Who the man was perplexed him. Yet might
it not be some one he had formerly known? No;
he could not recollect meeting him before the day
preceding. Who was he, then?  Perhaps
Romero
could inform him. But Romero was prying
and familiar; and should he ask the motive for the
inquiry  what answer could be given? No,
he would not question him. Yet the more he
thought of it, the more he felt inclined to apply to
him; but something  he knew not what  always
checked him.
In this mood he continued to pace the room for
a considerable time, when, going again to the
window
,
he saw the stranger come out of the shop,
and again make a sign as he thought, toward his
house. I
will
know who he is. But before he
had reached the street, the stranger was gone.
For near a fortnight after Monaldi observed the
same person almost daily hanging about the
neighborhood
,
and always betraying the same solicitude
to avoid him. Still no opportunity offered of
learning who he was. Wearied at length with
fruitless conjectures, and willing to divert his mind
with other thoughts, he was one evening prevailed
on to accompany his father-in-law, to see a new
opera. Rosalia had also been invited, but she
declined
on account of a headache.
They had been but a little while in the theatre,
when Landi directed Monaldi's attention to a box
opposite.
Do you observe that gay cavalier?
Which? asked Monaldi.
He that has just entered, with the embroidered
waistcoat.
Monaldi looked, and beheld the
Stranger
. Who
is he? he asked quickly.
'T is the notorious count Fialto.
Fialto! repeated Monaldi.
What makes you start so? said Landi.
N - nothing.
But you are ill?
No  not at all, answered Monaldi,
endeavoring
to assume a cheerful look  quite well, I
assure you.
I fear you labor too much, said Landi.
Perhaps so. But go on  you were speaking
of this Count.
I pointed him out to you, continued Landi,
because I think him an anomaly in physiognomy.
To look at his noble countenance, no one, ignorant
of his character, would for a moment suspect that
such a face could possibly belong to anything
vicious
;
and yet, were all the wickedness in this
house extracted from the hearts of each individual,
I verily believe it would fall short in the gross of
that in his.
You seem to know him?
Not personally. But his character is no secret.
There is no crime of which he is not capable.
I have heard as much.
But his deadliest sins are against those of the
other sex. The catalogue of his seductions would
appal any common libertine.
He seems indeed no common one.
Nay, his person, of itself, is a mere
subordinate
but a fine statue, on which many women
might gaze with impunity; 't is only when animated
by his master-mind  when his devil's heart rises
to his angel's tongue, that it becomes an object of
worship  fatal to the rash woman who shall then
dare to look and listen.
Monaldi knew not why, but he felt, while his
father-in-law was speaking, as if all his blood were
beating at his heart. But the opera was now
begun
,
and the exquisite tones of Crescentini soon
made him forget that there was such a being as
Fialto in the world.
The first act passed off without anything worth
noting, except that Monaldi's attention was again
drawn towards the opposite box by the entrance of
a person with a letter for Fialto, who, glancing
over it hastily, immediately withdrew; but this
excited no sensation in Monaldi except that of
pleasure in the other's absence, which left him at
ease to enjoy the remainder of the opera.
There are few cares which do not yield for a
time to the influence of fine music. Monaldi had
felt it, and he was returning homeward full of happy
thoughts, when arriving within a few paces of his
house, he perceived a person lurking about his
gateway. The impulse of the moment determined
him to stop; and being just then under a lamp
which hung before the image of a saint, he turned
his back towards it, and muffled his face in his
cloak. He had scarcely done so when the person
passed him. Monaldi was thunder-struck: there
could be no mistake  the light had fallen full on
the other's face  it was Fialto.
There is a little cloud often described by
travellers
,
and well known on the Indian seas, which at
first appears like a dark speck in the horizon; as
it rises its hue deepens, and its size increases; yet
the approach of it is gradual, and the air
meanwhile
is soft and motionless; but while the
inexperienced
mariner is perhaps regarding it as a mere
matter of curiosity, his sails unbent, and loosely
hanging to the masts  in the twinkling of an eye,
it seems to leap upon the ship  and, in a moment
more, sails, masts, and all, are swept by the board.
With like desolation did this little incident smite
the heart of Monaldi: he felt as if some sudden
calamity had laid his peace in ruins; yet he could
give it no distinct shape, nor even comprehend the
evil that would follow. He knew not with what,
or with whom to connect Fialto's visit; but that
Fialto had been in his house seemed almost beyond
doubt; he had not indeed seen him come out of
it  yet why was he hanging about it at this hour?
But how did this appear to concern himself?
He had scarcely asked the question, when twenty
circumstances occurred in answer; but chiefly by
the Count's uniform solicitude to avoid him; his
confusion when detected gazing at the house, his
disappearance from the theatre soon after
Monaldi's
entrance; his absence during the rest of the
evening, though it was a new play; and his sudden
reappearance in this place, and at such a time;
these were too evident in their bearing to allow of
any misapprehension, and Monaldi was forced to
admit that Fialto's purpose, whatever it was, had,
in some way or other, relation to himself. There
was an obscurity in this conclusion which
thickened
on his brain like an Egyptian darkness; not
a thought could pierce it; even the avenues to
conjecture were closed; he could only feel that he
was surrounded by a thing impenetrable, and he
had no resource but to wait till some further
circumstance
should give form and direction to his
undefined misgivings. Nor was he long without
one. The closing of a window above roused him
from his reverie. He looked up and saw a light
in his wife's chamber, and a female figure passing
from the window. Rosalia and Fialto now met in
his thoughts.
There is no act of the mind more abhorrent to
a delicate man than that of admitting a criminating
thought against an object once held sacred; and
should a hundred circumstances arise to disturb,
and excite him to suspicion, it will at first be
general
,
and fall anywhere, rather than on her he
loves; for though it is the connection of these
circumstances
with
her
which the mind
feels,
without
acknowledging  that makes his misery; it is
only when their direction is too plain to be
mistaken
that he suffers himself to perceive its object.
So was it with Monaldi: the devotedness of his
love had invested his wife with a charm which had
hitherto kept her name and her image far from the
troubled circle of his thoughts. But Fialto's
manner
the finding him so near his house  the
hour  the light in his own bed-chamber  the
female
at the window  were all too distinctly joined
in his mind, not to mark the object of suspicion.
The agony which followed was unutterable;  but
it could not continue long; for Monaldi was
naturally
confiding; then he revolted at injustice; and
to whom, if so, should he be unjust? The
question
drove him from self, to one infinitely dearer;
and his generous nature now pleaded for her with
all its energy. Did he not
know
her?  as well
yes, as well as himself. Her whole heart had
been open to him; he had seen it daily, from the
day of their union  and he had found it pure;
he was no dotard  intensely as he loved  and
he must have seen the stain had there
been one
no artifice, no hypocrisy could have hidden it so
long. And on what did he ground his suspicion?
On a coincidence which a hundred accidents might
innocently occasion. He almost hated himself
as the word occurred to him. He then
remembered
that he had left his wife unwell; and it was
very natural that she should retire to rest early;
indeed it would have been more strange if she
had waited his return. This last thought
reassured
him, and he entered the house. His
confidence
,
however, was hardly restored when a
contradictory
circumstance again staggered it; he
found his wife sitting in the very room where he
had left her. What, here! Has she then heard
me enter?  and comes she down now to make
me believe that she has passed the whole evening
here?
You are home early, observed Rosalia, I
hope you have been entertained.
Perhaps too early, replied Monaldi,
hesitating
,
and almost shuddering at the strangeness of
his own voice; you seem surprised. What if
I
should be so at finding you
here?
Me? Why so? Oh, I suppose you thought
my head-ache would have sent me to bed. But it
is quite gone off.
12
Indeed! and pray
who
has cured it?
The question seemed forced from him by
torture
,
and his utterance was so thick that Rosalia
asked what he said.
Your head ache. I asked
who
has cured it.
Oh, my old doctor  nature.
Rosalia! said Monaldi.
What? but what disturbs you?
Nay, what
should?
I am sure I know not.
If
you
know not  but I'm afraid you have
passed but a dull evening
alone.
Oh, no, I have been amusing myself  if it
may be called amusement to have one's flesh
creep  with Dante. I had just finished the
Inferno
as you came in.
As I came in? The Inferno, I must own,
seems hardly a book of entertainment for a lady's
bed-chamber.
I don't understand you.
Or will not.
Dear husband! said Rosalia, looking up with
surprise, and a feeling as yet new to her, you
talk in riddles.
Is it a riddle to ask why you should choose to
read in your chamber? For
there you were
when
I entered.
Who, I? No  I have not been up stairs this
evening.
A lie! groaned Monaldi, turning from her
with an agony that would not be suppressed.
Oh, misery! 't is then too  too
A maid servant at that instant came in to tell
her mistress that, as the night was damp, she had
shut her chamber windows, though without orders.
You have done well, said Rosalia.
Thank God! said Monaldi, as he heard
this explanation. Away  away forever,
infernal
thoughts!
Monaldi's emotion had not escaped his wife, but
the entrance of the servant prevented her hearing
his words. His altered expression now struck her.
Surely I have been dreaming, said Rosalia.
Of nothing bad, I hope, my love, said
Monaldi
,
now like another being, and gently drawing
her towards him; for your dreams  if that
dreams are pictures of the mind  should be like
those of angels.
I know not of what, answered Rosalia, but
it was something very painful. I thought you
seemed unhappy. Was it so?
Never was I less so than now. Less so! that's
a poor negative. No, my Rosalia, I feel a present,
a positive, tangible happiness, which gives the lie
to all who hold that we enjoy it only in the past
and future. My heart is full; so full, that I ask
nothing of time  of anything but thee  and to
hear thee, to look upon thee.
Oh, Monaldi, I am blest above women!
And dost thou think so?
At least I know not how I could be happier.
For what more could I ask, with such a husband?
Or I, with such a wife? Amen! with my
whole soul.
I have sometimes thought, said Rosalia, and
I hope without pride, that the very bad could not
know such bliss; nay, a love, like mine. For,
could I love thee so, pure and exalted as thou art,
did I love evil? I could not: I should then love
myself, and thee only as ministering to my
selfishness
.
No! the love I bear thee is but the
effluence
of thy virtues given back to thyself; and it
seems to elevate me; to refine my heart for the love
of Him who is purest, best  who is Goodness.
CHAPTER XI.
A Few
days after this, Monaldi received a message
from the worker in mosaic, requesting to speak
with him.
You will excuse my freedom, said Romero,
as Monaldi entered the shop, but I wished to
have your opinion of a work I have lately begun.
You may give me a hint, perhaps, that will be of
service. 'T is a miniature copy of that Magdalen
by Guido.
Monaldi examined the copy, and comparing it
with the original, commended the general fidelity,
but pointed out several parts which he thought
might be improved.
Romero thanked him with an air of pique, and
observed, I should not have troubled you for your
opinion, had not the work been for a friend of
yours  the count Fialto.
My
friend! said Monaldi, with some
surprise
the most  You are mistaken, sir;
I have no acquaintance with him.
12*
I beg pardon, replied Romero; but I
concluded
that he was so from seeing him come out
of your house.
My house! repeated Monaldi.
Or, perhaps 't was another person; for since
you
don't know him no doubt I was mistaken.
Indeed now, I rather wonder how I came to
suppose
him your friend; for the Count's character is
none of the best. But that's nothing to
me,
or he
should not be so free of my shop; for he comes
here three or four times a week to see how my
work gets on; in faith, so often, that, to say the
truth, had I a pretty daughter, or  a
wife,
I
should n't much relish it.
Monaldi looked up at the word
wife,
and saw a
meaning in Romero's eye not to be mistaken. But
the look was unnecessary; his shaft had already
reached the mark.
Well, I am much obliged to you, signor
Monaldi
,
concluded Romero, returning to his work,
and shall be careful in future how I call the Count
your
friend.
When Monaldi left the shop the houses seemed
to reel and the ground to bend beneath him. A
sickening faintness had come over him, and he felt
as if it were impossible to cross the street; but,
making an effort, he reached his gateway, and
leaned against it for support. His strength,
however
,
soon returned; sooner than his memory, for
it was some time before he could fix on the cause
of his agitation, only recollecting that some
dreadful
truth had suddenly glanced on his brain, and
as quickly vanished. But a slight incident will
often do more in recovering what is lost in the
mind than its most intense efforts. Rosalia was
singing a new polacca, which was then popular,
but of which Monaldi had often expressed his
dislike
.
It was the only instance in which their tastes
differed. This difference, at another time too
slight even to be noticed, now startled his
imagination
.
The hair-line which divided them now
opened to a frightful chasm. He turned for a
moment towards the court of his house, then,
pressing
his hand to his brain, rushed from the gate.
Whither he was going he knew not; yet it seemed
as if motion gave him the power of enduring what
he could not bear at rest; and he continued to
traverse street after street, till, quitting the city,
he had reached Ponte Molle, where, exhausted by
heat and fatigue, he was at length compelled to
stop.
It was one of those evenings never to be
forgotten
by a painter  but one too which must come
upon him in misery as a gorgeous mockery. The
sun was yet up, and resting on the highest peak
of a ridge of mountain-shaped clouds, that seemed
to make a part of the distance; suddenly he
disappeared
,
and the landscape was overspread with
a cold, lurid hue; then, as if molten in a furnace,
the fictitious mountains began to glow; in a
moment
more they tumbled asunder; in another he
was seen again, piercing their fragments, and
darting
his shafts to the remotest east, till, reaching the
horizon, he appeared to recall them, and with a
parting flash to wrap the whole heavens in flame.
Monaldi groaned aloud. No, thou art nothing
to me now, thou glorious sun  nothing. To me
thou art dead, buried  and forever,  in
her
darkness; her's, whose own glory once made me
to love thee; who clothed me with a brightness
even more than thine; who followed me like a
spirit, in sleep even, visiting my dreams, as if to
fill up the blank of night  to give a continuous
splendor to my existence. Oh, idiot, driveller! so
to cling to a shadow  a cheat of the senses!
What is she to me now? what can she ever be?
she that is  that ever was  He could
not utter the word.
A desolate vacancy now spread over him, and,
leaning over the bridge, he seemed to lose himself
in the deepening gloom of the scene, till the black
river that moved beneath him appeared almost a
part of his mind, and its imageless waters but the
visible current of his own dark thoughts.
But the mind unused to suffering has a difficulty
in admitting calamity not to be easily overcome;
one evidence is seldom enough; for though it may
perplex and torture for a time, the very sense of
pain will soon force the faculties to return to their
wonted action, to pursue again their plans of peace
and hope.
Misery was new to Monaldi; he had now
endured
it for more than two hours; and the intense
longing for relief brought on a reaction. No,
said he, starting up, some fiend has tempted me,
and I have mocked myself with monsters only in
my brain  she
is
pure
she must be!
CHAPTER XII.
By
the time Monaldi reached home, he had nearly
brought himself to believe that all he had suffered
was from mere delusion.
But he had scarcely crossed his threshold before
the violent beating of his heart warned him of a
relapse; and he had stopped, with his hand still
resting on the latch of the door of the anteroom,
to collect his thoughts, when his wife, who was
advancing on the other side, and mistaking him
for a servant, bade him come in.
Mercy! cried Rosalia, drawing back as he
entered, how you frightened me.
Her surprise at his sudden appearance, though
perfectly natural, instantly struck on the troubled
brain of her husband as the alarm of guilt, and the
worst thought  that perhaps he had supplanted
her gallant  now crossed him. Ay, said he,
with a tone of bitterness, 'tis even
I!
The change in his manner now really alarmed
her. Good heaven! Monaldi  what is the
matter?
I did not know, said Monaldi, his lip
quivering
as he spoke; I knew not till
this
day that I
could ever become an object of terror.
The look of wildness and misery with which
this was uttered struck to Rosalia's heart: she
could make no answer, but, throwing herself on
his neck, burst into tears. Monaldi shrunk from
her touch as from the coil of a serpent, and he
would have shaken her off had not an undefined
something in his memory restrained him.
Dearest husband  oh, speak to me! said
Rosalia, as soon as she could find words. Are
you ill?
No.
Then why do you look so? Has anything
happened?
Nothing.
Oh, do not say so; something must  or you
would not be thus.
How thus?
As you never were before.
True, I never  Pshaw  there's nothing the
matter; and I have told you I am very well.
Nothing!  this was the first instance of
reserve since their marriage. Rosalia felt its chill
as from an actual blast, and her arms
mechanically
dropped by her side. Ah, Monaldi! you
have yet to know your wife. And yet I ought
I
do
honor your motive; you would spare her pain.
But if you knew her heart, you would feel that
your unkindest act would be to deny her the
privilege
of sharing in your sufferings. Hitherto, up
to this sad moment, I have been the wife of your
joys; a twin being with you in happiness, sharing
with you the consciousness of a double existence;
for all your thoughts, your wishes, your emotions
were mine; and they were all joyous  all  up
to this hour. And can you think then so poorly
of my heart to suppose that for this accumulation
of life  into which, as I look back, almost an age
seems pressed  that for all this, which I owe to
you alone, it yearns not to make return? And
what is the heart's wealth but sympathy? Shall
mine become niggard in your distress? No,
Monaldi
;
the heart capable of knowing such felicity
in another's being must wither if it share not in
his woe as in his weal.
There is a certain tone  if once heard, and
heard in the hour of love  which even the tongue
that uttered it can never repeat, should its purpose
be false. Monaldi heard it now; there was no
resisting that breath from the heart; he felt its
truth as it were vibrating through him, and he
continued gazing on her till a sense of his injustice
flushed him with shame. For a moment he
covered
his face; then, turning gently towards her,
Rosalia, said he, in a softened accent  but his
emotion prevented his proceeding.
Speak, my dear husband, and tell me that you
think me not unworthy to be
one
with you in
sorrow
.
Oh, Monaldi, it seems as if there would
almost be pleasure in the pain endured with you!
But this I
know
and the conviction is wrought
into my nature  that my soul would not exchange
its community even of misery with thee for all of
pleasure or of joy which the world could give
without
thee.
My wife! thou art indeed my own! said
Monaldi, clasping her to his bosom. Oh, what
a face is this! how poor a veil would it be to any
thing evil. Falsehood could not hide there.
Then quitting her for a moment, he walked up
the room. I have read her every thought, said
he to himself; had they been pebbles at the
bottom
of a clear stream, they could not have been
more distinct. With such a face she cannot be
false. As he said this, an expression of joy
lighted
up his features, and he turned again to his wife.
There needed not a word to interpret his look;
13
she sprang forward, and his arms again opened to
receive her.
My own Monaldi! said the happy Rosalia.
Your own indeed! Oh, Rosalia, you know
not  you have never known, your whole power.
From the moment we first met, it seemed as if my
spirit had gone from me, and taken its abode in
thee; giving up every thought, every impulse to
be moulded according to thy will. And thou hast
made me happier, ay, and wiser, in the mingling
with thy pure nature; so happy, that I have
sometimes
almost doubted if I were not dreaming of
the future intercourse between the souls of the
blest.
Let me then, dear husband, continue to you
this happiness.
It lives, as it ever must, in thee.
Then let me lighten the present load that
weighs on your mind; let me share it with you,
as I have shared in your joys.
What load? Am I not happy?  Feel it,
said he, placing her hand on his heart; is it not
light?
Now. But
But what?
Your late distress.
Did I appear so much distressed? asked
Monaldi, while his conscience smote him for the
question.
You looked  oh, never may you look so
again.
Nay, 't was half your imagination.
Monaldi, said Rosalia gravely; I know you
too well: you
will not
say you had no cause for it.
He felt the rebuke, and a pang went to his
heart as the meditated falsehood rose to his tongue.
It was the first untruth he had ever deliberately
consented to. Yet how could he lay open what
had passed within him? It would make her
miserable
;
and himself  no, she would not hate,
but she must despise him. Yes, it must be,
said he to himself; it will at least spare her.
He then confessed that he had been a good deal
discomposed by a conversation with a brother
artist
,
from whom he had learnt certain facts
concerning
the baseness of a person in whom he had
once felt an interest; and that the shock, together
with his long walk, had been, as she had seen, too
much for him.
Such was the deception to which Monaldi's
unfortunate
situation now tempted him. He felt
degraded as he uttered it, and was about to excuse
himself from giving the particulars, when Rosalia,
by a timely interruption, saved him the
mortification
of further duplicity. No more, she said;
't is enough for me to know that calamity has
spared you. Besides, I have no woman's
curiosity
;
or, if I have, a friend's misdeed is best
buried
in silence; 't is a cause of sorrow into which a
wife even may not with delicacy pry.
He took her hand without making any answer.
One day back this sentiment would hardly have
struck him; it would have entered his mind only
as a part of the harmonious whole which made her
character; now it came contrasted with his own
dissimulation, and he thought, as he looked on her,
that he had never before felt the full majesty of
her soul.
The meaning of his eyes was felt at her heart,
and the blushing wife hid her face in his bosom;
for, whether maid or wife, a blush is the last grace
that forsakes a pure woman; 't is the abiding hue
with her nature; and never is it seen so truly
feminine as when, like hers, it reveals the
consciousness
of merited praise.
Their happiness now seemed complete, Monaldi
even doubting if he had ever been so blest; when
a loud ringing at the gate gave a sudden turn to
his thoughts. The sound, in spite of himself,
recalled the suspicion which had crossed him on
entering; for the alarm of his wife was still
unexplained
;
it had passed from him, but no sooner
did it return than a rapid revulsion took place in
his feelings. He moved away from her, and,
averting his face, rested his head upon his hands
against the mantlepiece. But the parting with
peace is hard; and he made an effort to retain it.
Might she not explain it to his satisfaction?
He looked at her as the question crossed his mind,
and his suspicion almost vanished. Yet he could
not but wish to know the cause of her alarm; he
should not else feel
sure
. And he again drew
near her.
Rosalia, said he.
What would you?
I was thinking  or rather, it just occurs to
me, that when I came in you appeared to be
expecting
some one. May I ask whom?
What, I? No. I expected nobody. You
know 't is not the hour for visiters.
And yet you seemed alarmed when I entered,
as if
What?
I were the wrong person.
Whom could I expect but you?
Nay, your exclamation showed that you did
not then think of me, said Monaldi, endeavoring
to assume a jocular air.
13*
True I did not, for the length of your absence
made me conclude that you were gone to St.
Luke's.
1
1.
The Roman Academy of Art.
I was going into the hall as you lifted
the latch; but as you did not come in, I supposed
it old Gieuseppe, who, you know, is somewhat
slow in his movements: so I spoke.
This explanation was too simple and natural
not to produce the desired effect. Monaldi felt its
truth, and his brow again became clear.
But why are you so curious? asked Rosalia.
Nay, don't put me to my trumps for whys
and wherefores, replied Monaldi, smiling. You
may place it to the account of idleness, which,
you know, generally speaks first and thinks
afterwards
.
A servant now entering, informed Monaldi that
the person who rang at the gate had inquired for
him; but, on being told he was at home, replied it
was no matter, and went away.
Suspicion seldom returns without increase of
poison, especially if it light on a cicatrized wound.
The report of the servant seemed instantly to
overthrow
all that Monaldi had just imagined too firm
to be shaken. What, ask for me, and go away
without seeing me! His evil star now mounted
the ascendant, and he immediately connected the
stranger's inquiry with his wife. Was it him,
then, she was expecting when I returned? It must
be so; and the inquiry  it no doubt means, can
she be
safely
seen  and
alone
.
Such were his thoughts when he turned from
the servant to Rosalia. The sternness of his eye
shocked her, and she sank back in her chair.
Can it be possible? said he to himself. But
I will sift it calmly. Then turning to the man,
he asked, What sort of person  was he a
gentleman
?
I believe so, was the answer.
You
believe!
Could you not see?
No, sir; his face was so muffled up, I could
not get a glimpse of it.
Ha!  Do you know, said Monaldi, still
addressing
the servant, but looking towards his wife,
do you know the count Fialto?
The man answered in the negative.
Fialto! repeated Rosalia, half audibly.
Monaldi caught the echo, and, dismissing the
domestic, stood before her for some time without
speaking. Ay, said he at length, Fialto!
Does the name disturb you?
Good heaven! cried Rosalia; what does
this mean?
Can it have a meaning?
Monaldi, I know not what to make of you.
Nor I of  But you have not answered my
question.
You have asked none.
No? Recollect yourself  't was about this
Count.
What of him?
I only asked why
his
name, more than any
other, should so alarm you.
Alarm me! No, why should I be alarmed?
Perhaps I was mistaken, and you  were quite
tranquil.
I was surprised, I confess, replied Rosalia;
and my surprise was natural, when I heard the
name of such a man joined with a visit to you.
Why?
Because he is so infamous that I cannot but
think it degrading to you to hold any intercourse
with him, even in the way of your profession; to
which alone I can ascribe this visit.
For a moment Monaldi's suspicion was
staggered
.
He turned from his wife, and fixed his eyes
on the floor. Could I believe, said he mentally,
that her heart spoke this; that it is not a gloss,
a cunning turn for escape. It might be  and it
might not. Heaven and hell are not more wide
asunder than the speech and purpose of a
dissembling
woman. Should she be false!  But I
will not be rash. Yet there is a way  yes  and
I will stir her heart, be it of mortal elements; find
out the feverish spot, if there be one  lay my
finger on it  so that she shall wince, ay, as from
a coal of fire.
Monaldi, why are you thus? What makes
you so absent? Are you displeased that I have
spoken thus of this man?
Let him speed to hell! said he, pacing the
room violently.
Dearest husband! cried Rosalia, stopping
him and clinging to him, what makes you talk
thus?
Words may sometimes have no meaning.
But your's have. Something dreadful
possesses
you.
'T is nothing.
Oh, Monaldi!
I have been foolish  very foolish. I ought
to be
happy
ought I not?
Oh, if
I
can make you so! You are my all
my very all on earth. I have no wish, no will but
yours; and my heart  oh, the wretchedness it
now feels  which
you
make it feel  too well
bears witness that it is yours, even as if it were
beating in your own bosom. Tell me then
command me  what shall I say, or do, to
restore
your peace?
Monaldi covered his face, as if he feared to trust
himself to look at her; but his resolution endured
but for an instant. Oh, you are an angel!  or
yes, said he, pressing her hand to his forehead
you
are
an angel. That face would pass the
gates of Paradise unquestioned!... But a face,
a mere face! he added to himself  it has
duped thousands! The hand dropped from his
grasp. And words  yes, they are the devil's
coin, that has bought millions of souls for eternal
slavery. I ought not to trust to them  so many
circumstances weigh against her  I ought not.
She must be proved. If she stand the proof, then,
and not till then
Your words indeed, said Rosalia, are always
kind, even beyond my merit; but your manner
There was something, though she knew not what,
in the impression it had left, which she could not
bear to think of, and she stopped.
My head is dizzy, said Monaldi, waiving her
from him  I cannot talk; then, throwing
himself, or rather sinking into a chair, he relapsed
into silence. What passed in his thoughts was
too deep for the eye, for his expression indicated
nothing.
Rosalia watched his countenance, and thought
she perceived his emotion subsiding. But he was
meditating a desperate stroke, and sought to
control
his features.
Do you not feel better now? she asked.
Who? said Monaldi; for the question seemed
to wake him as from a dream; but instantly
collecting
himself, he added, Ay  yes, much
better
.
It was a strange feeling  but it has passed
off, and I may yet smile perhaps.
Oh, that I could see you.
But not now: it would be too much like the
smile of that martyr; and you would not have me
set my face by a picture  become the second hand
of a shadow?
Rosalia, who did not perceive the bitterness of
this levity, began to feel somewhat relieved.
Perhaps, she said, when you tell me what has
so moved you, I may pour a balm into your heart
that will make you smile even there.
No, not yet; one day you will know.
Why not now?
No, you would not bear it  (yes, it would
crush her if innocent).
Nay, there is nothing with, or for thee, that I
would not bear.
No, not now, it must not be. But I will tell
you a story.
A story!
Yes, said Monaldi, will you hear it?
The wretched wife could only answer with a
look of anguish; for the dreadful surmise crossed
her that his brain was unsettled.
'T is the story of a young artist, once a man
of some promise  but whom misery has now
levelled
with the million. Can you conceive of
this?
But too well! replied Rosalia, in a voice that
spoke the full extent of her fears.
Indeed! Then you think that a
painter even
may have a heart to break?
Oh, my husband! why  why
Nay, interrupted Monaldi  what need of
any other world has a fellow that builds fantastic
ones of his own? Or what has he to do with
feelings
off his canvass? The world think him
all
head
and will tell you of some who have
deliberately
mangled, nay, even murdered, their models
for the sake of catching a clever agony. What
think
you
of such grave facts?
They are senseless calumnies.
Perhaps so. But to the painter.
Speak on, said Rosalia, watching his lips
with a breathless eagerness, yet dreading every
instant
to hear what would confirm her suspicion.
Monaldi proceeded. He had a young and
beautiful wife, who was every thing  life to him;
for he lived only in her; such too did he think he
was to her: in a word, they had married for love.
Do you mark!  for love.
I do.
Well, the first year of their union had passed;
and the husband looked back upon it as on a
vision
dreamed of in some happier planet; yet the
past was but a shadow to what he saw in hope
a hint, a type only, to his sanguine imagination, of
a more blest reality to come. Foolish mortal! he
should have remembered that he was yet on earth;
that the thing he loved was of earth  but
animated
dust, subject to be mixed with, to be debased
by other, and grosser, particles of its own element.
But his delusion was short. There was a man
I was about to call him a devil; but I need not
rake hell for his qualities; they are human. Yes,
he was a
man
man in its worst sense; selfish,
cruel, sensual. Don't shudder at the picture; for
this triple curse of his nature was hidden from the
eye; it lay close in his heart  deep buried in a
form of fascinating beauty, and kept from sight by
the magic of a tongue that could make even vice
seem lovely. Know you one like him?
Heaven forbid!
14
No, a woman's eye would not pierce the
exterior  it could not read his soul till he had
wholly tainted hers. But that  no, it could
not yet
What could not yet?
Nothing. Well, this man had fixed his eye
on the painter's wife. By some means or other,
not material to the story, the husband suspected it
had reached her heart. Yet he kept it to himself.
Do you attend?
Go on, said Rosalia, still racked with doubt;
I hear every word.
'T is a dismal tale  but so is life.
Oh, do not say so.
Perhaps 't is not; we have yet to prove it.
Well, the husband was one night persuaded to go
to the theatre: his wife, I know not why, perhaps
she pleaded a
head-ache
remained at home.
Do you mind?  she remained at home.
Well.
In the box opposite him the husband saw
this
man
. The first act was hardly begun when, a
billet
being brought to him, he left the house. The
husband saw what passed; his mind instantly
connected
the note with his wife. Do you hear?
I do.
Then you
understand?
said Monaldi,
lowering
his voice, and looking into her eyes as if he
would search her very soul.
What am I to understand? said Rosalia.
That she took advantage of her husband's
absence
to make an assignation: so he thought
and so  Ha! she shakes not  it does not
move her a jot, said he to himself. Can her
self-possession be forced? Could she hear this
with eyes so steady? They did not even wink
but kept on mine, fixed and unconscious, as if she
were a picture. Could guilt stand so the look,
the tone  my whole prejudging manner?
Impossible
!
Merciful Heaven! should she be
innocent
!
Will you not go on? said Rosalia.
Directly, replied Monaldi, rising, and moving
to a window. The twilight had already faded to
a faint streak in the horizon, and the smaller stars
were fast gathering in the west; it was what he
was wont to call his soul's hour. He threw up
the window, and the night-breeze came fresh
upon
his flushed forehead. Sweet air of Heaven!
thou, at least, said he, art pure. Oh, that I
might once more bless thee! that I might love
again the light of these stars, and mount, and mix
in spirit with yon happy clouds, sailing in peace
over the troubled earth! The wish instantly
forced the past into the present, and the contrast
struck him to the quick. Why, he asked, am
I not
now
as once? His lingering doubt soon
answered the question. And doubts are never
inactive
;
if they cannot go forward they are sure to
go back. So it was with Monaldi's; they had no
sooner returned than he was flung back in agony
to every suspicious word, look, and hint. No,
they are all too connected to be without an
object
and what object can they have but her?
Do they not all point to her? They do: and her
self-possession
must be
assumed. But I will put it
to a fiercer test. If she has a particle of love for
the wretch,
that
must touch her.
Rosalia now approached, and taking his hand,
begged him to go on with his story; for her
dreadful
misgivings still hung upon her; and she felt
impatient
to hear him speak, in the hope, faint as it
was, that the connexion of his thoughts would be
such as to do away her fears. Come, my love,
she said, finish the tale: 't is indeed a sad one;
but I wish to hear how it ends.
Do you?... S'death, she mocks me!
I see it now, her coolness is acted. Yes, she
shall hear it  and hear the catastrophe that ought
to have been hers.
Come, sit by me, said Rosalia.
Monaldi grasped her hand. Rosalia   his
voice now deepened to a tone almost terrific
Rosalia, there are workings of the elements even
in the centre of this solid earth. Think you they
work of themselves?
No.
Think you then that He, who gave them
impulse
,
cannot see through the miles of thick matter
that incrusts them?
Yes; the eye of Heaven sees all that is made.
And all that is done?
Certainly.
Yet there are creatures, who call themselves
rational, that will do deeds that sink their fellows
in misery  deliberately do them; nay, watch and
fast, ay, and would pray too, did hell need it, for
their black hour of luck; yet
wink
not even under
that all-seeing eye. Perhaps they think not of it;
or foolishly hope to hide them in night.
Wretched
hope! Though the sun were extinguished, and
a thicker darkness than ever mortal dreamt of
wrapt her about, yet would that eye, swifter than
light, pierce to the bed of the adulteress.
Monaldi still perceived no change in her.
What is she made of? said he to himself.
I talk to the dull ear of a corpse! But there are
hearts, which defy Heaven, that will yet shrink at
14*
the touch of a human hand. If her's be such, she
shall feel it.
The intense anxiety of Rosalia, together with
the harrowing nature of its cause, had given a
fixedness
to her expression, which, contrasted with the
rapid and violent transitions of thought and
feeling
in her husband, made her appear to him quite
calm and collected. At a time of less excitement,
he might have been startled at the almost petrified
gaze with which she watched his slightest
movement
;
but now he only felt the contrast of her
stillness with his own tumult.
But the story, said Rosalia
I fear you will not relish it.
Nay, I would hear it, nevertheless.
Where was I?
At the theatre.
True  I
was
there. But 't is strange
you
should wish to hear it; with a woman's nerves
too. Yet no  nothing's strange to me now. I
have heard of one who had his funeral
rehearsed;
I once doubted it; but I was then inexperienced.
Well, listen. So far her case, if guilty  now to
what should have followed.
In order to give time for the paramours to
meet, the husband delayed his return home for
near an hour; then, having a master-key, he let
himself in without noise. The parlor, as he
expected
,
was vacant. Mark  I am coming to a
close. The wife, it seems, was in her chamber;
and the chamber, like
ours,
at the head of the
stairs
suppose it ours
. When the husband
reached the landing-place, hearing a stir in the
room, he concealed himself behind the pedestal of
a statue  as, it might be,
the one near our
chamber
.
Do you note? Keep the
place
in your
mind.
I will.
And
imagine it in this house
.
Well.
Oh, 't will be
better!
Where was I?  Oh,
behind the statue. He had scarcely taken his
station there, before the door opened. His
suspicion
was now confirmed; the wife was giving her
paramour a parting embrace. To hell! cried the
husband, springing upon them with a furious
bound  and his sword in an instant pinned the
wife and the wretch Fialto to the door!
Horrible! said Rosalia, shuddering.
Ha! cried Monaldi, crushing her hand within
both of his, was it well done?
Rosalia, whose christian temper revolted at
murder, even to avenge the most atrocious wrong,
was too much shocked to reply. But her face
spoke anything but guilt; and Monaldi
felt
its
meaning, yet fearing to trust to it, he hurried on.
But Fialto; speak  did
he
deserve it?
The galleys even, said Rosalia, with a look
of disgust.
How! is that worse than death?
Is he not still living, and at large? You spoke
of him to-night as if you supposed him the person
who rang at the gate.
True, true  he does live; he recovered.
Infamous wretch!
What, not forgive him! His beauty remains
the same; and that, with your sex, will atone for
many sins.
This to me?
Oh, Monaldi!
She
is
innocent! exclaimed Monaldi, falling
on his knees, and clasping his hands. Thank
God!
Who
is innocent? said the astonished wife.
You!
I! Of what?
Of everything  of the shadow even of evil.
Thou art all purity!
What is this enigma? Monaldi, why do you
say this to me?
Monaldi's eyes fell: for a moment the question
confused him; but soon recovering, he replied,
Can you ask? Are you not the very opposite of
the wretched adulteress? And can I know it
feel it, as I do, without bursting forth in joy?
The coherence of the tale had now satisfied
Rosalia
of her husband's sanity. But the time he had
chosen  his manner of telling it  and his unusual
excitement, still perplexed her. It must, she
thought, in some way concern himself, or it
would not have taken such hold of him. But how?
Might it not be what he first alluded to; the same
that caused his emotion before he returned home?
It was the perfidy, he said, of one he had formerly
esteemed. But could this Count have been that
friend? It must be so; for it seems he thought
him the person who just rang at the gate, and
the mention of his name naturally brought the
story more vividly to his mind. Then he might
have known the unfortunate husband. Yes; it is
so.
These thoughts passed so rapidly through
Rosalia's
mind, that the first and last seemed almost to
meet in the same instant. It is so, she
repeated
aloud. Monaldi, I no longer wonder, for I
now understand the cause of your emotion.
Monaldi stood aghast. He thought she had
divined the object of his suspicion, and her
contempt
seemed ready to overwhelm him.
You know, she added, the unfortunate
husband.
He breathed again. I do.
Is he your friend?
There is but one on earth dearer  yourself.
Monaldi, I honor this deep feeling, now I
know the cause  much as I have suffered from
it.
And did you suffer?
More than I can express; for I thought  it
makes me shudder as I recall it
What!
That your brain was injured.
Alas, thought he, how near the truth!
What a heart is yours! If you feel thus for
another, what would have been your misery, had
you
been the poor husband.
Do not let us think of it, said he, it makes
my flesh creep to imagine even
Ah, said Rosalia, with a melancholy smile,
that same imagination would be a fearful master
over such a heart as yours.
Never can it become so, replied Monaldi,
kissing her forehead; never, while my heart
clings to such a reality. Look on me, Rosalia
Oh, how beautiful is Truth when it looks out from
the eyes of a pure woman! Such, if ever
visible
,
should be its image  the present shadowing
of that hallowed harmony which the soul shall
hereafter know in substance.
My husband! Rosalia could say no more.
The night now closed upon them, and they sunk
to sleep with hearts too full for another wish.
CHAPTER XIII.
Monaldi's
fears were now allayed; for though
some of their causes were still unexplained, he
studiously drove them from his mind, as too light
to outweigh the evidence which his former
experience
and Rosalia's whole manner had opposed to
them.
This respite was not a little favored by Fialto's
absence, almost a month having passed since
Monaldi
had seen him. But the Count was not idle;
he was only waiting till chance should furnish him
with means to strike the last blow. With this
view he had contrived to make himself acquainted
with all Monaldi's movements, which he effected
by means of a domestic who had formerly been one
of his creatures. Antonio, the name of the man,
had imposed on Monaldi by an artful tale of
distress
,
and been taken into his service from motives
of charity. But Antonio was not of a nature to be
turned from his course by any act of kindness; he
seldom troubled himself about any motives but his
own, and his present one, the hope of a large
reward
,
was strong enough to keep him faithful to
his employer.
It was not long after this, that Monaldi received
a letter from the steward of one of his estates near
Genezzano, requiring his presence on some urgent
business; and mentioning the circumstance,
together
with his intention of setting out on his
journey
the next day, while Antonio was waiting at
dinner, it was accordingly made known to Fialto
without loss of time.
Nothing could have suited the Count better.
Genezzano was more than thirty miles from Rome.
Monaldi must calculate on being absent at least
two days.
What use Fialto made of these circumstances
will appear by the following letter, written as if in
answer to one from Rosalia.
A thousand, thousand, thousand thanks,
dearest
Rosalia, for your precious letter. The rapture
but a truce with raptures till we meet  for I
have only time to say, that I shall be punctual to
the hour you have appointed  at twelve to a
minute. Oh, that tomorrow were come! Could
anything be more fortunate than this journey to
Genezzano! I could almost worship your easy
15
man for his accommodating spirit. He is
certainly
a most obliging husband  perhaps 't is to
make up for not leaving us longer together the
other night, when he went to the theatre. You
desire me not to reply to your note, because 't is
unnecessary  and you fear needless risks. But
for once I must disobey you; and do so that you
might learn to rely more in future on the prudence
of your devoted
Fialto.
The letter being prepared, the next step was to
have it seen by the husband. But chance again
made that easy, for it was now the very evening
on which he was accustomed to make his weekly
visit to St. Luke's. Fialto knowing this, had
therefore only to take his former station at the
gate, and, pretending to mistake Monaldi for a
servant, put the letter into his hand. The night
was as dark as could have been wished for so evil
a purpose. He accordingly took his station at the
proper time, when a loud coughing by Antonio
gave notice of his master's approach.
Immediately
after, Monaldi's footstep was heard in the
gateway. So, you are come at last, said Fialto,
speaking low and rapidly; but not a word, good
Gieuseppe, we may be overheard. There, take
that to your mistress; and there's postage. So
saying, he thrust the letter, with a piece of gold,
into Monaldi's hand, and in another moment he
was gone.
The rapidity with which this was said and done,
left no time for reply, had Monaldi attempted it;
but the words Gieuseppe and mistress were
enough; he did not even hear the rest, for they
seemed to stun him, and he stood for a while
passing
the letter from one hand to the other in a kind
of vacant distress, till the sharp sound of the gold
as it fell and rang on the pavement, again brought
him to his senses. It was then he began to feel
that he was possessed at last of what would decide
his fate. He returned to the house, and, shutting
himself up in his library, placed the letter on the
table before him. Its superscription was plain
to his wife; yet he hesitated for a moment whether
he should open it. But his mind was not in a
state for refining; he could perceive only one
alternative  complete conviction or interminable
suspicion; and he broke the seal. The letter
dropt from his hand, and his head sunk on the
table in agony. But this blow, though surer, could
not have the same effect with the first; for his
mind had been prepared by previous suffering, had
been warned, as it were, of the probable evil, and
been tempered by that warning to bear what might
else have driven him to madness. He had now
indeed a nearer and more certain cause for
wretchedness
,
but it was what had once been expected,
and wanted the force of newness; besides, it was
now distinct, had a positive shape; and the power
of enduring calamity is generally proportioned to
its reality; as the mind can oppose its strength to
what is real, as substance resisting substance, but
has no strength, no power to repel the intangible
and ever-multiplying phantoms of the imagination.
Monaldi felt that his doom was now sealed, and
he rose from his seat with a desperate calmness;
for his last doubt was gone, and with it seemed to
have fled every conflicting emotion. In this state
he continued for almost half an hour, his arms
folded, and his eyes wandering without object,
when a glance at the letter gave a fiercer impulse
to his thoughts. He took it up, and again
attempted
to read it; but he had scarcely finished
the first sentence, when, dashing it with fury to
the floor, he stamped upon it with a violence that
shook the very walls. Witch, sorceress, devil!
he cried, half choked with rage  thus, thus will
I crush thee! At that moment the door opened
and Gieuseppe entered. Wretch! cried
Monaldi
,
seizing him by the throat. I beg pardon,
said the man, trembling. I did not know you
were at home, sir, but hearing a noise, I thought
something had fallen.
This speech gave Monaldi time to recover
himself
.
True, said he, it was that bust; it must
have been carelessly put up; but you need not
stay to replace it now,  I am engaged.
Yes, said Monaldi, as the servant withdrew,
and
I too
will play the hypocrite. Truth is no
match for falsehood; 't is only hypocrisy can
circumvent
treachery. I will still appear the
easy
man,
the
obliging husband
and the pander
Gieuseppe
shall still think his master the blind gull.
Yes, I will
seem
to go this journey  still seem to
make amends for returning so soon from the
theatre
.
Oh, my true Genius, how clearly didst thou
note to me that polluted hour! Yet how she bore
herself  with what a face she looked when I told
the tale that painted it! Oh, woman, could your
heart be seen in your face, we should love toads
sooner. But thou, painted toad! like a scorpion
will I meet thee. The appointment, it seems, was
made by her; and she forbids an answer. Yes,
she knew he was not the man to fail. This
letter then is not expected  of course its
miscarriage
will not be discovered. Nothing could have
fallen out better  better! for what? For the
sealing of my misery! Then be it so  ha! ha!
15*
Oh, that I had an enemy  how impotent would
now be his wrath! what would be the gall of ten
thousand deadly hearts now poured upon mine
mine, that is filled with it? that already sweats it?
But I will not keep it long there; it shall soon
out like a flood  shall drench, shall drown this
hot bird of paradise  ay, even in her very nest!
Yes, I will go this journey, and she, Gieuseppe,
and all, shall see me go with a cheerful face, and
a light heart  yes, light of the world; for
nothing
here can again touch it, it moves now in
an element of its own. And when they think
me at Genezzano  ha! ha! I shall then reach
my zenith.
So saying, he rang the bell, and left Gieuseppe
to clear away the fragments of the bust. Then
quitting the house, he proceeded to the Academy.
It may seem strange, but it is nevertheless true,
that with some natures there is a point in misery
where they will sport with their sufferings, and
appear
to take a kind of dreadful pleasure in
magnifying
them, nay, even task the future, and fly to it
with the hope for something more, some deeper
woe, to keep their minds in action  which solves
the mystery.
Monaldi needed no additional proof of his wife's
infidelity; his conviction was complete; yet he
thirsted for more  for the last drop of the
bitterest
of all draughts.
But the part of a dissembler was still new to
him, and difficult, and had always been revolting
to his nature; it was now become more so that
it seemed to be forced upon him by her in whom,
of all on earth, he had most confided. Yet he
went through it: that he did so was not a little
owing to the shortness of his trial, it being near
midnight before he returned home; perhaps,
however
,
more owing to the trusting temper of his
wife, who, seeing only his apparent cheerfulness,
could hardly have suspected an opposite feeling
without a change in her character; for, except in
very glaring cases, the senses may be said to live
in an atmosphere of the mind.
Had Monaldi's suffering been unmixed with the
hope of vengeance, he might have found disguise
impossible; but falsehood is of the family of
revenge
,
and a snare and a mask are never wanted
when needed; it was this prepared him for the
meeting, and he entered the house with a smile.
Rosalia looked up, and gave it back from her
heart; for the smile of one we love cannot be seen
unanswered.
How beautiful, thought Monaldi, may even
a lie look!  Oh, Sin, take always this form, and
the world, with all its grave philosophy, its solemn
pomp of reason, is yours. But
I
know its
hollowness
,
its   The thought was too revolting; yet
still the smile remained  but it was the smile
which misery gives as her last token, the mark,
which she sets upon her own.
Before Monaldi returned home, he had worked
himself up to this interview by desperately
recalling
every past endearment, every audible and
silent manifestation of tenderness; in short, all
that he was wont to go to and brood over in
secret
;
but they came not now as once, like definite
and luminous points in his life; for now every
word, and look, and delicate caress brought with
them the hateful image of Fialto. They are no
longer mine, said he; they never were! And
I can hear them, see them  do all, but feel them
again. Can she touch again the heart that loves
only purity? The fictitious life which her false
spirit gave to it is gone  forever. 'T is now
dead. Could it feel this stony stillness were it not
so? Let her talk and look then  she will talk to
ears that hear not, look to eyes that are glazed.
But yet  yes, I will mock her; mock her with a
phantom of the love she has murdered  murdered
while she smiled; she shall still think it lives, and
lives for her!
Morally his heart
was
dead. But what must
have been the agony with which a heart so gentle,
so generous and noble, stiffened into death!
Let no one marvel at this change, sudden as it
may seem; for there is no limit to human
inconsistency
.
A single circumstance has often
transformed
the firmest nature, making the same being
his own strongest contrast; many things  injury,
ingratitude, disappointment  may do it; in a
word, anything which robs a man of that which
gives a charm to his existence; and chiefly and
most rapid will the change be with those of deep
and social feelings, who live in others. Such is
man when left to himself; and there is but one
thing which can make him consistent
Religion;
the only unchanging source of moral harmony.
But Monaldi, unhappily, knew little of this. Not
that he was wholly without religion; on the
contrary
,
his understanding having assented to its
truths, he believed himself a good christian; but
he wanted that vital faith which mingles with every
thought and foreruns every action, ever looking
through time to their fruits in eternity. The
kindness
and generosity of his disposition had hitherto
stood in its stead; he had delighted in making
others happy, and thought nothing a task which
could add to their consolation or welfare. But
hitherto he had been happy, and his life had
seemed
to him like one of fresher ages; like the first
stream that wandered through Eden, sweet and
pure in itself, and bearing on its bosom the bright
and lovely images of a thousand flowers. Would
one so full not sometimes overflow? or would one
so filled
often thirst for what is spiritual, for what
belongs to the dim and distant future? preparing
in the hour of peace for the hour of temptation?
Then he had met with no adversity, with no crosses
to wean him gradually from this delightful
paradise
;
no sorrow to lift his soul to that where
trouble
cannot enter. But though the present world
seemed enough, and more than enough for him, in
reality it was nothing; it was only through
one
of
earth that he saw and loved all else; she alone
filled his heart, modified his perceptions, and shed
her own beauty over every vision of his mind.
Now she was lost to him; torn away by a single
wrench: And could this have been without
leaving
a fearful void? To Monaldi's heart she was
all; and his all was now gone, leaving it empty.
An empty human heart!  an abyss the earth's
depths cannot match. And how was it now to be
filled? His story will show.
The further operations of Fialto depending on
the success of his letter, he had instructed Antonio
to watch his master's motions, and report
accordingly
.
It was possible, he thought, that Monaldi
might escape the snare by openly accusing his
wife, and examining Gieuseppe; in which case the
conspiracy would end at once; a result, however,
but barely possible. It was more probable that
Monaldi would set out on his journey without
coming to an explanation; if he did so, only one
conclusion could follow  that he would return
secretly, and at the hour of the assignation;
whether to satisfy his doubts or revenge was
immaterial
;
and for this event Fialto was provided,
having ordered Antonio to engage a person to
watch his master and follow him back to the city,
in order to give notice of his return, the signal
agreed upon being a little Venetian air, which
the man was to play as soon as Monaldi should
have entered his house.
At an early hour the next morning Antonio
made his report, and Fialto found his hopes
confirmed
.
Monaldi had set out on the journey
apparently
in good spirits, and unattended. The
spy was also gone; and a truer hound was never
put on the trail.
It was now again night, and it only remained
for Fialto to gain admittance into the house. To
make this easy, Antonio had purposely lost a bet
to Gieuseppe, to be paid in a flask of Orvietto.
While the servants were engaged with the wine,
Antonio stole out, and admitted the Count secretly,
in the disguise of a friar.
Antonio having locked the door of his master's
dressing-room, had secured the key early in the
morning, in order that Rosalia might suppose he
had taken it with him; of course she would not
think of going to it now. In this room, or rather
closet, Fialto took his station; he then threw off
his disguise, and locked the door. The closet
opened into Rosalia's bed-chamber, and the
chamber
was up only one flight of stairs, and looked
upon the street; a circumstance which the Count
had considered with a view to his escape, to
facilitate
which he had provided a ladder of ropes, for,
bold as he was, he had little taste for perils that
promised nothing.
The clock struck eleven, and Fialto heard the
chamber door open, and a light step pass the
closet
;
this was followed by a slight movement as of
one undressing. 'T is she, he thought. Then
it was still again. He looked through the
keyhole
to see if she was in bed, and saw her kneeling
before a crucifix. How like my poor nun!
Pshaw  that's past. What eyes! But what's
her beauty to me  at least now? The yellow
face of a sequin is more to my present liking.
Yes, Maldura's gold has made me a match for St.
Antony. There, added he, withdrawing his eyes,
go to bed in peace; I doubt 't is the last time.
But there are millions who never taste it  and
why should she? she may find a substitute, as I
do, in pleasure.
A few minutes after, he heard her rise and get
into bed. She has left the lamp burning. So
much the better; there will be no mistake as to
my person. 'T is a foolish business though; but
Ha! what's that? It was only the faint sigh
that usually precedes sleep. He put his ear to the
key-hole, and heard a low, regular breathing. So
soon gone? And she sleeps like an infant. Would
that I  but that's folly.
Fialto's thoughts now took a rapid flight to long
past and almost forgotten scenes; and Rosalia,
Monaldi, and his purpose, all seemed to have
vanished
from his mind, when the chiming of the last
quarter brought him back to the present.
Dare I trust myself now, thought he, after a
pause; dare I venture to look at her? And why
not? Are not all my passions bagged in Maldura's
purse?  I will look at her.
There is a majesty in innocence which will
sometimes awe the most reprobate. As Fialto
16
stood by the bed, a strange sensation came over
him, and something like compunction crossed his
brain; but it sunk not deeper  for nothing of
like nature had reached his heart for many years;
and the feeling, whatever it was, passed off in
words.
How like death, said he, to all around her;
and yet how living in herself. And her thoughts
how they play over her face; to her, perhaps, they
are the parts of a world  a world all her own.
Pity she should ever wake to another. That smile,
I never saw but one like it. Some early
recollection
here probably crossed his mind, and he turned
away. Curse thee, Maldura, for a villain in
essence
!
Wert thou starving, like me, there might
be some excuse. But I  I
am
starving; and
that's enough. Nay, suppose I were weak enough
to forego this exaction of my necessities, would
those eyes ever deign to drop a tear for me after I
am gone? No, her precious morality would bid
her rejoice. Yes; and the most moral world too
would all join her; ay, all. Fialto's evil genius
here touched the right chord; for nothing makes
vengeance so indiscriminate as the consciousness
of being generally hated. Yes, they would
trample
on my grave, and make a jest of the dead
libertine. But I'll spoil their sport for the present.
Ha! the signal! At that moment the spy's
guitar
was heard from the street. Fialto immediately
raised the window, and, throwing out his disguise,
let down the ladder of ropes. This was hardly
done when he heard a cautious step ascending the
staircase. He then slipped off his coat, and took
his station beside the bed, till hearing the step
approach
the door, he awoke Rosalia. In the same
instant Monaldi burst into the room. Rosalia
shrieked, and Fialto, springing to the window, in
the next moment was in the street.
Mercy! oh, mercy! cried Rosalia, throwing
herself at Monaldi's feet, whom the confusion of
her terror made her mistake for a robber.
Ay, strumpet! said he, in a voice scarcely
articulate, more than you have shown to me.
So saying, with a frantic laugh, he plunged his
dagger into her bosom. She fell back with a
groan, and her blood, spirting up, covered his
hands. A horrible silence now followed, and
Monaldi
stood over her, as if a sudden frost had
stiffened
his face and figure in the very expression
and attitude with which he gave the blow.
Rosalia had been stunned by the fall; but the
flowing from her wound soon brought back her
senses; she looked up, and for the first time
recognised
her husband. Merciful heaven! you
from you! The blow now reached her soul, and
she covered her face with her hands. Oh,
Monaldi
why have you done this?
Repent  repent, said he, moving away.
Stay, oh stay! cried Rosalia, with a
piercing
energy.
What would you?
Much. But look at me  I am your wife,
Monaldi.
Wife! Never. But I have forgiven it. You
are nothing to any one now but  to Him who
made you. Look to it, then  waste not your
limited hour on one you never loved.
Never loved  whom?
Oh, woman, cannot death make thee honest?
Me!
You!  oh, Monaldi. But, ha! there must
be something  yet my brain is so confused  that
man  it was not a dream; no, I was awake.
Tell me  who siezed me just now in the bed? it
could not have been you.
Oh, hardened to the core! Rosalia, know you
that you are dying?
Too well  I feel 't is my last hour.
Repent then.
Oh, tell me, said Rosalia  't is too late
I am very faint; and she sunk back exhausted.
Monaldi now looked on her with a compassion
that made him shudder; for, base as he thought
her, he felt as if he could give his heart's blood to
save her soul. No, said he, she must not die
so. Then, hastily making a bandage with his
handkerchief, he succeeded, with some difficulty,
in stanching the wound. In a few minutes her
strength returned.
Thank God! there may yet be time; I'll for
a surgeon; and he made a movement as if to
leave the room.
But Rosalia perceiving it, with a violent effort
threw herself forward, and, clasping his knees,
locked them with an agony that shook his whole
frame.
Why is this? said Monaldi; why trifle
thus? Make your peace with heaven.
Heaven is merciful; be thou so too. No,
my husband, you are not cruel; this last act shows
it  you have bound up the wound, and bless you
for it. Then deny me not  but tell me  why
was this deed? Oh, speak.
And you do not know?
As I have hope of heaven.
Woman! said Monaldi, shaking her off with
horror, thou standest even now in presence of the
Eternal; darest thou then lie?
16*
I do not lie  before heaven, I do not.
Horrible! And you know not perhaps him I
found here?
As God is my judge. I was asleep when he
seized me, and that seemed at the very instant you
entered.
Yet you asked for mercy
My terror confounded me, and I supposed you
both robbers.
Know you then that writing? It was
Fialto's
letter.
Rosalia took the letter, and, glancing at the
signature
,
for a moment seemed convulsed with
emotion
;
but it was only for a moment, and she read
it through with steadiness. She then calmly placed
it beside her, and attemped to kneel, but her
strength failing her, she could only clasp her hands
and raise her eyes to heaven.
I murmur not, she said  I murmur not,
oh, Father, that thou hast been pleased to permit
this work of darkness against me; for thou art
allwise
as thou art good. And not for myself do I
now call on thy name  thou knowest that I am
guiltness  but for him I leave. Spare him,
merciful
Being; impute not this blow to him; for
even now he repents it; and, oh spare him, in thy
great mercy, when he shall know my truth, when
he shall find too late that the love I bore him had
only thee for its sharer  that, but for thy grace,
it had been idolatry. Oh, spare him then, for he
will need thy mercy.
Monaldi listened as she spoke, like one in a
trance; he lost not a word, and they fell on his
heart like arrows of fire; for so comes truth when
it comes too late; yet he neither spoke nor moved,
as if the agony of conviction had brought with it
a doubt whether the falsehood he had believed
were not less intolerable.
Rosalia now turned to him, and in a feebler,
though still unbroken, voice continued.
Monaldi
,
hear me, for the hand of death is upon me. I
die
innocent
innocent of all but too much loving
thee. Your deed  't is my last prayer  may
God, as I do, forgive it. You were greatly
tempted
;
for the seeming proof of my guilt could not
be stronger. Why it was contrived, only the
Searcher of hearts can tell; for I know not an
enemy that we have. Yet that you or I have
and a deadly one  is sure. But him, too, I
forgive
.
No! said Monaldi, in a voice of anguish,
never could a wanton so speak!
Now, oh, now, said Rosalia, I die in peace;
you believe me.
I do, he cried, straining her to his bosom,
with my whole soul! Oh, Rosalia, my wife
but he could not go on; for though his eyes were
dry, a convulsive sobbing choked his utterance.
Nay, my husband, do not take it so to heart.
Think of my hopes  of my blessed change. Oh,
no  death has no sting for a christian.
Death! cried Monaldi, starting up
death! The word seemed, as it were, to
explode in his brain, and his head whirled. Then
came fearful imaginings, and with them a confused
rush of the past, mingling with the present.
Rosalia now felt her strength fast ebbing; but
her heart still clung to her husband, and she
begged
that she might die in his arms. He made no
answer; she called to him again  but he was
talking to the air.
Dead! dead, did you say? No, she lives.
But what's here? These accursed hands  look,
Rosalia  see the heart they tore from you. Red,
red  it beats; look, look, how it leaps! No;
you shall not go  speak to me  ha, gone! now
now I have you again.
His brain wanders!
Ha! it speaks  strange! strange!
Save him, oh, save him! cried Rosalia. She
could add no more; her head sunk upon her
shoulder, and her eyes closed.
Who brought it here? said Monaldi,
shrinking
from the body;  't is cold. Let the bones be
buried, though Fialto's; they should not lie on the
ground. Landi, why are you here? Oh, 't is you,
Rosalia  so you stabbed him! Well!  ha! ha!
very well. How he bleeds! Blood! blood! Give
me your hand. Nay, that's bloody too. But
hark! those bloody daggers  don't you hear
them? look; there are a thousand. Monstrous!
they fight in the air  they follow us! Oh, save
her! save her! he cried, with a piercing shriek,
and rushed from the chamber.
CHAPTER XIV.
Fialto
had been returned about an hour, and
was deliberating whether to call on Maldura then
or to wait till morning, when Antonio, livid and
breathless, staggered into the room.
How now! said the Count, somewhat
startled
at his appearance. What brings you here?
speak, man  what makes you look so like a thing
dug up?
She's dead, said Antonio.
Who is dead?
She, my mistress.
In spite of Fialto's hardness he felt a twinge at
his heart. Poor thing! said he, after a short
pause. This is more than I bargained for. But
how was it, Antonio?
That is more than I know, replied Antonio.
All I can tell is, that about one o'clock, just as I
had fallen asleep, I was suddenly roused by a
frightful shriek  such another I never heard.
What it might be, never entered my head; for I
was so confused that I had quite forgotten your
plot, and what was likely to come of it; so I sprang
out of bed, and ran to the staircase. Holy
Francesco
,
how he looked!
Who?
My master  his face and hands bloody, and
his eyes so wild  the great lamp was burning in
the corridor, and I saw him rush past it.
Come, leave crossing your lizard's liver, said
Fialto, and go on.
I have done, answered Antonio: he was
gone before I could reach the corridor.
Dolt! your mistress  how know you she is
dead?
I entered her chamber with the other servants,
whom the same noise had brought from their beds.
She was lying on the floor, and
Enough, said the Count, I have other
business
for you now.
I hope, stammered Antonio  I hope 't is
nothing like
A look from Fialto cut short the sentence. I
must hence to-night, said he, so I shall want
horses: look to it that they are in readiness within
an hour. In the meantime I will see Maldura.
Do you hear? within an hour.
His hands bloody! said Fialto, after Antonio
left him. Then the deed was his. I did not
think the painter had so much of the devil in
him. Maldura said he was all milk; that he
would part and pine, but never dare shed blood.
Had he been a fool it might have been so; but
there is no trusting your gentle tempers where
there's a spark of genius: they are like quiet
waters over volcanoes. Thou art a precious
hell-hound
,
Maldura! Yet I might have foreseen this,
for I have known such men  but I did not.
Well, 't is done; and  let it go. So there 's an
end on 't.
CHAPTER XV.
There
are some men who can daily await, and
even count the hours up to, a threatened
bereavement
,
with little discomposure; not so much from
want of feeling as from a constitutional
repugnance
to the admission of any definite form to a
future
evil; they know it will come, but it is virtually
a
mere name
so long as they possess the present.
Yet there is a moment when the present and
future
may be said to unite, and to produce, like the
mingling of light and darkness, a kind of twilight
image of both: 't is in the last counted hour. As
in grief, so it is in guilt: and so was it with
Maldura
.
Whilst his revenge was maturing, he had
watched its progress with a moody quietness; but
now that the deadly fruit was ripe, and he saw it
hanging by the last fibre, ready at the breath of
the next minute to drop into his hand, he could
not help shrinking back with a fearful misgiving of
its bitterness.
He had retired to bed at his usual hour. But
17
he had closed his eyes and composed his limbs in
vain; he could not sleep; the tide of his thoughts
was not to be stopped, neither could he force them
into other than the troublous channel they had
taken; they still rushed on in spite of his will; till,
wearied and maddened by his fruitless efforts, he
sprang out of bed. He then dressed himself, and,
taking a book, began to read aloud; but the sounds
he uttered conveyed no meaning to his brain.
At last the clock struck one  the half hour
two.  'T is over! said he, throwing the book
from him. Fool! torment yourself no longer
for what is past recall. Pshaw! this shaking is
mechanical  the coward body. Well, here's a
remedy for that, seizing a goblet of wine. Yes,
the soul is still firm; as it should be in triumph.
Ay, triumph; for revenge  what is it? A mere
speculation? a freak of the mind, beginning in a
day-dream, and ending as it began  in nothing?
Has it not relation to time, place, object? and can
a thing unreal hold such relation? No. 'T is then
a reality; if so, can it come of nothing? No; 't is
a consequence of something. What then is that
something?  Injury! Let the Monaldis then
blame themselves. If they would know the cause
of my revenge, let them remember, that
she
rejected
me  that
he
supplanted me. Tush! no more
of this.
With such wretched sophistry did Maldura
endeavor
to silence his conscience, when Fialto
entered
.
Nay, start not, said the Count, as Maldura
drew back to let him pass;  't is your good
genius
the best, I'll be sworn, in your whole
calendar
of devils. What, dumb? No greeting for
your faithful Abaddon  your plenipotentiary to
the powers below? Why, man, you look as if I
had actually come thence, and brought with me
an atmosphere unpolite.
You have license, Count, observed Maldura,
to speak of yourself as you please.
And of you too, I hope.
You come, I suppose, to tell me the affair is
over.
A word first, said Fialto. I take it,
Maldura
,
you are a man of honor?
Why that question, sir?
Because it often happens, that when a pupil
first enters Lucifer's school, he thinks it regular to
begin in the lowest forms, such as lying,
word-breaking
,
cheating, &c.
Fialto, interrupted Maldura fiercely, if I
thought you dared suspect me
Not so hot, man. I suspect no one. I only
wish to be sure of my ground.
Well, sir, what is your drift?
Merely to know if you mean to abide by your
contract.
Dare you doubt it?
You know I dare anything. But you have
well spoken; and I do not doubt you. Now to
business. The draughts on your banker at
Bologna
,
I think, are already signed?
There, sir; look at them.
Right. But there were five hundred sequins
in gold for present expenses. Ah, they are in this
bag. All right.
To a baiocco, sir, said Maldura.
I don't doubt it, said the Count, sweeping
the gold and bills from the table. And thus
ends my diplomacy; for the game is up, and the
wages of sin are won!
Though Maldura had anticipated this, and
thought himself prepared, he needed all his pride
to conceal the numbing horror that now seized him.
'T is over then, said he, faintly; well   but
he could not proceed.
Ha! he quails, said Fialto to himself.  'T is
well; he shall shake yet to his midriff for putting
me on this cursed business. But how's this, my
gallant principal  you don't seem to rejoice?
You don't know me, replied Maldura,
endeavoring
to force a laugh; but the sound only
rattled in his throat.
Ay, that was a merry laugh, but rather too
dry. You should drink, man; joy is thirsty by
nature  especially of the grim breed. There,
pledge me now in a reeling bumper to the black
knight of revenge.
'T is sweet! said Maldura, emptying the
goblet, and assuming an air of hardihood.
What?
Revenge.
Oh, delicious, no doubt. But I hav'nt given
you the particulars.
Why, no matter for them now; 't is enough
that the affair is over.
As you please. But there's one thing I must
touch on. There was, I think, an additional
clause, a kind of codicil to our contract  that if
your
friends
parted, the reward was to be doubled.
Was it not so?
It was; but you cannot claim that
yet
.
Suppose I could? You remember you are a
man of honor.
17*
You may see I have not forgotten it,
answered
Maldura, producing another draught.
'T is mine then, said Fialto, seizing it.
Impossible!
Then impossibilities have come to pass.
Count Fialto, said Maldura, rising. I doubt
you trifle with me.
In honorable earnest, replied Fialto,
carelessly
.
They parted exactly at one o'clock;
that is, if Antonio's watch be right.
Parted! and you know it so soon?
Even so; and, what's better,
so
parted, that
all the priests in christendom could never reunite
them.
How! what mean you?
The woman's dead  that's all.
Dead!
Ay, dead as Santa Rosalia herself. Glorious!
is n't it? What, dumb with joy? I thought you
would be, and kept it for a bonne bouche that
would send its savor to your very heart. But that
is not all  the best is to come; she was
murdered
murdered too by her milksop husband!
Maldura staggered, and fell back into his seat.
Ha! continued Fialto, advancing, and
raising
his voice, why don't you laugh  shout?
Hey? shout  dance, sing
io triumphe,
man! for
the deed is done past all undoing; ay, done, and
bruited, and chronicled too by this time in all the
infernal gazettes!
Monster! exclaimed Maldura, recoiling from
him.
Which of us!
Leave me, fiend!  blasted be the hour that
brought us together.
What, ho! did you think to raise the devil,
and expect him to leave his work half done? I
thought you knew him better; for I never saw one
who looked and talked so like his cater-cousin.
Marvellous! Why, you were wont to brood over
this precious plot like some dark hell-bird in the
incubation of an imp; and now that the thing
is hatched, you shrink, and turn craven before
your own offspring.
Begone, villain! cried Maldura, starting up,
and moving to a distance.
Softly, my worthy compeer, said the Count.
Devil
as often as you please; but my honor
brooks no vulgar appellation of earth.
Leave me then, devil! and curse me no more
with your hateful presence.
Hateful! What, hateful to Maldura? said
Fialto, with a sneer. Then I must be
above
him.
On my life, this is supposing me to have reached
an elevation in iniquity to which I never dared
aspire. But you do yourself injustice. Why,
I
am but a thing of clay  a mere receptacle of
appetites
;
and, evil though they be, they are yet
human; in other words, I'm a man  bad, if you
will, but too gross, too material, to be named with
what shall I call thee? The very sentiment,
the idea, the unimpassioned essence of sin! If I
prey on others, I only transfer something from
their needs to my own; if I deceive, 't is only for
a craved advantage; and if I pull down, 't is only
to build up for myself; so that nothing is lost. In
short, my utmost scope is barely to anticipate time,
and now and then, perhaps, to forestall fortune in
her eternal mutations. But thou  thou art above
profiting by thy actions; for thou deprivest for the
pleasure of bereaving  destroyest for the gust of
destruction; in a word, thy sins find their end in
nothing, and vanish, like abstractions, in the dark,
joyless abyss of thy soul.
Maldura, trembling with rage, unsheathed his
dagger  but guilt had cowed him; he stood a
moment irresolute, and the weapon dropped from
his hand.
I would that I could pity thee, said Fialto,
observing the action and fixing his eye on the
dagger
;
but  pah! my soul sickens at a coward.
Ruffian! robber! screamed Maldura,
snatching
up the dagger, and rushing on him with fury.
Another step, said the Count, presenting a
pistol, and your brains shall spatter these walls.
Maldura retreated a few paces, and, seizing a
chair, with a horrible execration, dashed it in
shivers against the wall. Thus! thus! said
he, shall it be with thee! Remember the
nun!
Dost thou threaten? replied Fialto,
advancing
;
then stopping short  No, he added, I
will not hazard my life by taking thine in this
place. Besides, thy menace is too impotent to
claim a thought; my secret is safe enough in thy
cowardly keeping. The nun wants no better
guard than the ghost of Rosalia; they are now
leagued; summon the one, then, and raise the
other  if thou darest. Ha! does the name of
Rosalia shake thee? How then wilt thou stand it
when all Rome shall couple it with thine  her
destroyer? That thou art so, and without
benefit
to thyself, is why I hate thee. As for
my part in the business  I acted in my need,
and under thee, thou superlative tempter! so
the world would not waste a curse on me. But
what tempted thee? Oh, I forgot  thou art a
poet. Well, thou hast reached the ideal of sin;
and I give thee joy of thy bloody chaplet.
Leave me, or poniard me, unmerciful dog!
cried Maldura, in a voice hoarse and scarcely
articulate
.
Thou shalt have thy wish, said Fialto,
turning
contemptuously towards the door. But I
leave thee this advice, Maldura: Ride not wide of
Rome. Should we meet again at Radicoffani, my
stilletto, perhaps, may do, for once, some service
to the world. So saying, he left the house, and
a moment after the clatter of hoofs gave notice of
his departure.
As the sounds caught his ear, Maldura felt as if
there was one fiend less to tug at his heart; but
the relief was transient, for another minute brought
their echoes to his brain, hurrying him back in
memory to his first meeting with Fialto  then
from place to thought  from thought to word,
and plot, and action  through their whole
horrible
meanderings to his present hell. His agony
now became choking, and, grasping his throat as
though he would tear it open, he thought he would
give the world for a groan; but even that was
denied him, and he fell on the floor without
uttering
a sound.
Thus ended this compact of sin. It could not
have ended otherwise; for there is no sympathy
in evil, whose natural consequence is hatred.
Yet the evil may not hate themselves; if they do
not, however, 't is only because of that instinctive
sophistry with which the mind is ever ready to
defend
itself from whatever is painful; but the
delusion
is limited to themselves; for the vices of
others they have a clear-sightedness which even the
minutest deformities cannot escape. Indeed, evil
is but another name for moral discord; its law,
revulsion; and its final issue the shutting up the
soul in impenetrable solitude.
CHAPTER XVI.
When
Antonio, with his fellow servants, entered
his mistress's apartment and saw her weltering in
blood, and stretched, apparently, lifeless on the
floor, he was too much shocked at the part he had
borne in her catastrophe to wait for a second look,
but, concluding her dead, availed himself of the
general confusion to slip away and convey the
intelligence
to his employer. The consternation of
the other domestics may easily be imagined; but,
fortunately, there was one amongst them, an aged
housekeeper, who, on removing the body, and
perceiving
it still warm, had the presence of mind to
send for a surgeon. In the mean time Rosalia
was put into a warm bed, and such other
restoratives
being applied as are usual in similar cases,
she soon began to show symptoms of life.
Immediately
after, the surgeon arrived. One minute
more, said he, and I should have been too late.
He then proceeded to probe the wound, when,
drawing a long sigh, Rosalia opened her eyes.
On further examination, the surgeon pronounced
her wound a flesh one; but she had suffered so
much from loss of blood, he observed, that nothing
but the utmost care and absence of all excitement,
could possibly save her. He then ordered the
room to be cleared, and enjoined that on no
account
she should be allowed to speak. This last
injunction became necessary in consequence of
several ineffectual attempts she had made to
inquire
after her husband. The surgeon further
added, on catching the word husband, and
connecting
it with certain surmises which had been
hinted to him of Monaldi's concern in the affair,
that he would recommend it to her not to see any
one  not excepting even her husband.
Rosalia
answered with an imploring look, but the surgeon
observing, that her life depended on her obedience
in this particular, she was obliged to acquiesce.
For the same reason the interdiction was also
extended
to her father. It was with great difficulty,
however, that Landi could be prevailed on to
forego seeing his daughter; but the surgeon was
peremptory, and he was forced to obey. It was
fortunate for Rosalia that the knowledge of her
husband's absence was thus kept from her;
Monaldi
having disappeared, and gone no one knew
whither; as to his insanity, the few incoherent
18
words he had uttered previous to her fainting, had
either passed from her mind, or, considered merely
as the effect of violent emotion, were little heeded.
We left Maldura in a state of misery only to be
conceived by the guilty, or by those to whom a
holy abhorrence of sin reveals its frightful nature.
It was in vain he summoned the casuistry which
had hitherto supported him in the contemplation
of crime. It came now, as formerly, and with a
sound of might, but it spent itself like the wind
against a solid rock; for he had now to do, not
with hypothesis, but a based reality, darkening the
present, and stretching its long shadow into the
future. Before the accomplishment of his purpose
his life had seemed a burden, and he would have
welcomed death as a release from trouble; but
now, though the burthen was heavier and more
galling, the thought of death only filled him with
dismay, and he shrank from it as the traveller
shrinks from an abyss whose edge his foot feels in
the dark, but whose depth neither his eye nor his
imagination can fathom.
Thus will the sense of guilt sometimes cow the
proudest philosophy. The atheist may speculate,
and go on speculating till he is brought up by
annihilation
;
he may then return to life, and reason
away the difference between good and evil; he
may even go further, and imagine to himself the
perpetration of the most atrocious acts; and still
he may eat his bread with relish, and sleep soundly
in his bed; for his sins wanting, as it were,
substance
,
having no actual solidity to leave their
traces in his memory, all future retribution may
seem to him a thing with which, in any case, he
can have no concern; but let him once turn his
theory to practice  let him make crime palpable
in an instant he feels its hot impress on his soul.
Then it is, that what may happen beyond the
grave becomes no matter of indifference; and,
though his
reason
may seem to have proved that
death is a final end, then comes the question:
what does his reason
know
of death? Then, last of
all, the little word
if,
swelling to a fearful size,
and standing at the outlet of his theories, like a
relentless giant, ready to demolish his conclusions.
But Maldura's sufferings were now to be
suspended
,
for the report of Rosalia's recovery at last
reached him. This unlooked-for intelligence was
followed by a spasm of joy scarcely to have been
exceeded had he been suddenly reprieved from an
ignominious death. He felt like one emerging
from the hopeless darkness of a dungeon to the
light and free air of day; and though the hope
which had once sustained him was gone forever,
and he had nothing to look to, he yet began to
fancy, and even to feel, without stopping to ask
why, that his former relish of life was now
returning
.
But his respite was short. It was natural
that release from a great, though only imagined,
evil should render him for a time less sensible to
such as were minor and actual; but they were
light only from comparison, and no sooner did the
weight of the former begin to pass from his
memory
,
than the pressure of the latter became more
perceptible, till at last, in spite of every effort to
resist them, they became the subjects of his daily
and hourly contemplation.
Amongst these, the sorest, and that which time
rather added to than diminished, was the
destruction
of Monaldi's peace, perhaps of his life; for
Monaldi had never been heard of since the fatal
night, and whither he had gone, or what had
become
of him, was still uncertain.
Whilst Maldura believed himself injured, and
the victim of the world's injustice, he gave
himself
up to a moody sullenness, either shut up at
home, or brooding in darkness in the solitude of
ruins. But now that his sufferings were
occasioned
by his own crimes their effect was different.
He became restless; deserting his former haunts,
and mixing with the world; visiting every place of
public amusement, giving entertainments, and
forming
new acquaintance; then, tiring of these, he
would change his abode, engage in new diversions,
and collect new associates; then he would remove
to another, then run the same round, till that was
exhausted; then to another, then from city to city,
from village to village, wandering and journeying,
day and night, and seeking and catching at every
kind of object, however insignificant, that might, if
possible, draw his thoughts from himself: and such
is the last object of guilt; for novelty while pursued
is the world's substitute for hope; when possessed,
its opiate for remorse  the opiate indeed of a
moment
yet for that moment will the guilty toil
more intently and desperately than in their days of
innocence for the promise of heaven.
It was in one of these wanderings that Maldura,
returning towards Naples, in company with a party
of pleasure, was separated from his companions
by a circumstance of no uncommon occurrence.
The day had begun sultry, but was now closing,
after a refreshing shower, with one of those
delicious
atmospheres known only in the south; so
sweet! so bright!  as if the common air had
suddenly given place to the humid sighs of
answering
orange groves and the intermingled breath of
enamored flowers  as if the dripping trees and
18*
fields had actually been flooded by liquid gold
from the sun; then the hum of insects, the
twittering
of birds, and the ceaseless darting of
innumerable
lizards, so filling the ear and eye with
sound and motion, as if the very ground and air
were exulting in life! Such a scene was not for
Maldura, and, trusting to his horse to follow in the
track of his companions, he had closed his eyes,
when, reaching the brow of a hill, a general
exclamation
from the company made him look up.
Glorious! magnificent! now burst from one
and another. It was the bay of Naples; a scene
not to be painted by words  even though its
waters were likened to a sea of sapphire, its
mountains
to amethysts, and its skirting city to a fillet
of snow; these indeed might give their color, but
not the harmony of lines, nor the light and shadow,
nor the dazzling expanse  and never the living,
conscious joy with which they seemed to send up
their shout of praise to the immeasurable depths
above. There is a voice in nature ever audible to
the heart  which no hardness can shut out  and
for its weal or wo, as the heart may be. Maldura
heard it now  breaking upon him like a clap of
thunder. He instinctively turned from the scene,
and looked towards Vesuvius. But even from that
he shrank; for the terrible Vesuvius was now smiling
in purple, and reposing beneath his pillar of smoke
as under a gorgeous canopy: the very type of
himself  gay and peaceful without, yet restless
and racked with fire within. A groan was rising
to his lips, but a resolute effort enabled him to
suppress
it; yet dreading to trust himself any longer
to the observation of his party, he hastily
dismounted
,
under pretence of decyphering a
half-effaced
inscription on the road, and bade them ride on.
His companions being now out of sight,
Maldura
was about to remount, when the girth of his
saddle gave way. This accident made it necessary
for him to seek assistance, and he was proceeding
for this purpose to a village a little off the road,
when he thought he descried through the trees
something peeping above the ruins of an ancient
tomb like the roof of a hut. As he approached
he perceived it to be the shed of a half-demolished
hovel; but thinking it might possibly still afford
shelter to some wandering swine-herd, he fastened
his horse to the branch of a wild fig-tree that grew
out of a crevice in the ruin, and, walking round,
had just come to the side of the hut, when he
heard a low murmuring sound as of voices within.
He stopped a moment, doubting if it were safe to
enter; should he encounter robbers, the odds
would be against him. Whatever the sounds
might proceed from, he thought it at least but
prudent
to reconnoitre, and observing a rent in the
wall he looked through it; but he could only
perceive
a dark heap lying in a corner, and something
like a human leg thrust from beneath it. Being
satisfied that he had nothing to fear, Maldura
entered. On a nearer view the heap in the corner
proved, as he had conjectured, to be a man asleep.
Ho! fellow! said he; awake  I need your
assistance. With a languid motion the figure
turned upon his back, and slowly drawing down
the dark and tattered mantle, that enveloped his
head and body, a little below the eyes, appeared to
look up. Maldura, catching a glimpse of his ashy
forehead, as it gleamed through the flakes of his
long black hair, bent forward to see if the man
were awake; but his eyes were so dark and
sunken
that he could only discern two bright specks.
Come, rouse thee, fellow, said he, impatiently,
I want your aid. The man made an effort to
rise, and the garment fell from his face.
Monaldi
!
exclaimed Maldura, recoiling with horror.
Who calls me? said the other. What do
you want?  oh, you are are a
Sbirro
. But you
come too late  I am dead  ha! ha! You
cannot
touch me now!
Fiend, devil that I am! groaned Maldura.
His wits are gone  and I  open  gape, hell,
and swallow me!
Go, go, said the maniac.
I will, I will, cried Maldura, and rid you
of a monster! So saying, he rushed from the
hovel, when, stumbling over a loose stone, he fell
to the ground. He sprang upon his feet again,
but the accident had given a moment for
reflection
.
No! he said, while a multitude of
thoughts passed with the rapidity of lightning
through his brain. No  I will still endure the
torturing sight  though it transform me to the
like  and endure it, if possible, to save him.
This resolution calmed him in an instant; but
it was not till after a considerable time that he
could summon sufficient fortitude to return to the
hut. When he did so he found Monaldi again
covered and seemingly asleep. On lifting the
mantle, however, he perceived that he was still
awake  but so exhausted, either by disease or
famine, that he could no longer move.
As Maldura beheld the ravages which misery
had so rapidly made on his late happy friend, and
gazed upon the livid remains of his noble
countenance
,
the gaunt and angular outline of his once
graceful form, he felt that he had need of all his
courage to hold to his resolution.
Horrible! said he, turning away with a
suffocating
feeling. But this is no time even for
remorse
he must not lie here. Then hastily
quitting the hut, and, vaulting on the bare back of
his horse, he set off at full speed for the village.
It was now the first time since Maldura left
Florence that anything like a feeling of
self-approbation
had even glanced on his heart; for now,
in spite of his remorse, the consciousness of
performing
a duty forced a passage to his breast;
and feeble as this was  even as the thread of light
that ravels its way through hundreds of fathoms of
darkness to the half quenched eye of the
condemned
miner  it yet seemed to cheer his heart
almost with hope.
Having ordered such accommodations as the
village post-house afforded, Maldura returned with
assistance to the hovel, and soon saw his wretched
friend comfortably lodged.
A messenger was then despatched for a physician,
but, there being none nearer than Naples, it was
near midnight before he arrived. The apparently
exhausted maniac had in the meantime, through
the mistaken indulgence of his attendants, been
suffered to gorge himself with food. This brought
on a lethargy, then suffocation and spasms, ending
in a frightful paroxysm of raving; in the height of
which the physician entered.
The agony of Maldura during this scene had
become
almost insupportable; but when the physician
observed that the injudicious treatment of the
patient was the probable cause of his frenzy, and
gave hope of his recovery, he dropped senseless.
He had borne misery, as we have seen, and almost
despair, with a degree of firmness; but the
transition
of the latter to hope, even feeble as it was,
proved too much for him. As he had, however,
only fainted, he was soon revived, when, observing
that he still appeared to be much weakened, the
doctor advised his going immediately to bed.
No, said Maldura  I must remain where
I am, though the sounds I hear rive me like fire
from heaven.
Alack! said the hostess, who was then
bathing his temples, he has caught the other's
madness.
No, woman, replied Maldura with a ghastly
smile, mine is from hell.
My good sir, said the physician, this is no
place for one in your state  you must to bed.
Look at him, continued Maldura, turning
towards Monaldi, and without regarding the
speaker
look at that human ruin.
The maniac now, attempting to rise, appeared
first to discover that he was bound. For a moment
he endeavored to free himself with a kind of
childish impatience, but finding himself baffled, he
sent forth a cry so shrill and piteous that the
attendants involuntarily put their hands to their
ears.
Nay, hear it, said Maldura, who alone seemed
to listen unmoved, but whom the sound had smote
deeper; hear it  'tis the crash of a wrecked
mind  yet even that  even him I envy  For
what is his state to mine? No  the world
cannot
see the hell from which my spirit looks
nor know the longing with which it strains over
the gulf between us. Bid me not leave him, in
the fear that suffering like his can injure
me
.
Thus did the pride of Maldura, stony and
colossal as it seemed, fall before the voice of
conscience
,
even as the walls of Jerico before the horn
of Joshua.
But the triumph of conscience was not yet
complete
.
Though his presumption was gone, and he
no longer sought to resist or evade the sense of
his crime, he could not wholly subdue a worldly
feeling of shame at the thought of appearing
despicable
in the eyes of others. He had therefore
no sooner given vent to this burst of remorse, and
perceived its effect on the astonished hearers, than
he felt as if he could have sunk into the earth.
Poor gentleman! said the landlady, crossing
herself with a mixture of fear and compassion
he seems to have some terrible sin on his mind.
Peace woman! said Maldura, leave the
room.
San' Gennaro protect us! muttered the
hostess. I can at least take a good conscience
away with me  which is more than I shall leave
here.
Whatever the physician may have thought, he
was prudent enough to keep it to himself; he
however again urged Maldura to retire; but,
finding
him still obstinate, he left his patient in his
charge, promising to repeat his visit at an early
hour the next day.
This was the first penance to which Maldura
had ever brought himself to submit. And never
did desperate contrition encounter a greater. For,
taking his station at the foot of the bed, and
keeping
his eyes fixed on Monaldi, he scarcely moved
during the whole night; and, though every sound
and look seemed to go through him, he still
continued
to stand listening and gazing, hour after
hour, till the wretched maniac, exhausted by
raving and the violence of the fever, sunk at last
to sleep.
The day was already far advanced before the
19
physician arrived. Your friend, said he,
turning
to Maldura, if I mistake not, will awake in
his senses: it may be, only to know that he is
dying; yet, as it is possible he may recover, we
will hope for the best. All depends on the strength
of his constitution, and his being kept quiet.
Maldura attempted to speak  My dear sir,
continued the doctor, perceiving his emotion, I
will not ask if you wish the recovery of your
friend; but, if you do, you must remain here no
longer. His crisis is at hand, and I dare not
answer for the issue should either your presence,
or any other cause produce the least agitation.
Tis not for your sake, but his   No more,
said Maldura, You shall be obeyed. But when
You may see him to-morrow, interrupted the
physician.
CHAPTER XVII.
When
Monaldi awoke the next morning, his
reason was returned; but he was so feeble that
his attendants could only perceive it in the change
of his countenance. The sympathy in such a
transition is not confined to friends or relatives;
for there is no species of calamity more
universally
touching than madness, and no joy more
general
than that which follows the restoration of
reason
.
Though surrounded by strangers, no sooner
did Monaldi open his eyes and begin to speak
through them like an intelligent being, than, with
the exception of his, there was not a dry eye seen
in the room; and when he at last spoke, and
inquired
where he was, their joy became so
tumultuous
that the physician was obliged to order them
away.
This is but one instance of the many anomalies
of human nature; for amongst all these whose
humane sympathy was here excited, there was
scarcely one, perhaps, who might not, in other
circumstances
,
have easily been tempted to cheat, or
slander, or betray the very object of their present
compassion.
Whether this feeling be called virtuous, or not,
it is not to be relied on as any evidence of
goodness
.
There is nothing indeed deserving the
name that is not equally so under all
circumstances
;
an integrity which principle alone can
ensure; the true proof of which is where,
opposed
to our interest, it triumphs over self.
And yet this incidental virtue has its use, nay, it
seems to be a common providential tax, that not
even the bad should escape adding something,
however small, to the general stock of happiness;
for even the most selfish must be limited in his
conflicts, and find thousands about him to whom
he may be kind and compassionate without the
cost even of a calculation; the world would else
be at a stand, and the mass of men locked up in
individual jealousies amidst the universal barter of
benefits.
When the Physician had pronounced Monaldi
out of danger, and he had so far recovered as to
sit up and converse without difficulty, Maldura
ventured to enter his chamber.
Is it you, Doctor said Monaldi, for the dim
light of the room prevented his seeing distinctly.
No, replied Maldura; the doctor is in
Naples
,
and will not return before to-morrow.
Sure I should know those tones, said
Monaldi
,
reaching forward, and yet it cannot be.
Who is it then? Maldura then drew nearer.
Blessed Heaven! Maldura! But, speak  is
it indeed my friend? or does this uncertain light
mock me?
You are not deceived, said Maldura: 't is
even he whom you once  It
is
Maldura.
It is indeed! said Monaldi, as soon as his
emotion allowed him utterance. My best, my
earliest friend. But how came you here? Yet I
need not ask; for the kindness of Maldura's heart
would have traced me.
Maldura turned away and covered his face in
agony; for he had now to taste the bitter draught
of praise unmerited  of praise made still more
bitter in coming from the unsuspecting victim of
his own villany.
Nay, do not weep, said Monaldi, mistaking
the cause of his emotion. I seem, it is true, a
sorry spectacle, but that is nothing: I have been
snatched from death  and more  I am restored
with reason. Do not weep then, but rather
rejoice
,
and aid me in giving thanks to that merciful
Being who has still spared me, guilty as I am.
19*
Maldura, making an effort to collect himself,
again took the hand of his friend. Monaldi,
said he, I would pray with thee, but
You believe
not?
said Monaldi mournfully.
Alas, I had hoped that your early opinions had
passed away with the vainglory of youth.
You mistake me, replied Maldura, I
thought not to deny your request, but only to
defer for awhile
But why? interrupted Monaldi. Is not
praise due for signal mercy?
Because you know not yet the full measure of
that mercy.
What mean you? cried Monaldi, starting up
in the bed. Is there  can there be  alas!
no; the world is nothing now to me. Yet I will
not repine; for this is mercy  oh, how far beyond
my deserts, that I am still permitted, though with
a life of sorrow, even
here
to atone for that
accursed
deed. But I speak perhaps of what to you
is a mystery. Maldura was silent, for he knew
not how to reply. It must be so, continued
Monaldi, else you would not be here.
Not so, answered Maldura.
You know it then?
But too well.
And yet, because your friend  you come to
comfort a murderer. So pure yourself, yet so
compassionate of guilt! There is but one
Maldura
.
Maldura only replied with a groan. Would,
he thought, there were never one!
But no, added Monaldi; I do injustice to
your principles. You come to call him to
repentance
.
No
you
need not  at least in the degree.
Say not so, cried Monaldi; you know not
the damning nature of my crime. The guilt of
blood is on me  that were enough  but that
blood too was
innocent
. Yet, dreadful as is this
aggravation, still do I bless Heaven that I was
permitted
to know it ere we parted. No, Maldura,
deeply as it sinks me in misery, I would not
exchange
this blissful conviction, wrought as it was
in agony and blood, and breathed into my soul by
her dying lips  for all the joys (might even my
spirit taste them) which the whole world could
give.
Thank Heaven! thought Maldura, he
believes
her innocent. He has now only to bear the
shock of joy.
Doubt you then, continued Monaldi, that I
need repentance?
I do not doubt  though I repeat my words.
I cannot understand you.
Nor will you until you know  but I wander
from my purpose.
What purpose?
You shall hear. But have you courage? Do
you think you could bear
What?
The fulness of joy.
Oh, torture me not, said Monaldi, grasping
his hand with violence. A dream of hope has
come to me  speak quickly  for I fear that I
could not survive its vanishing.
Then, live, said Maldura, for your wife
Speak! said Monaldi, with a piercing scream.
She lives! said Maldura.
Monaldi, losing his hold, fell back speechless on
the bed. Maldura instantly sprang to his
assistance
;
but he had not fainted. Heaven be
praised! said Maldura, at least one mountain is
off my soul.
For a long time Monaldi lay without word or
motion; at length, drawing a deep sigh, he gently
clasped his hands, and raising his eyes upwards,
seemed to be engaged in prayer. His wretched
companion knelt beside the bed, and bending over
it, continued in that posture till, overwhelmed by
the sense of guilt, he sunk exhausted on the
floor. This was the first prayer that Maldura had
uttered since his days of childhood; and the
consciousness
that it was so, carried his thoughts back
over a dreary and long-forgotten waste of years:
no wonder then, that he sank appalled, when, at
every step, some buried sin, now rising up before
him, added to the long array, like an army of
spectres.
My friend, said Monaldi, reaching out his
hand, come near me. My strength has
returned
.
Blessed be God! said Maldura, if that
I
might say so.
Monaldi, pressing his hand, made a sign to him
to sit by the bed. I am strong enough, said
he, to hear the particulars. How was it? how
did she survive the blow? I thought I saw her
die  but my reason was gone.
Maldura then related in a few words what he
had gathered from report; and concluded by
telling
him that he had already written to Rosalia and
her father to acquaint them with his situation, and
that he had since despatched another messenger
with the tidings of his recovery.
And yet her ashy cheek  the leaden eye,
which has so long haunted me, said Monaldi,
were they not real? Speak to me, Maldura
for this strange place  all I have heard, seem so
like a dream.
'T is all real, answered Maldura.
Mysterious Providence, how dost thou watch
over and baffle the sinner for his good! And you
saw her?
No. I said not that I saw her
Nay, then, interrupted Monaldi, with a
distrustful
look.
But I had the account from your family
surgeon
.
I think his name is Vannini.
'T is true then! cried Monaldi, the whole
world would not make me doubt it now. Bless
him! Oh, Maldura   He stopped, for the
fulness of his joy verged to pain, for a minute
almost to agony, when a flood of tears relieved
him.
Devil! thought Maldura, and I would have
broken this heart.
Give me your hand, said Monaldi. Yes,
't is real.
The touch shot maddening to Maldura's brain.
He withdrew his hand, and covered his face.
What is the matter  are you ill? asked
Monaldi
.
Think not of me, said Maldura. I would
have but one thought  of yourself.
So like you! yourself ever last. Then be it
so. You tell me that my poor wife was soon
recovered
.
Did she  yes, she forgave me  she
must have inquired after me.
You were sought after through every town
and village. Even now, I believe the search is
continued.
Thank Heaven! she was spared
that
shock.
Had she discovered me at one time  Oh, my
friend, you know not what I have suffered.
But too well, thought Maldura. And yet,
he added aloud, as if willing to take from the load
on his conscience, the loss of reason must have
blunted you too much.
You say right. What I endured at that time
I know not; 't is now but a dark dream to my
memory. But this is not my first return to reason.
I had a lucid interval of many days  such
days!  No, your innocent heart cannot even
shadow them
you
have not felt remorse.
I must bear it, said Maldura to himself.
Then let it come  all! Go on.
When I came to myself I awoke, as I thought,
with a sensation of extreme cold. I was lying on
the snow, on one of the desolate ridges of the
Apennines. How I came there I knew not  and
I thought I was dreaming; but I soon found that
I had recovered from madness. I shuddered.
Yet my recollections of it were dim and shadowy,
and they passed away. Not so what followed
the remembrance of the night which sent me forth
a maniac; my poor wife  murdered, and
innocent
yet forgiving her murderer. This was the
misery, Maldura. I had taken vengeance upon
me, when I should have forgiven even my
deadliest
enemy. I was a murderer of one who loved
me! No  you must first know remorse to know
what I have gone through. But I will not recall
it.
Nay, on  I would know
all,
said Maldura,
whose self-abhorrence now became greedy of
penance
.
Perhaps you are right, answered Monaldi.
'T is wholesome for the mind to look on past
suffering
and most so when happy. And I  't is
hardly painful to recall it now. But one instance
is enough. About sunrise one day I found myself
standing on the edge of a precipice; I looked
down, and saw, some hundred feet below me, and
rising from out a bed of mist, a multitude of
jagged rocks. On the peak of one of them I
perceived
something white; I drew nearer, and found
it to be the skeleton of a mule. The surest foot,
thought I, may stumble at last. It seemed a type
of myself. As the mist cleared away, I looked
again, and a little lower down I descried the bones
and tattered garments of a man. The skull had
fallen from the body, and lay grinning upward as
if in mockery of my horror. Presently it appeared
to move; a moment after, a small snake wound
itself out of one of the eye-holes. At another time
this would have made me shudder; but I now
caught at it with a perverse avidity: it seemed to
call up the living man before me. I saw him with
all his innumerable nerves, and those sensitive
messengers speeding with the abhorred touch of
the reptile to his brain. I saw his hair bristling
with terror, and heard his cry echo among the
rocks. I then thought of his form in death, now
blanched and mottled with weather-stains,
impenetrable
to injury, though man and beast were
leagued against it, though the mountain I stood
on should topple down and grind it to powder. A
horrid feeling of envy gushed from my heart. I
called it happy, and hung over it with a kind of
furious longing  gazing, and gazing  till,
methought
,
something  I know not what
seemed
to force me from the precipice, and I fell on
my knees. It was the first time I had dared to
do so.
'T was for
me
to have envied it! said
Maldura
,
thinking unconsciously aloud.
20
You! exclaimed Monaldi.
Go on, said Maldura.
I know not how long I continued in prayer,
resumed Monaldi, but when I arose my despair
was gone; my remorse was now changed to
repentance
.
Then followed hope  such hope
oh, my friend, as only the broken heart can know
when the healing comes from Heaven.
But such as mine, said Maldura, in a
half-smothered
voice  his heart failed him, and he
stopped.
Monaldi continued. How my reason again
wandered  But I see it distresses you. We
will leave the past then, and talk of the future
or rather of the present. But why do you shake
so, and look so pale? Nay, forgive me that I have
asked such a question  as if you could hear my
tale unmoved. Oh, Maldura, you have the heart
of a child.
This is too much, said Maldura, moving
away from the bed.
Nay, said Monaldi, do not think of my
sufferings; they are passed. Think only of my
present happiness; for I know not the mortal with
whom I would now exchange lots. Come, my
friend, dwell no more on the past, but think of the
world I possess. For is not that a world, beyond
which the heart has no craving? And what more
could I ask, with such a wife, and such a friend?
You never
had
a friend, said Maldura.
Never had! repeated Monaldi, with a
feeling
rather of perplexity than astonishment.
Maldura
,
why do you talk so wildly?
Maldura made no reply, but, returning to the
bed, drew a chair near it. His eyes were bent
downward, and he seemed inwardly struggling
with some violent emotion.  'T is done! he
said at last, while a flush of gloomy satisfaction
passed over his brow: the proud neck bends to
the yoke.
Whose neck? asked Monaldi.
Monaldi, said Maldura, without heeding the
question, you said you believed your wife
innocent
.
On what was your faith founded?
On her own words.
On nothing more?
The faint color, which the excitement of the
moment had brought to Monaldi's cheek, now
suddenly gave place to a corpse-like whiteness.
'T is even as I thought, said Maldura to
himself
;
another fiend might rekindle his suspicions
with a breath. And he repeated the question.
Wherefore do you ask? said Monaldi.
You shall know. But answer me. Had you
no other ground of faith?
They were her dying words  at least so
thought she as well as I. I needed no more.
And would they serve you, think you, as a
lasting panoply? And you  would no
insinuation
,
no future circumstance touch you with
doubt?
I think  nay, I
know
they would not. Yet
why  oh, do not torture me  but if you know
aught  speak at once.
You have said enough, replied Maldura, to
determine my course. You would not again
murder
,
for your heart is changed; but for the rest
Monaldi, you need more than your wife's words;
and you shall have it. You
believe
but
I know
her to be innocent.
You!
You shall have proof which you cannot doubt.
Listen  You first saw Fialto in your gateway?
Fialto! How know you
No matter. Answer me.
I did so.
You saw him then almost daily in Romero's
shop, or sauntering by your house; looking up at
your windows, and always seeming confused when
detected. Next you met him at the theatre
then as you were returning home near your house.
Monaldi listened with amazement. Good
heaven! you could have learnt these particulars
only from the wretch himself.
You will know how I came by them. Had
not you a servant called Antonio?
Yes.
He was a creature of Fialto's. Through him
his employer became apprized of all your
movements
your visit to the theatre  your projected
journey to Genezzano: this last intelligence
suggested
the letter, which was put into your hand,
as if by mistake. You were addressed as
Gieuseppe
Monstrous!
Ay  there are devils that walk the earth
even now. But listen. Then followed the last
damning proof. The effect of the letter was
anticipated
it needed but little knowledge of man
to have done it  your suppressing it; your
feigned
journey; your return. Accordingly Fialto was
prepared to meet you, the wretch Antonio having
admitted and secreted him at an early hour in
your dressing-room.
Enough, cried Monaldi; I need no more.
Nay, I must through. Your approach was
20*
then announced by a preconcerted signal from one
who had dogged you from Rome, and back. Soon
after, your step being heard on the stairs, Fialto
stole forth from the closet; you were at the door;
he sprang towards the bed, and seized your
sleeping
wife.
Merciful heaven! that human malice should
have so pursued me!
Was it not a web worthy of fiends?
Horrible!
You had been unlike man to have broken
through it.
The frightful scene still makes me shudder.
But, tell me  what was the motive for this cruel
villany?
Revenge.
Revenge!  for what? I had never injured
him. I knew not even the name of Fialto till we
met in the theatre.
Think not of
him;
he was but the instrument
and a fit one too, for his name alone were
enough to blast the peace of any house he might
enter. What he did was for that with which hell
is paved  for gold.
Of whom speak you then?
Of the devil that employed him  to whose
black and envious soul the libertine Fialto's seems
almost bright; of one who hated you.
Hated me! I have never harmed living
creature
,
knowingly.
Know you not then that virtue, genius,
success
,
are all, to the evil mind, causes of hatred?
You doubt it. Oh, the pure in heart are slow of
faith in evil. But you shall have proof  living
proof. Do not interrupt me. There was a time
when you, Monaldi, were but one of the multitude.
You may recall it if you look back to your days of
boyhood  to the school at Bologna. You were
then deemed one of little promise  next to
nothing
.
No doubt your quiet and retired habits led
to the opinion; but so it was  and the opinion
was general. You may remember too the
reputation
which
I
then held; your own estimation of
my talents; that of our masters; of the whole
school. I stood alone  the first  without a rival.
Could there have been a greater contrast? No.
The general voice had placed us at opposite
extremes
:
and I thought it just. Yet, because of
your praise, I courted your acquaintance. Your
confiding heart readily opened to receive me, and
in an evil hour, you called me
friend
.
Stop! cried Monaldi, convulsively grasping
Maldura's arm; for a suspicion of the truth now
flashed upon him, and his horror became
intolerable
.
'T will soon be over, replied Maldura.
I cannot hear it, said Monaldi  I must
not.
I must on, answered Maldura; for the
finger of Power is upon me  and I cannot choose
but speak. Then, averting his face and looking
from Monaldi, he continued with increasing
rapidity
.
Elated with praise, full  nay, drunk with
hope  and sure of fulfilling every early
prediction
I began my career. But I will not go over
the horrible ground  at every step I sunk  lower
and lower  'till  yes, I must speak it  till my
very name was blurred with the common mass.
What followed then? Envy and loathing of all
above me.
Monaldi groaned. Impede me not, said
Maldura, hurrying onward, but listen. I now
return to you. What was then your course? From
obscurity, neglect, almost from contempt; when
no one even thought of, dreamt of such a being
with the suddenness of a meteor you burst upon
the world. In a moment all eyes were upon you
every tongue, every heart was yours. How think
you
I
heard, saw, felt all this?  how beheld
this fame  this boon of the world, for which alone
I had
coveted
life  snatched from my grasp, and
lavished unmeasured on the very man with whom
my proud spirit would have once disdained to
contend
?
I cursed you from my heart.
Monaldi gasped for breath.
Maldura continued. You can now understand
my greeting when we first met in Rome  why,
knowing your voice, I fled from the gate-way
why I rejected your daily kindnesses  why almost
spurned your last generous proffer. But your fame
was not all that haunted and goaded me; though
I could not forgive, I should yet have endured it
in silence. Your reputation was followed by
another
offence still deadlier to my pride: you
supplanted
me in my love. For in my days of hope
I had loved your wife  had offered my hand
and been rejected. You afterwards saw and won
her.
This
was the blow that felled me. The news
of your marriage passed through my heart like
lightning, scathing every human feeling  and I
swore by my misery that I would blast your
happiness
.
Monaldi's teeth chattered as with an ague: his
hands were crossed upon his breast, his head sunk
between his shoulders, and his whole body drawn
up as if under the influence of terror; yet his
eyes remained fastened on Maldura, as though a
fearful charm made it impossible to withdraw them.
But Maldura saw not  thought not of this effect
of his disburthening conscience; his thoughts were
on himself, and, his eyes turned from Monaldi to
the opposite wall, he continued to speak like one
impelled by the rack. It was for this purpose I
sought Fialto. 'Twas I
I
was his employer.
'Twas
I
caused him to hang about your house
to waylay you from the theatre  to write the
letter. Yes, it was
I
repeated Maldura, when,
with a terrific shout, Monaldi leaped from the bed.
Avaunt fiend!
Maldura stood aghast.
Back! back to hell! vociferated Monaldi.
Yes, I deserve it, said Maldura,  Hell is
my place. Even now
What's your name?
Is it  can it be! said Maldura  Heaven
forbid. Do you not know me! 'T is I
Maldura
.
You Maldura! cried the maniac, with a
scornful laugh. Maldura's hair rose with horror.
Thou liest! Maldura was my friend  he was
honest, righteous. He had no wings as thou hast.
Avaunt, devil!
'T is over! said Maldura, clasping his hands
in agony  my measure is full   and he rushed
from the chamber.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Where
which way? Show me to him, said
Rosalia.
Be patient, my child, said her father. We
must not be abrupt. So sudden a meeting might
prove fatal. Let us wait till our good hostess has
apprized him of our arrival.
With all my heart, replied the landlady;
though, I should think, the better person for this
office would be his friend, Signor Maldura.
True, observed Landi. But first, tell me
How is he?
The landlady then related the particulars of
Monaldi's illness, and was just concluding with an
account of his entire recovery, when, pale and
ghastly, Maldura entered.
Horrible! said Maldura, drawing back at the
sight of Landi. His wife too  Monster! now
am I doubly cursed!
Speak! What's the matter? exclaimed
Rosalia and Landi in the same breath.
You will know but too soon, replied Maldura,
retreating towards the door.
For mercy's sake! cried Rosalia. Stop,
tell
Stay me not, said Maldura in a choaking
voice  there's a curse about me. So saying,
he dashed open the door, and ran with frantic
swiftness from the house.
If it be hard to part with the dead, and to see
one borne to the grave with whom we have been
accustomed to associate all our wishes and schemes
of happiness, and without whom nothing in life
seems capable of imparting enjoyment, there is
yet a consolation in the thought that our grief is
only for our own suffering, since it cannot reach
one to whom our loss is a gain. What then must
it be to feel this entire avulsion from the living; to
know that the object with whom our very soul was
mixed, and who is thus parted from our common
being, still walks the same earth, breathes the same
air, and wears the same form; yet lives, as to us,
as if dead  closed, sealed up from all our thoughts
and sympathies, like to a statue of adamant. What
must it be to know too that this second self, though
callous and impenetrable from without, is yet within
all sense? The partial palsy-death of the body
is but a faint image of this half-death of the
twinbeing
wife and husband. And Rosalia soon felt it
in all its agony.
The alarm occasioned by this last scene was so
sudden that neither father nor daughter thought
more of first making known their arrival, but,
following
the landlady, entered Monaldi's chamber.
He was sitting on the bed, his hands clenched on
his knees, and his eyes fixed on vacancy. Rosalia
sprang forward, but at the sight of his countenance
she shrunk back and stood gazing on him in silence.
And next to madness was the dreadful conviction
within her. She would have folded him in her
arms; but the thought of the touch of the
benumbed
,
vacant being before her sickened her, and
she sunk back in her father's arms. But she had
not fainted: the energy of hope that he might
again recover, came like a ministering spirit, and
nerved her for the occasion.
You must go with me, said Landi.
No, replied Rosalia, in a low, but firm, voice;
I am
his
even in madness. Do not fear for me;
the shock is now over. But, speak to him. Landi
then advancing spoke to him by name; but Monaldi
making no answer, he drew nearer and took his
hand. For a moment Monaldi turned to look at
him, then withdrawing his eyes as if with terror
away, away! he cried. Why come you
21
again? thou liest  Maldura did not do it  't was
I murdered her. Look  look at her  't was I
she was my wife  she'll confess it herself. But
no, she cannot  she's dead.
No, she lives  she is still yours! cried
Rosalia
,
going to him.
Ha! there are two! cried the maniac with a
frightful shriek. Take them away  I did not
murder both.
The father and daughter stood silent and
motionless
;
their very breath seemed suspended; and
for several minutes not a sound was heard but the
quick, low panting of the affrighted maniac.
Landi
,
alarmed for the reason of his daughter, drew
her into another room, when she fell on his neck
and wept. But we close the scene; for we
cannot
describe that which no tears relieved  even
that blessed dew, which, in most other cases,
softens
agony.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Little
now remains to be told of the
unfortunate
Monaldi. He was taken home by his friends,
and every means used to restore his reason; but
without effect. He would remain for days
together
,
fixed in one spot, with his eyes bent on the
ground, and without speaking, or appearing
conscious
of what was passing about him. Whilst in
this state nothing could rouse him but the voice of
his wife, which never failed to bring on a paroxysm
of raving, when he would sometimes fancy himself
Fialto, then Maldura, but more often that he was
one among the dead, and that Rosalia had come
to upbraid him; for he had in some way or other
connected her image with a spirit.
This was a bitter aggravation to Rosalia's
wretchedness, since, by forcing her to avoid him,
it deprived her of her last melancholy pleasure,
that of administering to his comforts. Her
struggle
was long and severe, before she could bring
herself to quit him; she at last, however,
consented
to remove to her father's. But nothing could
prevail with her to forbear visiting the house, where
she would often pass entire days, sometimes sitting
in an adjoining room, and listening to his footsteps,
or wandering to and fro, and hanging with
fondness
over every spot and object with which she
could associate his slightest word or look. Oh,
woman, when thy heart is pure, and thy love true,
what is there in nature to match thee! Though
he whom thou lovest become maimed, wasted by
disease, or blanked by madness, yet wilt thou cling
to him, and see in the ruin only that image which
he first left in thy heart.
It was after one of the longest of these
paroxysms
,
that Monaldi was one day seen to go into
his painting-room. This unusual circumstance
was immediately caught at as a symptom of
returning
reason; and the hopes of his friends were
raised on finding, a few days after, that he was at
work on a picture. But his impenetrable silence,
and the deep gloom which still hung about him,
soon shewed, that, if he had recovered at all, it
was only in part; for though his look was no longer
vacant, nor his actions without purpose, he yet
moved and looked as if he noticed nothing. What
he was employed on no one knew, for, without
speaking, he once discovered so much distress at
the intrusion of a servant, that no one after dared
enter his room. In this mood did Monaldi pass
month after month, regularly shut up, and
occupied
as if in his perfect senses. At length, after
a fit of weeping, that seemed to fill the whole
house with wailing, he one day came out of his
room, and desired that his father-in-law might be
sent for. Though the order was rational, there
was still something so frightful in his expression,
that the servants at first all drew back; nor was it
till they recollected its coherence that any one
prepared
to obey him.
With a beating heart, and eyes lighted up with
hope, Landi instantly followed the messenger.
Monaldi met him at the door.
You know me then? said the Advocate.
Monaldi spoke not a word, but led him in
silence
to his painting-room.
He watched Landi's countenance. You feel
it? said he, though only a picture
I
have
known the original. What is there, I have
seen
.
As he said this, his lips quivered and his knees
smote each other.
Monaldi's insanity could no longer be doubted,
and Landi turned from the picture with a hopeless
sigh.
21*
Nay, speak not, said Monaldi, thinking he
was about to reply: my time is measured; for
my work on earth is done  and I must burthen
it no longer. Landi  thou art reputed wise.
Yes, amongst the living thou art so. But what is
thy wisdom with the dead? Folly! Your earthly
philosophy teaches that the Prince of evil is
hideous. And you think to serve the world by it.
Miserable folly! Men flee from what is frightful.
So would they from sin, did it take the shape you
have given it. But
I
I have seen it, face to
face  enthroned in the majesty of hell. Look!
That is the form in which he whom men call
Satan appears to the living. Ay, 't is with that
deadly beauty he wins your souls. But the
evil
mind,
which you now see mixed with it, transpires
not on earth, when he tempts you; 't is only in
hell that his victims behold, and hate it  when
too late. Look to it then, you of earth  you, to
whom I leave this warning  look to it.
The wild mixture of reason and madness in
this speech, and the extraordinary work before
him, so confounded Landi that it was several
minutes before he became sufficiently collected
to perceive that Monaldi had disappeared. His
last words then occurred to him, and though
obscure
,
he yet understood enough to be alarmed,
and set off immediately in search of him. But in
vain.
From that day nothing was heard of Monaldi
till more than a year after; when, he was
accidentally
discovered at the cottage of a lone woman
among the mountains of Abruzzo; but as neither
menace nor entreaty could prevail on him to return
home, his friends were compelled to humor him, and
to content themselves with making his situation as
comfortable as the nature of his abode admitted.
Of Rosalia [continues the manuscript] little
more need be said. Her affliction is still
unabated
;
for time, which wears away all grief for
the dead, has no power with her who is at once
both wife and widow. Monaldi is never out of
her thoughts; and, her only consolation being that
of feeling herself near him, she has become a
boarder at a convent in his neighborhood.
Maldura's fate may be told in a few words.
He became a brother of this convent soon after
his last interview with Monaldi, and died about
two years ago; if not lamented, at least pitied for
his sufferings, and respected for his penitence. It
was at his instance that the picture just
mentioned
was procured for the convent. He wished to
have it near him, he said, that he might never
forget
what a mind he had blasted.
So died Maldura; from whose miserable life
may be learned this useful lesson: that without
virtue, the love of praise is a curse; that
distinction
is the consequence  not the object, of a
great mind; that it cannot be made so without
the desire of supplanting; and that envy, jealousy,
or any similar feeling  whatever the pursuit
may always be regarded by those who have them,
as sure warnings that the true love of excellence
is not in them  without which nothing great and
permanent ever was produced.
The career of his accomplice was sooner ended,
and, if less painful, it was still less enviable; for,
though Fialto had always laid the unction of minor
villany to his soul when he compared himself with
Maldura, he was, for many reasons, of a character
more hopeless. If ambition hardens the heart,
sensuality kills it. The natural and social feelings
of the ambitious man, nay, also the conscience,
may all indeed be lost in selfish insulation; yet
there are causes which sometimes revive them
such as time, disappointment, or even the
attainment
of his object  whether it be power or
revenge
;
when they often react, as in Maldura's
case, by repentance. But there is little hope of
these in the course of the libertine; to whom
failure supplies excitement, and success adds
habit, which time only confirms; and it must be
so; for it being the nature of his vices to identify
the affections with the senses, the whole heart
becomes animal, thence a pander to the body, till
its baser functions are wasted; nor stopping even
then, but, in the restlessness of habit sending at
last its prurient desires to the brain, and mocking
the wretched remnant of the man to the very
grave. The old age of a confirmed libertine is
therefore seldom better than a loathsome
phantasmagoria
of a vicious youth. The Count Fialto
was saved at least this second childhood of sin.
He had embarked soon after quitting Rome, with
the poor Nun, and his ill-got wealth, on board a
small vessel bound for Marseilles. The vessel was
never more heard of; but the bodies of the Count
and his companion were found by some fishermen,
washed up, about three weeks after, on the island
of Gorgona.
THE END OF THE MANUSCRIPT.
CONCLUSION, BY THE TRAVELLER.
Having
been pressed by my friendly host to
prolong
my visit at the convent, it was only two days
after I had finished reading the manuscript, and
whilst I was still musing on its melancholy
contents
,
that the prior entered my apartment.
I have come, said he, to make known to
you one of those remarkable coincidences which
the inexperienced are apt to imagine confined
to romances, but which I have lived long enough
to know are more common to real life. You have
just read the imperfect story of my poor friend in
time to be a witness to its closing scene. He is
now dying.
Dying!
So it is supposed; for his senses are returned;
and I have just been sent for to administer the
last rites of the church.
After what you have said, I replied, I
suppose
I may be allowed to attend you.
Not as a stranger, returned the good priest;
but you have shewn that you have a better title.
A tear shed in sympathy makes men brethren who
have never before met; 't is a touching evidence
of our common descent.
My heart was too full from what I had been
reading to continue the discourse, and I followed
the prior in silence.
As we entered the cottage, we were met by the
old woman, who desired us to wait a moment till
she had acquainted the
lady
with our arrival.
It seemed strange that a mere narrative should
attach us so deeply to one we never saw; but so
it was; the thought of meeting Rosalia made my
heart beat as if I had known her for years, and I
felt I know not what; perhaps it was most like the
feeling we have for a beloved sister  the purest,
and most delicate sentiment of which our nature
is capable.
After a few minutes Rosalia came out, and,
taking the good priest by the hand, led him to
the sick man's chamber. On their way he
inquired
the state of her husband. She did not
speak, but, lifting her eyes upward, answered by a
look which said more than any words could have
told. I could wish always to remember that look:
it was not one of grief, nor even of melancholy;
it was all rapture  yet so solemn that it filled me
with awe; seeming to announce, while she
prophetically
saw, the approaching beatification of
him she loved.
Thou art worthy, thought I, to have been
loved to madness. There is no
self
in that look;
't is all Monaldi's, for thy soul is too rapt with the
thought of what awaits him to be conscious even
of thy own privation.
The religious rites being over, the Prior
returned
to conduct me to the chamber. At first
I hesitated, for I began to doubt if my presence
might not be an intrusion.
Not so, said the kind old man; as my
friend you cannot intrude. Besides your interest
in the poor sufferer is already known to his wife;
and for him  he is now in a state reckless of all
human forms. I would have you see him; for
the death of a christian  the death in hope
has no parallel in sublimity on our earth.
As we entered the chamber Rosalia was
kneeling
beside her husband, her head resting on his
bosom. She raised her head at our approach, but
did not rise. A faint smile passed over the face
of the dying man, and he beckoned the prior to
the other side of the bed; then, taking a hand of
each, he closed his eyes for a moment, and seemed
absorbed in prayer.
I have been praying, said Monaldi, when he
looked up,  I have been praying that my life
might not pass away without profit to those I leave
behind me; not to thee, father, for thou hast long
known the virtue of sorrow; nor to thee, my
beloved, who comest now to partake with me this
triumph of affliction; but to the world; that they
might see in my life that Supreme Love, which
turneth the very misery from our misdeeds into a
cleansing fountain; that they might learn from
it, that affliction, rightly understood, is a spiritual
blessing.
Thou sayest well, my son, said the Prior;
for the sufferings of this world are healthful
medicine to the soul; even the holy apostles
tasted it. Let those who grieve then remember
the words of Him who suffered for us  `blessed
are they that mourn, for they shall be comforted.'
Monaldi continued, Of worldly happiness I
have had my portion  perhaps, as much as
mortal
could bear  but my strength fails. Here he
stopped.
I now looked at Rosalia; but no description
can give a picture of her face at that moment.
After a few moments, the husband proceeded;
Rosalia,  she pressed his hand in token of
her attention. Have we not known such
happiness
?
'T is nothing to that we shall know when
22
we meet again. You will not grieve then for the
little space that parts us  even
now,
he added,
in a fainter voice; for I feel that my hour is
come. Yet grieve not that it is so  't is but the
beginning of peace, which passeth all
understanding
.
And  blessed be thy name, Parent of
good! for now know I that thou lovest whom
thou chastenest.
He then crossed his hands upon his breast, and,
raising his eyes, fixed them upward, with such an
expression as I could hardly believe belonged to
the human countenance.
This is not the mere crumbling of a mortal
body, thought I  its passage to dust  but a
revelation  touching our highest instinct, and
giving it evidence of the invisible world; for it
seemed as if I could see his soul raying through
his eyes, and already pass into it; holding
communion
,
even by those bodily organs, with the just
made perfect. I was so overpowered by this holy
vision (for so I might almost call it) that my eyes
involuntarily fell  when I raised them again he
was gone.
THE END.